THE LEGEND OF DON RODERICK.
CHAPTER I.
Of the ancient inhabitants of Spainof the
misrule of Witiza the Wicked
.
Spain
, or Iberia, as it was called in ancient
days, has been a country harassed from the
earliest times, by the invader. The Celts, the
Greeks, the Phenecians, the Carthagenians, by
turns, or simultaneously, infringed its territories;
[1]
[1]
Many of the facts in this legend are taken from an old
chronicle, written in quaint and antiquated Spanish, and
professing to be a translation from the Arabian chronicle of
the Moor Rasis, by Mohammed, a Moslem writer, and Gil
Perez, a Spanish priest. It is supposed to be a piece of
literary
mosaic work, made up from both Spanish and Arabian
chronicles: yet, from this work most of the Spanish
historians
have drawn their particulars relative to the fortunes of
Don Roderick.
drove the native Iberians from their rightful
homes, and established colonies and founded
cities in the land. It subsequently fell into the
all grasping power of Rome, remaining for some
time a subjugated province; and when that
gigantic
empire crumbled into pieces, the Suevi,
the Alani, and the Vandals, those barbarians of
the north, overran and ravaged this devoted
country, and portioned out the soil among them.
Their sway was not of long duration. In
the fifth century the Goths, who were then the
allies of Rome, undertook the reconquest of Iberia,
and succeeded, after a desperate struggle of three
years duration. They drove before them the
barbarous hordes, their predecessors,
intermarried
,
and incorporated themselves with the
original
inhabitants, and founded a powerful and
splendid empire, comprising the Iberian
peninsula
,
the ancient Narbonnaise, afterwards called
Gallia Gotica, or Gothic Gaul, and a part of the
African coast called Tingitania. A new nation
was, in a manner, produced by this mixture of
the Goths and Iberians. Sprang from a union
of warrior races, reared and nurtured amidst the
din of arms, the Gothic Spaniards, if they may
so be termed, were a warlike, unquiet, yet high
minded and heroic people. Their simple and
abstemious habits, their contempt for toil and
suffering, and their love of daring enterprise,
2
fitted them for a soldier's life. So addicted were
they to war that, when they had no external foes
to contend with, they fought with one another;
and, when engaged in battle, says an old
chronicler
,
the very thunders and lightnings of
heaven could not separate them.
[2]
[2]
Florian de Ocampo, lib. 3. c. 12. Justin Abrev. Trog.
Pomp. L44 Bleda. Cronica L2. c. 3.
For two centuries and a half the Gothic power
remained unshaken, and the sceptre was wielded
by twenty-five successive kings. The crown
was elective, in a council of palatines, composed
of the bishops and nobles, who, while they swore
allegiance to the newly made sovereign, bound
him by a reciprocal oath to be faithful to his
trust. Their choice was made from among the
people, subject only to one condition, that the
king should be of pure Gothic blood. But though
the crown was elective in principle, it gradually
became hereditary from usage, and the power of
the sovereign grew to be almost absolute. The
king was commander in chief of the armies; the
whole patronage of the kingdom was in his
hands; he summoned and dissolved the national
councils; he made and revoked laws according
to his pleasure; and, having ecclesiastical
supremacy
,
he exercised a sway even over the
consciences
of his subjects.
The Goths, at the time of their inroad, were
stout adherents to the Arian doctrines; but after
a time they embraced the Catholic faith, which
was maintained by the native Spaniards free
from many of the gross superstitions of the
church at Rome, and this unity of faith
contributed
more than any thing else to blend and
harmonize the two races into one. The bishops
and other clergy were exemplary in their lives,
and aided to promote the influence of the laws
and maintain the authority of the state. The
fruits of regular and secure government were
manifest in the advancement of agriculture,
commerce
and the peaceful arts; and in the increase
of wealth, of luxury, and refinement; but there
was a gradual decline of the simple, hardy, and
warlike habits that had distinguished the nation
in its semi barbarous days.
Such was the state of Spain when, in the year
of Redemption 701, Witiza was elected to the
Gothic throne. The beginning of his reign gave
promise of happy days to Spain. He redressed
grievances, moderated the tributes of his
subjects
,
and conducted himself with mingled
mildness
and energy in the administration of the
laws. In a little while, however, he threw off
the mask, and showed himself in his true nature,
cruel and luxurious.
Two of his relatives, sons of a preceding king,
awakened his jealousy for the security of his
throne. One of them, named Favila, duke of
Cantabria, he put to death, and would have
inflicted
the same fate upon his son Pelayo, but
that the youth was beyond his reach, being
preserved
by Providence for the future salvation of
Spain. The other object of his suspicion was
Theodofredo, who lived retired from court. The
violence of Witiza reached him even in his
retirement
.
His eyes were put out, and he was
immured within a castle at Cordova. Roderick,
the youthful son of Theodofredo, escaped to
Italy, where he received protection from the
Romans.
Witiza now considering himself secure upon
the throne, gave the reins to his licentious
passions
,
and soon, by his tyranny and sensuality,
acquired the appellation of Witiza the Wicked.
Despising the old Gothic continence, and
yielding
to the example of the sect of Mahomet,
which suited his lascivious temperament, he
indulged
in a plurality of wives and concubines,
encouraging his subjects to do the same. Nay,
he even sought to gain the sanction of the church
to his excesses, promulgating a law by which
the clergy were released from their vows of
celibacy
,
and permitted to marry and to entertain
paramours.
The sovereign Pontiff Constantine threatened
to depose and excommunicate him, unless he
abrogated this licentious law; but Witiza set him
at defiance, threatening, like his Gothic
predecessor
Alaric, to assail the eternal city with his
troops, and make spoil of her accumulated
treasures
.
[3]
[3]
Chron. de Luitprando 709. Abarca Anales de Aragon
(el Mahometismo, Fol. 5.)
We will adorn our damsels, said he,
with the jewels of Rome, and replenish our
coffers from the mint of St. Peter.
Some of the clergy opposed themselves to the
innovating spirit of the monarch, and
endeavoured
from the pulpits to rally the people to
the pure doctrines of their faith; but they were
deposed from their sacred office, and banished
as seditious mischief makers. The church of
Toledo continued refractory; the archbishop
Sindaredo, it is true, was disposed to
accommodate
himself to the corruptions of the times,
but the prebendaries battled intrepidly against
the new laws of the monarch, and stood
manfully
in defence of their vows of chastity. Since
the church of Toledo will not yield itself to our
will, said Witiza, it shall have two husbands.
So saying, he appointed his own brother Oppas,
at that time archbishop of Seville, to take a
seat with Sindaredo in the episcopal chair of
Toledo, and made him primate of Spain. He
2*
was a priest after his own heart, and seconded
him in all his profligate abuses.
It was in vain the denunciations of the church
were fulminated from the chair of St. Peter;
Witiza threw off all allegiance to the Roman
Pontiff, threatening with pain of death those who
should obey the papal mandates. We will
suffer no foreign ecclesiastic, with triple crown,
said he, to domineer over our dominions.
The Jews had been banished from the country
during the preceding reign, but Witiza permitted
them to return, and even bestowed upon their
synagogues privileges of which he had despoiled
the churches. The children of Israel, when
scattered throughout the earth by the fall of
Jerusalem
,
had carried with them into other lands
the gainful arcana of traffic, and were especially
noted as opulent money changers and curious
dealers in gold and silver and precious stones;
on this occasion, therefore, they were enabled, it
is said, to repay the monarch for his protection
by bags of money, and caskets of sparkling gems,
the rich product of their oriental commerce.
The kingdom at this time enjoyed external
peace, but there were symptoms of internal
discontent. Witiza took the alarm; he
remembered
the ancient turbulence of the nation, and
its proneness to internal feuds. Issuing secret
orders, therefore, in all directions, he dismantled
most of the cities, and demolished the castles
and fortresses that might serve as rallying
points for the factious. He disarmed the
people also, and converted the weapons of war
into the implements of peace. It seemed, in
fact, as if the millenium were dawning upon the
land, for the sword was beaten into a
ploughshare
,
and the spear into a pruning-hook.
While thus the ancient martial fire of the
nation
was extinguished, its morals likewise were
corrupted. The altars were abandoned, the
churches closed, wide disorder and sensuality
prevailed throughout the land, so that, according
to the old chroniclers, within the compass of a
few short years, Witiza the Wicked taught all
Spain to sin.
CHAPTER II.
The rise of Don Roderickhis Government
.
Woe
to the ruler who founds his hope of sway
on the weakness or corruption of the people.
The very measures taken by Witiza to
perpetuate
his power ensured his downfall. While
the whole nation, under his licentious rule, was
sinking into vice and effeminacy, and the arm of
war was unstrung, the youthful Roderick, son of
Theodofredo, was training up for action in the
stern but wholesome school of adversity. He
instructed himself in the use of arms; became
adroit and vigorous by varied exercises; learned
to despise all danger, and inured himself to
hunger
and watchfulness and the rigour of the seasons.
His merits and misfortunes procured him many
friends among the Romans; and when, being
arrived at a fitting age, he undertook to revenge
the wrongs of his father and his kindred, a host
of brave and hardy soldiers flocked to his
standard
.
With these he made his sudden appearance
in Spain. The friends of his house and the
disaffected
of all classes hastened to join him, and
he advanced rapidly and without opposition,
through an unarmed and enervated land.
Witiza saw too late the evil he had brought
upon himself. He made a hasty levy, and took
the field with a scantily equipped and
undisciplined
host, but was easily routed and made
prisoner
,
and the whole kingdom submitted to Don
Roderick.
The ancient city of Toledo, the royal residence
of the Gothic kings, was the scene of high
festivity
and solemn ceremonial on the coronation of
the victor. Whether he was elected to the throne
according to the Gothic usage, or seized it by the
right of conquest, is a matter of dispute among
historians, but all agree that the nation submitted
cheerfully to his sway, and looked forward to
prosperity and happiness under their newly
elevated
monarch. His appearance and character
seemed to justify the anticipation. He was in
the splendour of youth, and of a majestic
presence
.
His soul was bold and daring, and
elevated by lofty desires. He had a sagacity
that penetrated the thoughts of men, and a
magnificent
spirit that won all hearts. Such is the
picture
which ancient writers give of Don Roderick,
when, with all the stern and simple virtues
unimpaired
,
which he had acquired in adversity and
exile, and flushed with the triumph of a pious
revenge, he ascended the Gothic throne.
Prosperity, however, is the real touchstone of
the human heart; no sooner did Roderick find
himself in possession of the crown, than the love
of power, and the jealousy of rule were awakened
in his breast. His first measure was against
Witiza, who was brought in chains into his
presence
.
Roderick beheld the captive monarch
with an unpitying eye, remembering only his
wrongs and cruelties to his father. Let the
evils he has inflicted on others be visited upon
his own head, said he; As he did unto
Theodofredo
,
even so be it done unto him. So the
eyes of Witiza were put out, and he was thrown
into the same dungeon at Cordova in which
Theodofredo had languished. There he passed
the brief remnant of his days in perpetual
darkness
,
a prey to wretchedness and remorse.
Roderick now cast an uneasy and suspicious
eye upon Evan and Siseburto, the two sons of
Witiza. Fearful lest they should foment some
secret rebellion, he banished them the kingdom.
They took refuge in the Spanish dominions in
Africa, where they were received and harboured
by Requila, governor of Tangier, out of gratitude
for favours which he had received from their late
father. There they remained, to brood over
their fallen fortunes, and to aid in working out
the future woes of Spain.
Their uncle Oppas, bishop of Seville, who had
been made co-partner, by Witiza, in the
archepiscopal
chair at Toledo, would have likewise
fallen under the suspicion of the king; but he
was a man of consummate art, and vast exterior
sanctity, and won upon the good graces of the
monarch. He was suffered, therefore, to retain
his sacred office at Seville; but the see of
Toledo
was given in charge to the venerable Urbino;
and the law of Witiza was revoked that
dispensed
the clergy from their vows of celibacy.
The jealousy of Roderick for the security of
his crown was soon again aroused, and his
measures
were prompt and severe. Having been
informed that the governors of certain castles
and fortresses in Castile and Andalusia had
conspired
against him, he caused them to be put to
death and their strong holds to be demolished.
He now went on to imitate the pernicious policy
of his predecessor, throwing down walls and
towers, disarming the people, and thus
incapacitating
them from rebellion. A few cities were
permitted to retain their fortifications, but these
were intrusted to alcaydes in whom he had
especial confidence; the greater part of the
kingdom was left defenceless; the nobles, who
had been roused to temporary manhood during
the recent stir of war, sunk back into the
inglorious
state of inaction which had disgraced them
during the reign of Witiza, passing their time
in feasting and dancing to the sound of loose and
wanton minstrelsy.
[4]
[4]
Mariana. Hist. Esp. L6. c 21.
It was scarcely possible
to recognize in these idle wassailers and soft
voluptuaries the descendants of the stern and
frugal warriors of the frozen north; who had
braved flood and mountain, and heat and cold,
and had battled their way to empire across half
a world in arms.
They surrounded their youthful monarch, it is
true, with a blaze of military pomp. Nothing
could surpass the splendour of their arms, which
were embossed and enamelled, and enriched
with gold and jewels and curious devices;
nothing
could be more gallant and glorious than
their array; it was all plume and banner and
silken pageantry, the gorgeous trappings for tilt
and tourney and courtly revel; but the iron soul
of war was wanting.
How rare it is to learn wisdom from the
misfortunes
of others. With the fate of Witiza full
before his eyes, Don Roderick indulged in the
same pernicious errors, and was doomed, in like
manner, to prepare the way for his own
perdition
.
CHAPTER III.
Of the loves of Roderick and the Princess Elyata
.
As yet the heart of Roderick, occupied by the
struggles of his early life, by warlike enterprises
and by the inquietudes of newly gotten power,
had been insensible to the charms of women;
but in the present voluptuous calm, the amorous
propensities of his nature assumed their sway.
There are divers accounts of the youthful beauty
who first found favour in his eyes, and was
elevated
by him to the throne. We follow in our
legend the details of an Arabian Chronicler,
[5]
[5]
Perdida de Espaa por Abulcacim Tarif Abentarique,
lib. 1.
authenticated by a Spanish poet.
Lope de Vega.
Let those
who dispute our facts, produce better authority
for their contradiction.
Among the few fortified places that had not
been dismantled by Don Roderick, was the
ancient
city of Denia, situated on the
Mediterranean
coast, and defended on a rock built castle
that overlooked the sea.
3
The Alcayde of the castle, with many of the
people of Denia, was one day on his knees in
the chapel, imploring the Virgin to allay a
tempest
which was strewing the coast with wrecks,
when a centinel brought word that a Moorish
cruiser was standing for the land. The Alcayde
gave orders to ring the alarm bells, light signal
fires on the hill tops, and rouse the country, for
the coast was subject to cruel maraudings from
the Barbary cruisers.
In a little while the horsemen of the
neighbourhood
were seen pricking along the beach, armed
with such weapons as they could find, and the
Alcayde and his scanty garrison descended from
the hill. In the mean time the Moorish bark came
rolling and pitching towards the land. As it
drew near, the rich carving and gilding with
which it was decorated, its silken bandaroles
and banks of crimson oars, showed it to be no
warlike vessel, but a sumptuous galiot destined
for state and ceremony. It bore the marks of
the tempest; the masts were broken, the oars
shattered, and fragments of snowy sails and
silken awnings were fluttering in the blast.
As the galiot grounded upon the sand, the
impatient
rabble rushed into the surf to capture
and make spoil; but were awed into admiration
and respect by the appearance of the illustrious
company on board. There were Moors of both
sexes sumptuously arrayed, and adorned with
precious jewels, bearing the demeanour of persons
of lofty rank. Among them shone conspicuous
a youthful beauty, magnificently attired, to whom
all seemed to pay reverence.
Several of the Moors surrounded her with
drawn swords, threatening death to any that
approached; others sprang from the bark, and
throwing themselves on their knees before the
Alcayde, implored him, by his honour and
courtesy
as a knight, to protect a royal virgin from
injury and insult.
You behold before you, said they, the only
daughter of the king of Algiers, the betrothed
bride of the son of the king of Tunis. We were
conducting her to the court of her expecting
bridegroom, when a tempest drove us from our
course, and compelled us to take refuge on your
coast. Be not more cruel than the tempest, but
deal nobly with that which even sea and storm
have spared.
The Alcayde listened to their prayers. He
conducted the princess and her train to the
castle
,
where every honour due to her rank was
paid her. Some of her ancient attendants
interceded
for her liberation, promising countless
sums to be paid by her father for her
ransom
;
but the Alcayde turned a deaf ear to all
their golden offers. She is a royal captive,
said he, it belongs to my sovereign alone to
dispose of her. After she had reposed,
therefore
,
for some days at the castle, and recovered
from the fatigue and terror of the seas, he caused
her to be conducted, with all her train, in
magnificent
state to the court of Don Roderick.
The beautiful Elyata
[6]
[6]
By some she is called Zara.
entered Toledo more
like a triumphant sovereign than a captive. A
chosen band of christian horsemen, splendidly
armed, appeared to wait upon her as a mere
guard of honour. She was surrounded by the
Moorish damsels of her train, and followed by
her own moslem guards, all attired with the
magnificence that had been intended to grace
her arrival at the court of Tunis. The princess
was arrayed in bridal robes, woven in the most
costly looms of the orient; her diadem sparkled
with diamonds, and was decorated with the
rarest plumes of the bird of paradise, and even
the silken trappings of her palfry, which swept
the ground, were covered with pearls and
precious
stones. As this brilliant cavalcade crossed
the bridge of the Tagus, all Toledo poured
forth to behold it, and nothing was heard
throughout
the city but praises of the wonderful beauty
of the princess of Algiers. King Roderick came
forth, attended by the chivalry of his court, to
receive the royal captive. His recent
voluptuous
life had disposed him for tender and amorous
affections, and at the first sight of the beautiful
Elyata he was enraptured with her charms.
Seeing her face clouded with sorrow and
anxiety
,
he soothed her with gentle and courteous
words, and conducting her to a royal palace,
behold, said he, thy habitation, where no one
shall molest thee: consider thyself at home in
the mansion of thy father, and dispose of any
thing according to thy will.
Here the princess passed her time, with the
female attendants who had accompanied her
from Algiers; and no one but the king was
permitted
to visit her, who daily became more and
more enamoured of his lovely captive, and sought
by tender assiduity, to gain her affections. The
distress of the princess at her captivity was
soothed by this gentle treatment. She was of
an age when sorrow cannot long hold sway over
the heart. Accompanied by her youthful
attendants
,
she ranged the spacious apartments of
the palace, and sported among the groves and
alleys of its garden. Every day the
remembrance
of the paternal home grew less and less
painful, and the king became more and more
amiable in her eyes, and when, at length, he
offered to share his heart and throne with her,
3*
she listened with downcast looks and kindling
blushes, but with an air of resignation.
One obstacle remained to the complete
fruition
of the monarch's wishes, and this was the
religion
of the princess. Roderick forthwith
employed
the archbishop of Toledo to instruct the
beautiful Elyata in the mysteries of the christian
faith. The female intellect is quick in perceiving
the merits of new doctrines; the archbishop,
therefore, soon succeeded in converting, not
merely the princess, but most of her attendants,
and a day was appointed for their public
baptism
.
The ceremony was performed with great
pomp and solemnity, in the presence of all the
nobility and chivalry of the court. The princess
and her damsels, clad in white, walked on foot
to the cathedral, while numerous beautiful
children
,
arrayed as angels, strewed their path with
flowers; and the archbishop meeting them at the
portal, received them, as it were, into the bosom
of the church. The princess abandoned her
Moorish appellation of Elyata, and was baptised
by the name of Exilona, by which she was
thenceforth called, and has generally been known
in history.
The nuptials of Roderick and the beautiful
convert took place shortly afterwards, and were
celebrated with great magnificence. There were
jousts, and tourneys, and banquets, and other
rejoicings, which lasted twenty days and were
attended by the principal nobles from all parts
of Spain. After these were over, such of the
attendants of the princess as refused to embrace
christianity and desired to return to Africa, were
dismissed with munificent presents; and an
embassy
was sent to the king of Algiers, to inform
him of the nuptials of his daughter, and to proffer
him the friendship of King Roderick.
[7]
[7]
Como esta Infanta era muy hermosa, y el Rey [Don
Rodrigo
]
dispuesta y gentil hombre, entro por medio el amor y
aficion, y junto con el regalo con que la avia mandado
hospedar
y servir ful causa que el rey persuadio esta Infanta, que
si se tornava a su ley de christiano la tomaria por muger, y
que la haria seora de sus Reynos. Con esta persuasion ella
fue contenta, y aviendose vuelto christiana, se caso con ella,
y se celebraron sus bodas con muchas fiestas y regozijos, como
era razon.Abulcassim, conq'st de Espan, cap. 3.
CHAPTER IV.
Of Count Julian
.
For
a time Don Roderick lived happily with
his young and beautiful queen, and Toledo was
the seat of festivity and splendour. The
principal
nobles throughout the kingdom repaired to
his court to pay him homage, and to receive his
commands; and none were more devoted in
their reverence than those who were obnoxious
to suspicion from their connexion with the late
king.
Among the foremost of these was Count Julian,
a man destined to be infamously renowned in
the dark story of his country's woes. He was of
one of the proudest Gothic families, lord of
Consuegra
and Algeziras, and connected by
marriage
with Witiza and the Bishop Oppas; his
wife, the Countess Frandina, being their sister.
In consequence of this connexion, and of his own
merits, he had enjoyed the highest dignities and
commands, being one of the Espatorios, or royal
sword-bearers; an office of the greatest confi
dence about the person of the sovereign.
[8]
[8]
Condes Espatorios; so called from the drawn swords of
ample size and breadth, with which they kept guard in the
anti-chambers of the Gothic Kings. Comes Spathariorum,
custodum corporis Regis Profectus. Hune et
Propospatharium
appellatum existimo.Patr. Pant. de Offic. Goth.
He
had, moreover, been entrusted with the military
government of the Spanish possessions on the
African coast of the strait, which at that time
were threatened by the Arabs of the East, the
followers of Mahomet, who were advancing their
victorious standard to the extremity of Western
Africa. Count Julian established his seat of
government at Ceuta, the frontier bulwark and
one of the far-famed gates of the Mediterranean
Sea. Here he boldly faced, and held in check,
the torrent of moslem invasion.
Don Julian was a man of an active, but
irregular
genius, and a grasping ambition; he had a
love for power and grandeur, in which he was
joined by his haughty countess; and they could
ill brook the downfall of their house as threatened
by the fate of Witiza. They had hastened,
therefore
,
to pay their court to the newly elevated
monarch, and to assure him of their fidelity to
his interests.
Roderick was readily persuaded of the
sincerity
of Count Julian; he was aware of his merits
as a soldier and a governor and continued him
in his important command: honouring him with
many other marks of implicit confidence. Count
Julian sought to confirm this confidence by every
proof of devotion. It was a custom among the
Goths to rear many of the children of the most
illustrious families in the royal household. They
served as pages to the king, and handmaids and
ladies of honour to the queen, and were instructed
in all manner of accomplishments befitting their
gentle blood. When about to depart for Ceuta,
to resume his command, Don Julian brought his
daughter Florinda to present her to the
sovereigns
.
She was a beautiful virgin that had not
as yet attained to womanhood. I confide her to
your protection, said he to the king, to be unto
her as a father; and to have her trained in the
paths of virtue. I can leave with you no dearer
pledge of my loyalty.
King Roderick received the timid and
blushing
maiden into his paternal care; promising to
watch over her happiness with a parent's eye,
and that she should be enrolled among the most
cherished attendants of the queen. With this
assurance of the welfare of his child, Count Julian
departed, well pleased, for his government at
Ceuta.
CHAPTER V.
The Story of Florinda
.
The
beautiful daughter of Count Julian was
received with great favour by the Queen Exilona
and admitted among the noble damsels that
attended upon her person. Here she lived in
honour and apparent security, and surrounded by
innocent delights. To gratify his queen, Don
Roderick had built for her rural recreation a
palace without the walls of Toledo, on the banks
of the Tagus. It stood in the midst of a garden,
adorned after the luxurious style of the East.
The air was perfumed by fragrant shrubs and
flowers; the groves resounded with the song of
the nightingale, while the gush of fountains and
water-falls, and the distant murmur of the Tagus,
made it a delightful retreat during the sultry days
of summer. The charm of perfect privacy also
reigned throughout the place, for the garden
walls were high, and numerous guards kept
watch without to protect it from all intrusion.
In this delicious abode, more befitting an
oriental
voluptuary than a Gothic king, Don Roderick
was accustomed to while away much of that time
which should have been devoted to the toilsome
cares of government. The very security and
peace which he had produced throughout his
dominions by his precautions to abolish the means
and habitudes of war, had effected a disastrous
change in his character. The hardy and heroic
qualities which had conducted him to the throne,
were softened in the lap of indulgence.
Surrounded
by the pleasures of an idle and
effeminate
court, and beguiled by the example of his
degenerate nobles, he gave way to a fatal
sensuality
that had lain dormant in his nature during
the virtuous days of his adversity. The mere
love of female beauty had first enamoured him
of Exilona, and the same passion, fostered by
voluptuous idleness, now betrayed him into the
commission of an act fatal to himself and Spain.
The following is the story of his error as gathered
from an old chronicle and legend.
In a remote part of the palace was an
apartment
devoted to the queen. It was like an
eastern
harem, shut up from the foot of man, and
where the king himself but rarely entered. It
had its own courts, and gardens, and fountains,
where the queen was wont to recreate herself
with her damsels, as she had been accustomed
to do in the jealous privacy of her father's palace.
One sultry day, the king, instead of taking his
siesta, or mid-day slumber, repaired to this
apartment to seek the society of the queen. In
passing through a small oratory, he was drawn
by the sound of female voices to a casement
over-hung
with myrtles and jessamines. It looked
into an interior garden or court, set out with
orange trees, in the midst of which was a marble
fountain, surrounded by a grassy bank, enamelled
with flowers.
It was the high noontide of a summer day,
when, in sultry Spain, the landscape trembles to
the eye, and all nature seeks repose, except the
grasshopper, that pipes his lulling note to the
herdsman as he sleeps beneath the shade.
Around the fountain were several of the
damsels
of the queen, who, confident of the sacred
privacy of the place, were yielding in that cool
retreat to the indulgence prompted by the season
and the hour. Some lay asleep on the flowery
bank; others sat on the margin of the fountain,
talking and laughing, as they bathed their feet in
its limpid waters, and King Roderick beheld
delicate limbs shining through the wave, that
might rival the marble in whiteness.
Among the damsels was one who had come
from the Barbary coast with the queen. Her
complexion had the dark tinge of Mauritanea,
but it was clear and transparent, and the deep
rich rose blushed through the lovely brown.
4
Her eyes were black and full of fire, and flashed
from under long silken eyelashes.
A sportive contest arose among the maidens,
as to the comparative beauty of the Spanish and
Moorish forms; but the Mauritanian damsel
revealed
limbs of voluptuous symmetry that seemed
to defy all rivalry.
The Spanish beauties were on the point of
giving up the contest, when they bethought
themselves
of the young Florinda, the daughter of
Count Julian, who lay on the grassy bank,
abandoned
to a summer slumber. The soft glow of
youth and health mantled on her cheek; her
fringed eyelashes scarcely covered their
sleeping
orbs; her moist and ruby lips were lightly
parted, just revealing a gleam of her ivory teeth,
while her innocent bosom rose and fell beneath
her boddice, like the gentle swelling and sinking
of a tranquil sea. There was a breathing
tenderness
and beauty in the sleeping virgin, that
seemed to send forth sweetness like the flowers
around her.
Behold, cried her companions exultingly,
the champion of Spanish beauty!
In their playful eagerness they half disrobed
the innocent Florinda before she was aware.
She awoke in time, however, to escape from their
busy hands; but enough of her charms had been
revealed to convince the monarch that they were
not to be rivalled by the rarest beauties of
Mauritanea
.
From this day the heart of Roderick was
inflamed
with a fatal passion. He gazed on the
beautiful Florinda with fervid desire, and sought
to read in her looks whether there was levity or
wantonness in her bosom; but the eye of the
damsel ever sunk beneath his gaze, and remained
bent on the earth in virgin modesty.
It was in vain he called to mind the sacred
trust reposed in him by Count Julian, and the
promise he had given to watch over his daughter
with paternal care; his heart was vitiated by
sensual indulgence, and the consciousness of
power had rendered him selfish in his
gratifications
.
Being one evening in the garden where the
queen was diverting herself with her damsels,
and coming to the fountain where he had beheld
the innocent maidens at their sport, he could no
longer restrain the passion that raged within his
breast. Seating himself beside the fountain, he
called Florinda to him to draw forth a thorn
which had pierced his hand. The maiden knelt
at his feet, to examine his hand, and the touch of
her slender fingers thrilled through his veins.
As she knelt, too, her amber locks fell in rich
ringlets about her beautiful head, her innocent
bosom palpitated beneath the crimson boddice,
and her timid blushes increased the effulgence of
her charms.
Having examined the monarch's hand in vain,
she looked up in his face with artless perplexity.
Senior, said she, I can find no thorn, nor
any sign of wound.
Don Roderick grasped her hand and pressed
it to his heart. It is here, lovely Florinda!
said he, It is here! and thou alone canst pluck
it forth!
My lord! exclaimed the blushing and
astonished
maiden.
Florinda! said Don Roderick, dost thou
love me?
Senior, said she, my father taught me to
love and reverence you. He confided me to
your care as one who would be as a parent to
me, when he should be far distant, serving your
majesty with life and loyalty. May God incline
your majesty ever to protect me as a father.
So saying, the maiden dropped her eyes to the
ground, and continued kneeling: but her
countenance
had become deadly pale, and as she knelt
she trembled.
Florinda, said the king, either thou dost
not, or thou wilt not understand me. I would
have thee love me, not as a father, nor as a
monarch
,
but as one who adores thee. Why dost
thou start? No one shall know our loves; and,
moreover, the love of a monarch inflicts no
degradation
like the love of a common manriches
and honours attend upon it. I will advance thee
to rank and dignity, and place thee above the
proudest females of my court. Thy father, too,
shall be more exalted and endowed than any
noble in my realm.
The soft eye of Florinda kindled at these
words. Senior, said she, the line I spring
from can receive no dignity by means so vile;
and my father would rather die than purchase
rank and power by the dishonour of his child.
But I see, continued she, that your majesty
speaks in this manner only to try me. You may
have thought me light and simple, and unworthy
to attend upon the queen. I pray your majesty
to pardon me, that I have taken your pleasantry
in such serious part.
In this way the agitated maiden sought to
evade the addresses of the monarch, but still her
cheek was blanched, and her lip quivered as she
spake.
The king pressed her hand to his lips with
fervour
.
May ruin seize me, cried he, if I
speak to prove thee. My heart, my kingdom,
are at thy command. Only be mine, and thou
shalt rule absolute mistress of myself and my
domains.
The damsel rose from the earth where she
4*
had hitherto knelt, and her whole countenance
glowed with virtuous indignation. My lord,
said she, I am your subject, and in your power;
take my life if it be your pleasure, but nothing
shall tempt me to commit a crime which would
be treason to the queen, disgrace to my father,
agony to my mother, and perdition to myself.
With these words she left the garden, and the
king, for the moment, was too much awed by her
indignant virtue to oppose her departure.
We shall pass briefly over the succeeding
events of the story of Florinda, about which so
much has been said and sung by chronicler and
bard: for the sober page of history should be
carefully chastened from all scenes that might
inflame a wanton imagination; leaving them to
poems and romances, and such like highly
seasoned
works of fantasy and recreation.
Let it suffice to say, that Don Roderick
pursued
his suit to the beautiful Florinda, his passion
being more and more inflamed by the resistance
of the virtuous damsel. At length, forgetting
what was due to helpless beauty, to his own
honour as a knight, and his word as a sovereign,
he triumphed over her weakness by base and
unmanly violence.
There are not wanting those who affirm that
the hapless Florinda lent a yielding ear to the
solicitations of the monarch, and her name has
been treated with opprobrium in several of the
ancient chronicles and legendary ballads that
have transmitted, from generation to generation,
the story of the woes of Spain. In very truth,
however, she appears to have been a guiltless
victim, resisting, as far as helpless female could
resist, the arts and intrigues of a powerful
monarch
,
who had nought to check the indulgence of
his will, and bewailing her disgrace with a
poignancy
that shows how dearly she had prized her
honour.
In the first paroxysm of her grief she wrote a
letter to her father, blotted with her tears and
almost incoherent from her agitation. Would
to God, my father, said she, that the earth had
opened and swallowed me ere I had been
reduced
to write these lines. I blush to tell thee,
what it is not proper to conceal. Alas, my
father! thou hast entrusted thy lamb to the
guardianship
of the lion. Thy daughter has been
dishonoured
,
the royal cradle of the Goths polluted,
and our lineage insulted and disgraced. Hasten,
my father, to rescue your child from the power
of the spoiler, and to vindicate the honour of
your house.
When Florinda had written these lines, she
summoned a youthful esquire, who had been a
page in the service of her father. Saddle thy
steed, said she, and if thou dost aspire to
knightly honour, or hope for lady's grace; if
thou hast fealty for thy lord, or devotion to his
daughter, speed swiftly upon my errand. Rest
not, halt not, spare not the spur, but hie thee day
and night until thou reach the sea; take the first
bark, and haste with sail and oar to Ceuta, nor
pause until thou give this letter to the count my
father. The youth put the letter in his bosom.
Trust me, lady, said he, I will neither halt,
nor turn aside, nor cast a look behind, until I
reach Count Julian. He mounted his fleet
steed, sped his way across the bridge, and soon
left behind him the verdant valley of the Tagus.
CHAPTER VI.
Don Roderick receives an extraordinary embassy
.
The
heart of Don Roderick was not so
depraved
by sensuality, but that the wrong he had
been guilty of toward the innocent Florinda, and
the disgrace he had inflicted on her house,
weighed
heavy on his spirits, and a cloud began to
gather on his once clear and unwrinkled brow.
Heaven, at this time, say the old Spanish
chronicles, permitted a marvellous intimation of
the wrath with which it intended to visit the
monarch and his people, in punishment of their
sins; nor are we, say the same orthodox writers,
to startle and withhold our faith when we meet in
the page of discreet and sober history with these
signs and portents, which transcend the
probabilities
of ordinary life; for the revolutions of
empires and the downfall of mighty kings are
awful events, that shake the physical as well as
the moral world, and are often announced by
forerunning marvels and prodigious omens.
With such like cautious preliminaries do the
wary but credulous historiographers of yore usher
in a marvellous event of prophecy and
enchantment
,
linked in ancient story with the fortunes
of Don Roderick, but which modern doubters
would fain hold up as an apocryphal tradition of
Arabian origin.
Now, so it happened, according to the legend,
that about this time, as King Roderick was
seated
one day on his throne, surrounded by his
nobles, in the ancient city of Toledo, two men
of venerable appearance entered the hall of
audience. Their snowy beards descended to
their breasts, and their gray hairs were bound
with ivy. They were arrayed in white
garments
of foreign or antiquated fashion, which
swept the ground, and were cintured with
girdles
,
wrought with the signs of the zodiac, from
which were suspended enormous bunches of
keys of every variety of form. Having
approached
the throne and made obeisance: Know, O
king, said one of the old men, that in days of
yore, when Hercules of Lybia, surnamed the
strong, had set up his pillars at the ocean strait,
he erected a tower near to this ancient city of
Toledo. He built it of prodigious strength, and
finished it with magic art, shutting up within it a
fearful secret, never to be penetrated without
peril and disaster. To protect this terrible
mystery
he closed the entrance to the edifice with a
ponderous door of iron, secured by a great lock
of steel, and he left a command that every king
who should succeed him should add another lock
to the portal; denouncing woe and destruction
on him who should eventually unfold the secret
of the tower.
The guardianship of the portal was given to
our ancestors, and has continued in our family,
from generation to generation, since the days of
Hercules. Several kings, from time to time,
have caused the gate to be thrown open, and
have attempted to enter, but have paid dearly
for their temerity. Some have perished within
the threshold, others have been overwhelmed
with horror at tremendous sounds, which shook
the foundations of the earth, and have hastened
to reclose the door and secure it with its
thousand
locks. Thus, since the days of Hercules,
the inmost recesses of the pile have never been
penetrated by mortal man, and a profound
mystery
continues to prevail over this great
enchantment
.
This, O king, is all we have to relate;
and our errand is to entreat thee to repair to the
tower and affix thy lock to the portal, as has
been done by all thy predecessors. Having thus
said, the ancient men made a profound reverence
and departed from the presence chamber.
[9]
[9]
Perdida de Espaa por Abulcasim Tarif Abentarique l. 1,
c. 6. Cronica del Rey Don Rodrigo por el moro Rasis, l. 1,
c. 1. Bleda. cron. cap. vii.
Don Roderick remained for sometime lost in
thought after the departure of the men; he then
dismissed all his court excepting the venerable
Urbino, at that time archbishop of Toledo. The
long white beard of this prelate bespoke his
advanced age, and his overhanging eyebrows
showed him a man full of wary council.
Father, said the king, I have an earnest
desire to penetrate the mystery of this tower.
The worthy prelate shook his hoary head,
beware
my son, said he, there are secrets hidden
from man for his good. Your predecessors for
many generations have respected this mystery,
and have increased in might and empire. A
knowledge of it, therefore, is not material to the
welfare of your kingdom. Seek not then to
indulge a rash and unprofitable curiosity, which
is interdicted under such awful menaces.
Of what importance, cried the king, are
the menaces of Hercules, the Lybian? was he not
a pagan; and can his enchantments have ought
avail against a believer in our holy faith?
Doubtless
in this tower are locked up treasures of gold
and jewels, amassed in days of old, the spoils of
mighty kings, the riches of the pagan world. My
coffers are exhausted; I have need of supply;
and surely it would be an acceptable act in the
eyes of heaven, to draw forth this wealth which
lies buried under profane and necromantic spells,
and consecrate it to religious purposes.
The venerable archbishop still continued to
remonstrate, but Don Roderick heeded not his
council, for he was led on by his malignant star.
Father, said he, it is in vain you attempt to
dissuade me. My resolution is fixed.
Tomorrow
I will explore the hidden mystery, or rather
the hidden treasures of this tower.
5
CHAPTER VII.
Story of the Marvellous and Portentous Tower
.
The
morning sun shone brightly upon the
cliff-built
towers of Toledo, when King Roderick
issued out of the gate of the city at the head of a
numerous train of courtiers and cavaliers, and
crossed the bridge that bestrides the deep rocky
bed of the Tagus. The shining cavalcade wound
up the road that leads among the mountains, and
soon came in sight of the necromantic tower.
Of this renowned edifice marvels are related by
the ancient Arabian and Spanish chroniclers,
and I doubt much. adds the venerable Agapida,
whether many readers will not consider the
whole as a cunningly devised fable, sprung from
an oriental imagination; but it is not for me to
reject a fact which is recorded by all those
writers
who are the fathers of our national history;
a fact too, which is as well attested as most of
the remarkable events in the story of Don
Roderick
.
None but light and inconsiderate minds,
continues the good friar, do hastily reject the
marvellous. To the thinking mind the whole
world is enveloped in mystery, and every thing
is full of type and portent. To such a mind the
necromantic tower of Toledo will appear as one
of those wondrous monuments of the olden time;
one of those Egyptian and Chaldaic piles, storied
with hidden wisdom and mystic prophecy, which
have been devised in past ages, when man yet
enjoyed an intercourse with high and spiritual
natures, and when human foresight partook of
divination.
This singular tower was round and of great
height and grandeur, erected upon a lofty rock,
and surrounded by crags and precipices. The
foundation was supported by four brazen lions,
each taller than a cavalier on horseback. The
walls were built of small pieces of jasper and
various coloured marbles, not larger than a man's
hand; so subtilely joined, however, that, but for
their different hues they might be taken for one,
entire stone. They were arranged with
marvellous
cunning so as to represent battles and
warlike
deeds of times and heroes long since passed
away, and the whole surface was so admirably
polished that the stones were as lustrous as glass,
and reflected the rays of the sun with such
resplendent
brightness as to dazzle all beholders.
[10]
[10]
From the minute account of the good friar, drawn from
the ancient chronicles, it would appear that the walls of the
tower were pictured in mosaic work.
King Roderick and his courtiers arrived
wondering
and amazed at the foot of the rock. Here
there was a narrow arched way cut through the
living stone; the only entrance to the tower. It
was closed by a massive iron gate, covered with
rusty locks of divers workmanship and in the
fashion of different centuries, which had been
affixed by the predecessors of Don Roderick.
On either side of the portal stood the two ancient
guardians of the tower, laden with the keys
appertaining to the locks.
The king alighted, and approaching the portals,
ordered the guardians to unlock the gate. The
hoary headed men drew back with terror.
Alas! cried they, what is it your majesty
requires of us. Would you have the mischiefs
of this tower unbound, and let loose to shake the
earth to its foundations?
The venerable archbishop Urbino likewise
implored him not to disturb a mystery which had
been held sacred from generation to generation
within the memory of man, and which even
Csar himself, when sovereign of Spain, had not
ventured to invade. The youthful cavaliers,
however, were eager to pursue the adventure,
and encouraged him in his rash curiosity.
Come what come may, exclaimed Don
Roderick
,
I am resolved to penetrate the mystery
of this tower. So saying, he again
commanded
the guardians to unlock the portal. The
ancient men obeyed with fear and trembling,
but their hands shook with age, and when they
applied the keys the locks were so rusted by
time, or of such strange workmanship, that they
resisted their feeble efforts, whereupon the young
cavaliers pressed forward and lent their aid.
Still the locks were so numerous and difficult,
that with all their eagerness and strength a great
part of the day was exhausted before the whole
of them could be mastered.
When the last bolt had yielded to the key, the
guardians and the reverend archbishop again
entreated the king to pause and reflect.
Whatever
is within this tower, said they, is as yet
harmless and lies bound under a mighty spell:
venture not then to open a door which may let
forth a flood of evil upon the land. But the
anger of the king was roused, and he ordered
that the portal should be instantly thrown open.
In vain, however, did one after another exert his
strength, and equally in vain did the cavaliers
unite their forces, and apply their shoulders to
the gate; though there was neither bar nor bolt
remaining, it was perfectly immovable.
The patience of the king was now exhausted,
and he advanced to apply his hand; scarcely,
however, did he touch the iron gate, when it
swung slowly open, uttering, as it were, a dismal
groan, as it turned reluctantly upon its hinges.
5*
A cold, damp wind issued forth, accompanied by
a tempestuous sound. The hearts of the ancient
guardians quaked within them, and their knees
smote together; but several of the youthful
cavaliers
rushed in, eager to gratify their curiosity,
or to signalize themselves in this redoubtable
enterprize. They had scarcely advanced a few
paces, however, when they recoiled, overcome
by the baleful air, or by some fearful vision.
[11]
[11]
Bleda. cronica. cap. 7.
Upon this, the king ordered that fires should be
kindled to dispel the darkness, and to correct
the noxious and long imprisoned air; he then led
the way into the interior; but, though stout of
heart, he advanced with awe and hesitation.
After proceeding a short distance, he entered
a hall, or anti-chamber, on the opposite side of
which was a door, and before it, on a pedestal,
stood a gigantic figure, of the colour of bronze,
and of a terrible aspect. It held a huge mace,
which it whirled incessantly, giving such cruel
and resounding blows upon the earth as to
prevent
all further entrance.
The king paused at sight of this appalling
figure, for whether it were a living being, or a
statue of magic artifice, he could not tell. On
its breast was a scroll, whereon was inscribed
in large letters, I do my duty.
Idem.
After a little
while Roderick plucked up heart, and addressed
it with great solemnity: Whatever thou be,
said he, know that I come not to violate this
sanctuary, but to inquire into the mystery it
contains
;
I conjure thee, therefore, to let me pass in
safety.
Upon this the figure paused with uplifted mace,
and the king and his train passed unmolested
through the door.
They now entered a vast chamber, of a rare
and sumptuous architecture, difficult to be
described
.
The walls were incrusted with the
most precious gems, so joined together as to form
one smooth and perfect surface. The lofty
dome appeared to be self-supported, and was
studded with gems, lustrous as the stars of the
firmament. There was neither wood, nor any
other common or base material to be seen
throughout the edifice. There were no windows
or other openings to admit the day, yet a radiant
light was spread throughout the place, which
seemed to shine from the walls, and to render
every object distinctly visible.
In the centre of this hall stood a table of
alabaster
of the rarest workmanship, on which was
inscribed in Greek characters, that Hercules
Alcides, the Theban Greek, had founded this
tower in the year of the world three thousand
and six. Upon the table stood a golden casket,
richly set round with precious stones, and closed
with a lock of mother of pearl, and on the lid
were inscribed the following words:
In this coffer is contained the mystery of the
tower. The hand of none but a king can open
it; but let him beware! for marvellous events
will be revealed to him, which are to take place
before his death.
King Roderick boldly seized upon the casket.
The venerable archbishop laid his hand upon his
arm, and made a last remonstrance. Forbear,
my son! said he, desist while there is yet time.
Look not into the mysterious decrees of
Providence
.
God has hidden them in mercy from
our sight, and it is impious to rend the veil by
which they are concealed.
What have I to dread from a knowledge of
the future? replied Roderick, with an air of
haughty presumption. If good be destined me,
I shall enjoy it by anticipation: if evil, I shall
arm myself to meet it. So saying he rashly
broke the lock.
Within the coffer he found nothing but a linen
cloth, folded between two tablets of copper. On
unfolding it he beheld painted on it figures of
men on horseback, of fierce demeanour, clad in
turbans and robes of various colours, after the
fashion of the Arabs, with scimitars hanging
from their necks and cross bows at their saddle
backs, and they carried banners and pennons
with divers devices. Above them was inscribed
in Greek characters, Rash monarch! behold the
men who are to hurl thee from thy throne, and
subdue thy kingdom!
At sight of these things the king was troubled
in spirit, and dismay fell upon his attendants.
While they were yet regarding the paintings, it
seemed as if the figures began to move, and a
faint sound of warlike tumult arose from the
cloth, with the clash of cymbal and bray of
trumpet, the neigh of steed and shout of army;
but all was heard indistinctly, as if afar off, or in
a reverie or dream. The more they gazed, the
plainer became the motion, and the louder the
noise; and the linen cloth rolled forth, and
amplified
,
and spread out, as it were, a mighty
banner
,
and filled the hall, and mingled with the air,
until its texture was no longer visible, or
appeared
as a transparent cloud. And the shadowy
figures became all in motion, and the din and
uproar became fiercer and fiercer; and whether
the whole were an animated picture, or a vision,
or an array of embodied spirits, conjured up by
supernatural power, no one present could tell.
They beheld before them a great field of battle,
where christians and moslems were engaged in
deadly conflict. They heard the rush and tramp
of steeds, the blast of trump and clarion, the
clash of cymbal, and the stormy din of a
thousand
drums. There was the clash of swords,
and maces, and battle axes, with the whistling of
arrows and the hurtling of darts and lances. The
christians quailed before the foe; the infidels
pressed upon them and put them to utter rout;
the standard of the cross was cast down, the
banner of Spain was trodden under foot, the air
resounded with shouts of triumph, with yells of
fury, and with the groans of dying men. Amidst
the flying squadrons King Roderick beheld a
crowned warrior, whose back was towards him,
but whose armour and device were his own, and
who was mounted on a white steed that
resembled
his own war horse Orelia. In the
confusion
of the flight, the warrior was dismounted
and was no longer to be seen, and Orelia
galloped
wildly through the field of battle without
a rider.
Roderick staid to see no more, but rushed
from the fatal hall, followed by his terrified
attendants
.
They fled through the outer chamber,
where the gigantic figure with the whirling mace
had disappeared from his pedestal, and on
issuing
into the open air, they found the two ancient
guardians of the tower lying dead at the portal,
as though they had been crushed by some mighty
blow. All nature, which had been clear and
serene, was now in wild uproar. The heavens
were darkened by heavy clouds; loud bursts of
thunder rent the air, and the earth was deluged
with rain and rattling hail.
The king ordered that the iron portal should
be closed, but the door was immovable, and the
cavaliers were dismayed by the tremendous
turmoil and the mingled shouts and groans that
continued to prevail within. The king and his
train hastened back to Toledo, pursued and
pelted
by the tempest. The mountains shook and
echoed with the thunder, trees were uprooted
and blown down, and the Tagus raged and
roared
and flowed above its banks. It seemed to the
affrighted courtiers as if the phantom legions of
the tower had issued forth and mingled with the
storm, for amidst the claps of thunder and the
howling of the wind, they fancied they heard
the sound of the drums and trumpets, the shouts
of armies and the rush of steeds. Thus beaten
by tempest and overwhelmed with horror, the
king and his courtiers arrived at Toledo,
clattering
across the bridge of the Tagus, and entering
the gate in headlong confusion as though they
had been pursued by an enemy.
In the morning the heavens were again serene,
and all nature was restored to tranquility. The
king, therefore, issued forth with his cavaliers
and took the road to the tower, followed by a
great multitude, for he was anxious once more
to close the iron door, and shut up those evils
that threatened to overwhelm the land. But
lo! on coming in sight of the tower, a new
wonder
met their eyes. An eagle appeared high in
the air, seeming to descend from heaven. He
bore in his beak a burning brand, and lighting
on the summit of the tower, fanned the fire with
his wings. In a little while the edifice burst
forth into a blaze as though it had been built of
rosin, and the flames mounted into the air with a
brilliancy more dazzling than the sun; nor did
they cease until every stone was consumed and
the whole was reduced to a heap of ashes. Then
there came a vast flight of birds, small of size
and sable of hue, darkening the sky like a cloud;
and they descended and wheeled in circles
round the ashes, causing so great a wind with
their wings that the whole was borne up into the
air, and scattered throughout all Spain, and
wherever a particle of that ashes fell it was as a
stain of blood. It is furthermore recorded by
ancient men and writers of former days, that all
those on whom this dust fell were afterwards
slain in battle, when the country was conquered
by the Arabs, and that the destruction of this
necromantic tower was a sign and token of the
approaching perdition of Spain.
Let all those, concludes the cautious friar,
who question the verity of this most marvellous
occurrence, consult those admirable sources of
our history, the chronicle of the Moor, Rasis, and
the work entitled, the Fall of Spain, written by
the Moor, Abulcasim Tarif Abentarique. Let
them consult, moreover, the venerable historian
Bleda, and the cloud of other Catholic Spanish
writers, who have treated of this event, and they
will find I have related nothing that has not
been printed and published under the inspection
and sanction of our holy mother church. God
alone knoweth the truth of these things; I speak
nothing but what has been handed down to me
from times of old.
6
CHAPTER VIII.
Count Julianhis fortunes in Africa.He hears
of the dishonour of his childhis conduct
thereupon
.
The
course of our legendary narration now
returns
to notice the fortunes of Count Julian,
after his departure from Toledo, to resume his
government on the coast of Barbary. He left
the Countess Frandina at Algeziras, his paternal
domain, for the province under his command was
threatened with invasion. In fact, when he
arrived
at Ceuta he found his post in imminent
danger
from the all-conquering moslems. The
Arabs of the east, the followers of Mahomet,
having subjugated several of the most potent
oriental kingdoms, had established their seat of
empire at Damascus, where, at this time, it was
filled by Waled Almanzor, surnamed The Sword
of God. From thence the tide of moslem
conquest
had rolled on to the shores of the Atlantic,
so that all Almagreb, or Western Africa, had
submitted to the standard of the prophet, with
the exception of a portion of Tingitania, lying
along the straits; being the province held by
the Goths of Spain, and commanded by Count
Julian. The Arab invaders were a hundred
thousand strong, most of them veteran troops,
seasoned in warfare and accustomed to victory.
They were led by an old Arab General, Muza
ben Nosier, to whom was confided the
government
of Almagreb; most of which he had himself
conquered. The ambition of this veteran was
to make the moslem conquest complete, by
expelling
the christians from the African shores;
with this view his troops menaced the few
remaining
Gothic fortresses of Tingitania, while he
himself set down in person before the walls of
Ceuta. The Arab chieftain had been rendered
confident by continual success, and thought
nothing
could resist his arms and the sacred standard
of the prophet. Impatient of the tedious delays
of a siege, he led his troops boldly against the
rock-built towers of Ceuta, and attempted to take
the place by storm. The onset was fierce, and
the struggle desperate; the swarthy sons of the
desert were light and vigorous, and of fiery spirit,
but the Goths, enured to danger on this frontier,
retained the stubborn valour of their race, so
impaired among their brethren in Spain. They
were commanded, too, by one skilled in warfare
and ambitious of renown. After a vehement
conflict the moslem assailants were repulsed
from all points, and driven from the walls. Don
Julian sallied forth and harrassed them in their
retreat, and so severe was the carnage that the
veteran Muza was fain to break up his camp and
retire confounded from the siege.
The victory at Ceuta resounded throughout
Tingitania, and spread universal joy. On every
side were heard shouts of exultation mingled with
praises of Count Julian. He was hailed by the
people, wherever he went, as their deliverer, and
blessings were invoked upon his head. The
heart of Count Julian was lifted up, and his spirit
swelled within him; but it was with noble and
virtuous pride, for he was conscious of having
merited the blessings of his country.
In the midst of his exultation, and while the
rejoicings of the people were yet sounding in his
ears, the page arrived who bore the letter from
his unfortunate daughter.
What tidings from the king? said the count,
as the page knelt before him: None my lord,
replied the youth, but I bear a letter sent in all
haste by the Lady Florinda.
He took the letter from his bosom and
presented
it to his lord. As Count Julian read it
his countenance darkened and fell. This,
said he, bitterly, is my reward for serving a
tyrant; and these are the honours heaped on me
by my country while fighting its battles in a
foreign land. May evil overtake me, and infamy
rest upon my name, if I cease until I have full
measure of revenge.
Count Julian was vehement in his passions,
and took no council in his wrath. His spirit
was haughty in the extreme, but destitute of true
magnanimity, and when once wounded turned
to gall and venom. A dark and malignant
hatred entered into his soul, not only against
Don Roderick, but against all Spain: he looked
upon it as the scene of his disgrace, a land in
which his family was dishonoured, and, in
seeking
to avenge the wrongs he had suffered from
his sovereign, he meditated against his native
country one of the blackest schemes of treason
that ever entered into the human heart.
The plan of Count Julian was to hurl King
Roderick from his throne, and to deliver all
Spain into the hands of the infidels. In
concerting
and executing this treacherous plot, it
seemed
as if his whole nature was changed; every
lofty and generous sentiment was stifled, and he
stooped to the meanest dissimulation. His first
object was, to extricate his family from the power
of the king, and to remove it from Spain before
his treason should be known; his next, to deprive
the country of its remaining means of defence
against an invader.
With these dark purposes at heart, but with
6*
an open and serene countenance, he crossed to
Spain and repaired to the court at Toledo.
Wherever he came he was hailed with
acclamation
,
as a victorious general, and appeared in
the presence of his sovereign radiant with the
victory at Ceuta. Concealing from King
Roderick
his knowledge of the outrage upon his
house, he professed nothing but the most devoted
loyalty and affection.
The king loaded him with favours; seeking
to appease his own conscience by heaping
honours
upon the father in atonement of the
deadly
wrong inflicted upon his child. He regarded
Count Julian, also, as a man able and
experienced
in warfare, and took his advice in all
matters relating to the military affairs of the
kingdom. The count magnified the dangers
that threatened the frontier under his command,
and prevailed upon the king to send thither the
best horses and arms remaining from the time
of Witiza, there being no need of them in the
centre of Spain, in its present tranquil state.
The residue, at his suggestion, was stationed on
the frontiers of Gallia; so that the kingdom was
left almost wholly without defence against any
sudden irruption from the south.
Having thus artfully arranged his plans, and
all things being prepared for his return to
Africa
,
he obtained permission to withdraw his
daughter from the court, and leave her with her
mother, the Countess Frandina, who, he
pretended
,
lay dangerously ill at Algeziras. Count
Julian issued out of the gate of the city,
followed
by a shining band of chosen followers, while
beside him, on a palfrey, rode the pale and
weeping Florinda. The populace hailed and
blessed him as he passed, but his heart turned
from them with loathing. As he crossed the
bridge of the Tagus he looked back with a dark
brow upon Toledo, and raised his mailed hand
and shook it at the royal palace of King
Roderick
,
which crested the rocky height. A
father's
curse, said he, be upon thee and thine!
may desolation fall upon thy dwelling, and
confusion
and defeat upon thy realm!
In his journeyings through the country, he
looked round him with a malignant eye; the
pipe of the shepherd, and the song of the
husbandman
,
were as discord to his soul; every
sight and sound of human happiness sickened
him at heart, and, in the bitterness of his spirit,
he prayed that he might see the whole scene of
prosperity laid waste with fire and sword by the
invader.
The story of domestic outrage and disgrace
had already been made known to the Countess
Frandina. When the hapless Florinda came in
presence of her mother, she fell on her neck,
and hid her face in her bosom, and wept; but
the countess shed never a tear, for she was a
woman haughty of spirit and strong of heart.
She looked her husband sternly in the face.
Perdition light upon thy head, said she, if
thou submit to this dishonour. For my own
part, woman as I am, I will assemble the
followers
of my house, nor rest until rivers of
blood have washed away this stain.
Be satisfied, replied the count, vengeance
is on foot, and will be sure and ample.
Being now in his own domains, surrounded
by his relatives and friends, Count Julian went
on to complete his web of treason. In this he
was aided by his brother-in-law, Oppas, the
bishop of Seville: a man dark and perfidious
as the night, but devout in demeanour, and
smooth and plausible in council. This artful
prelate had contrived to work himself into the
entire confidence of the king, and had even
prevailed upon him to permit his nephews, Evan
and Siseburto, the exiled sons of Witiza, to
return
into Spain. They resided in Andalusia,
and were now looked to as fit instruments in
the present traitorous conspiracy.
By the advice of the bishop, Count Julian
called a secret meeting of his relatives and
adherents
on a wild rocky mountain, not far from
Consuegra, and which still bears the Moorish
appellation of La Sierra de Calderin, or the
mountain of treason.
[12]
[12]
Bleda. Cap. 5.
When all were
assembled
,
Count Julian appeared among them,
accompanied
by the bishop and by the Countess
Frandina. Then gathering around him those
who were of his blood and kindred, he revealed
the outrage that had been offered to their house.
He represented to them that Roderick was their
legitimate enemy; that he had dethroned Witiza,
their relation, and had now stained the honour
of one of the most illustrious daughters of their
line, The Countess Frandina seconded his
words. She was a woman majestic in person
and eloquent of tongue, and being inspired by
a mother's feelings, her speech aroused the
assembled
cavaliers to fury.
The count took advantage of the excitement
of the moment to unfold his plan. The main
object was to dethrone Don Roderick, and give
the crown to the sons of the late King Witiza.
By this means they would visit the sins of the
tyrant upon his head, and, at the same time,
restore the regal honours to their line. For this
purpose their own force would be sufficient, but
they might procure the aid of Muza ben Nosier,
the Arabian general, in Mauritania, who would
no doubt gladly send a part of his troops into
Spain to assist in the enterprise.
The plot thus suggested by Count Julian
received
the unholy sanction of Bishop Oppas,
who engaged to aid it secretly with all his
influence
and means: for he had great wealth and
possessions, and many retainers. The example
of the reverend prelate determined all who
might otherwise have wavered, and they bound
themselves by dreadful oaths to be true to the
conspiracy. Count Julian undertook to proceed
to Africa, and seek the camp of Muza, to
negotiate
for his aid, while the bishop was to keep
about the person of King Roderick, and lead
him into the net prepared for him.
All things being thus arranged, Count Julian
gathered together his treasure, and taking his
wife and daughter and all his household,
abandoned
the country he meant to betray;
embarking
at Malaga for Ceuta. The gate in the wall
of that city, through which they went forth,
continued for ages to bear the name of
Puerta
de la Cava
, or the gate of the harlot; for such
was the opprobrious and unmerited appellation
bestowed by the Moors on the unhappy
Florinda
.
[13]
[13]
Bleda. Cap. 4.
CHAPTER IX.
Secret visit of Count Julian to the Arab Camp.
First Expedition of Taric el Tuerto
.
When
Count Julian had placed his family in
security in Ceuta, surrounded by soldiery
devoted
to his fortunes, he took with him a few
confidential followers, and departed in secret
for the camp of the Arabian Emir, Muza ben
Nosier. The camp was spread out in one of
those pastoral valleys which lie at the feet of the
Barbary hills, with the great range of the Atlas
mountains towering in the distance. In the
motley army here assembled were warriors of
every tribe and nation, that had been united by
pact or conquest in the cause of Islam. There
were those who had followed Muza from the
fertile regions of Egypt, across the deserts of
Barca, and those who had joined his standard
from among the sun-burnt tribes of Mauritanea.
There were Saracen and Tartar, Syrian and Copt,
and swarthy Moor; sumptuous warriors from the
civilized cities of the east, and the gaunt and
predatory rovers of the desert. The greater
part of the army, however, was composed of
Arabs; but differing greatly from the first rude
hordes that enlisted under the banner of
Mahomet
.
Almost a century of continual wars with
the cultivated nations of the east had rendered
them accomplished warriors; and the occasional
sojourn in luxurious countries and populous cities,
had acquainted them with the arts and habits of
civilized life. Still the roving, restless, and
predatory
habits of the genuine son of Ishmael
prevailed
,
in defiance of every change of clime or
situation.
Count Julian found the Arab conqueror
Muza
surrounded by somewhat of oriental state and
splendour. He was advanced in life, but of a
noble presence, and concealed his age by tinging
his hair and beard with henna. The count
assumed
an air of soldier-like frankness and
decision
when he came into his presence.
Hitherto
,
said he, we have been enemies, but I come
to thee in peace, and it rests with thee to make
me the most devoted of thy friends. I have no
longer country or king. Roderick the Goth is an
usurper, and my deadly foe; he has wounded
my honour in the tenderest point, and my
country
affords me no redress. Aid me in my
vengeance
,
and I will deliver all Spain into thy
hands: a land far exceeding in fertility and
wealth all the vaunted regions thou hast
conquered
in Tingitania.
The heart of Muza leaped with joy at these
words, for he was a bold and ambitious
conqueror
,
and, having overrun all western Africa,
had often cast a wistful eye to the mountains of
Spain, as he beheld them brightening beyond
the waters of the strait. Still he possessed the
caution of a veteran, and feared to engage in an
enterprize of such moment, and to carry his
arms into another division of the globe, without
the approbation of his sovereign. Having drawn
from Count Julian the particulars of his plan,
and of the means he possessed to carry it into
effect, he laid them before his confidential
counsellors
and officers, and demanded their opinion.
These words of Count Julian, said he, may
be false and deceitful; or he may not possess
the power to fulfil his promises. The whole
may be a pretended treason to draw us on to
our destruction. It is more natural that he
should be treacherous to us than to his country.
Among the generals of Muza, was a gaunt
swarthy veteran, scarred with wounds; a very
Arab, whose great delight was roving and
desperate
enterprise, and who cared for nothing
beyond his steed, his lance, and scimitar. He
was a native of Damascus; his name was Taric
ben Zeyad, but, from having lost an eye, he was
known among the Spaniards by the appellation
of Taric el Tuerto, or Taric, the one-eyed.
7
The hot blood of this veteran Ishmaelite was
in a ferment when he heard of a new country to
invade, and vast regions to subdue, and he
dreaded
lest the cautious hesitation of Muza should
permit the glorious prize to escape them. You
speak doubtingly, said he, of the words of this
christian cavalier, but their truth is easily to be
ascertained. Give me four galleys and a
handful
of men, and I will depart with this Count
Julian
,
skirt the christian coast, and bring thee
back tidings of the land, and of his means to put
it in our power.
The words of the veteran pleased Muza ben
Nosier, and he gave his consent; and Taric
departed
with four galleys and five hundred men,
guided by the traitor Julian.
[14]
[14]
Beuter, Cron. Gen. de Espaa, L. 1. c. 28. Marmol.
Descrip
.
de Africa, L. 2. c. 10.
This first
expedition
of the Arabs against Spain took place,
according
to certain historians, in the year of our
Lord seven hundred and twelve; though others
differ on this point, as indeed they do upon
almost
every point in this early period of Spanish
history. The date to which the judicious
chroniclers
incline, is that of seven hundred and ten,
in the month of July. It would appear from
some authorities, also, that the galleys of Taric
cruised along the coasts of Andalusia and
Lusitania
,
under the feigned character of merchant
barks, nor is this at all improbable, while they
were seeking merely to observe the land, and
get a knowledge of the harbours. Wherever
they touched, Count Julian despatched
emissaries
to assemble his friends and adherents at an
appointed place. They gathered together
secretly
at Gezira Alhadra, that is to say, the Green
Island, where they held a conference with Count
Julian in presence of Taric ben Zeyad.
[15]
[15]
Bleda. Cron. c. 5.
Here
they again avowed their readiness to flock to his
standard whenever it should be openly raised,
and made known their various preparations for
a rebellion. Taric was convinced, by all that
he had seen and heard, that Count Julian
had not deceived them, either as to his
disposition
or his means to betray his country.
Indulging
his Arab inclinations, he made an inroad
into the land, collected great spoil and many
captives, and bore off his plunder in triumph to
Muza, as a specimen of the riches to be gained
by the conquest of the christian land.
Conde. Hist. Dom Arab. part 1. c.
8.
CHAPTER X.
Letter of Muza to the Caliph.Second
expedition
of Taric el Tuerto
.
On
hearing the tidings brought by Taric el
Tuerto, and beholding the spoil he had
collected
,
Muza wrote a letter to the Caliph Waled
Almanzor, setting forth the traitorous proffer of
Count Julian, and the probability, through his
means, of making a successful invasion of Spain.
A new land, said he, spreads itself out
before
our delighted eyes, and invites our conquest.
A land, too, that equals Syria in the fertility of
its soil, and the serenity of its sky; Yemen, or
Arabia the happy, in its delightful temperature;
India in its flowers and spices; Hegiaz in its
fruits and flowers; Cathay in its precious
minerals
,
and Aden in the excellence of its ports and
harbours. It is populous also, and wealthy;
having many splendid cities and majestic
monuments
of ancient art. What is to prevent this
glorious land from becoming the inheritance of
the faithful? Already we have overcome the
tribes of Berbery, of Zab, of Derar, of Zaara,
Mazamuda and Sus, and the victorious standard
of Islam floats on the towers of Tangier. But
four leagues of sea separate us from the
opposite
coast. One word from my sovereign, and
the conquerors of Africa will pour their legions
into Andalusia, rescue it from the domination of
the unbeliever, and subdue it to the law of the
Koran.
[16]
[16]
Conde, part 1. c. 8.
The caliph was overjoyed with the contents
of the letter. God is great! exclaimed he,
and Mahomet is his prophet! It has been
foretold by the ambassador of God that his law
should extend to the ultimate parts of the west,
and be carried by the sword into new and
unknown
regions. Behold another land is opened
for the triumphs of the faithful. It is the will
of Allah, and be his sovereign will obeyed.
So the caliph sent missives to Muza, authorizing
him to undertake the conquest.
Upon this there was a great stir of
preparation
,
and numerous vessels were assembled and
equipped at Tangier to convey the invading
army across the straits. Twelve thousand men
were chosen for this expedition: most of them
light Arabian troops, seasoned in warfare, and
fitted for hardy and rapid enterprise. Among
them were many horsemen, mounted on fleet
Arabian steeds. The whole was put under the
7*
command of the veteran, Taric el Tuerto, or
the one-eyed, in whom Muza reposed implicit
confidence as in a second self. Taric accepted
the command with joy; his martial fire was
roused at the idea of having such an army
under
his sole command, and such a country to
overrun, and he secretly determined never to
return unless victorious.
He chose a dark night to convey his troops
across the straits of Hercules, and by break of
day they began to disembark at Tarifa before
the country had time to take the alarm. A few
christians hastily assembled from the
neighbourhood
and opposed their landing, but were easily
put to flight. Taric stood on the sea-side, and
watched until the last squadron had landed, and
all the horses, armour, and munitions of war,
were brought on shore; he then gave orders to
set fire to the ships. The moslems were struck
with terror when they beheld their fleet
wrapped
in flames and smoke, and sinking beneath
the waves. How shall we escape, exclaimed
they, if the fortune of war should be against
us? There is no escape for the coward!
cried Taric, the brave man thinks of none;
your only chance is victory. But how
without
ships shall we ever return to our homes?
Your home, replied Taric, is before you;
but you must win it with your swords.
While Taric was yet talking with his
followers
,
says one of the ancient chroniclers, a
christian
female was descried waving a white
pennon
on a reed, in signal of peace. On being
brought into the presence of Taric, she
prostrated
herself before him. Senior, said she,
I am an ancient woman; and it is now full
sixty
years past and gone since, as I was keeping
vigils one winter's night by the fireside, I heard
my father, who was an exceeding old man, read
a prophecy said to have been written by a holy
friar; and this was the purport of the prophecy,
that a time would arrive when our country
would be invaded and conquered by a people
from Africa of a strange garb, a strange tongue,
and a strange religion. They were to be led
by a strong and valiant captain, who would be
known by these signs: on his right shoulder he
would have a hairy mole, and his right arm
would be much longer than the left, and of such
length as to enable him to cover his knee with
his hand without bending his body.
Taric listened to the old beldame with grave
attention, and when she had concluded, he laid
bare his shoulder, and lo! there was the mole
as it had been described; his right arm, also, was
in verity found to exceed the other in length,
though not to the degree that had been
mentioned
.
Upon this the Arab host shouted for
joy, and felt assured of conquest.
The discreet Antonio Agapida, though he
records
this circumstance as it is set down in
ancient
chronicle, yet withholds his belief from
the pretended prophecy, considering the whole
a cunning device of Taric to increase the
courage
of his troops. Doubtless, says he, there
was a collusion between this ancient sybil and
the crafty son of Ishmael; for these infidel
leaders
were full of damnable inventions to work
upon the superstitious fancies of their followers,
and to inspire them with a blind confidence in
the success of their arms.
Be this as it may, the veteran Taric took
advantage
of the excitement of his soldiery, and
led them forward to gain possession of a strong
hold, which was, in a manner, the key to all the
adjacent country. This was a lofty mountain
or promontory almost surrounded by the sea,
and connected with the main land by a narrow
isthmus. It was called the rock of Calpe, and,
like the opposite rock of Ceuta, commanded
the entrance to the Mediterranean Sea. Here
in old times, Hercules had set up one of his
pillars
,
and the city of Heraclea had been built.
As Taric advanced against this promontory,
he was opposed by a hasty levy of the
christians
,
who had assembled under the banner of a
Gothic noble of great power and importance,
whose domains lay along the mountainous coast
of the Mediterranean. The name of this
christian cavalier was Theodomir, but he has
universally been called Tadmir by the Arabian
historians, and is renowned as being the first
commander that made any stand against the
inroad of the moslems. He was about forty
years of age; hardy, prompt, and sagacious;
and had all the Gothic nobles been equally
vigilant
and shrewd in their defence, the banner of
Islam would never have triumphed over the
land.
Theodomir had but seventeen hundred men
under his command, and these but rudely
armed
;
yet he made a resolute stand against the
army of Taric, and defended the pass to the
promontory with great valour. He was, at
length, obliged to retreat, and Taric advanced
and planted his standard on the rock of Calpe,
and fortified it as his strong hold, and as the
means of securing an entrance into the land.
To commemorate his first victory, he changed
the name of the promontory, and called it
Gibel
Taric, or the mountain of Taric, but in
process
of time the name has gradually been
altered to Gibraltar.
In the meantime, the patriotic chieftain
Theodomir
having collected his routed forces, en
camped with them on the skirts of the
mountains
,
and summoned the country round to join
his standard. He sent off missives in all speed
to the king, imparting in brief and blunt terms
the news of the invasion, and craving assistance
with equal frankness. Senior, said he, in his
letter, the legions of Africa are upon us, but
whether they come from heaven or earth I
know not. They seem to have fallen from the
clouds, for they have no ships. We have been
taken by surprise, overpowered by numbers,
and obliged to retreat; and they have fortified
themselves in our territory. Send us aid,
senior
,
with instant speed, or rather, come
yourself
to our assistance.
[17]
[17]
Conde. Part 1. c. 9.
CHAPTER XI.
Measures of Don Roderick on hearing of the
invasion.Expedition of Ataulpho.Vision
of Taric
.
When
Don Roderick heard that legions of
turbaned troops had poured into the land from
Africa, he called to mind the visions and
predictions
of the necromantic tower, and great
fear came upon him. But, though sunk from
his former hardihood and virtue, though
enervated
by indulgence, and degraded in spirit by
a consciousness of crime, he was resolute of
soul, and roused himself to meet the coming
danger. He summoned a hasty levy of horse
and foot, amounting to forty thousand; but now
were felt the effects of the crafty council of
Count Julian, for the best of the horses and
armour
intended for the public service, had been
sent into Africa, and were really in possession
of the traitors. Many nobles, it is true, took
the field with the sumptuous array with which
they had been accustomed to appear at
tournaments
and jousts, but most of their vassals were
destitute of weapons, and cased in cuirasses of
leather, or suits of armour almost consumed by
rust. They were without discipline or
animation
;
and their horses, like themselves,
pampered
by slothful peace, were little fitted to
bear the heat, the dust, and toil, of long
campaigns
.
This army Don Roderick put under the
command
of his kinsman Ataulpho, a prince of the
royal blood of the Goths, and of a noble and
generous nature; and he ordered him to march
with all speed to meet the foe, and to recruit
his forces on the way with the troops of
Theodomir
.
In the meantime, Taric el Tuerto had
received
large reinforcements from Africa, and
the adherents of Count Julian, and all those
discontented with the sway of Don Roderick,
had flocked to his standard; for many were
deceived by the representations of Count
Julian
,
and thought that the Arabs had come to
aid him in placing the sons of Witiza upon the
throne. Guided by the count, the troops of
Taric penetrated into various parts of the
country, and laid waste the land; bringing back
loads of spoil to their strong hold at the rock
of Calpe.
The prince Ataulpho marched with his army
through Andalusia, and was joined by
Theodomir
with his troops; he met with various
detachments
of the enemy foraging the country,
and had several bloody skirmishes; but he
succeeded
in driving them before him, and they
retreated to the rock of Calpe, where Taric lay
gathered up with the main body of his army.
The prince encamped not far from the bay
which spreads itself out before the promontory.
In the evening he despatched the veteran
Theodomir
,
with a trumpet, to demand a parley of
the Arab chieftain, who received the envoy in
his tent, surrounded by his captains.
Theodomir
was frank and abrupt in speech, for the
most of his life had been passed far from
courts. He delivered, in round terms, the
message
of the Prince Ataulpho; upbraiding the
Arab general with his wanton invasion of the
land, and summoning him to surrender his army
or to expect no mercy.
The single eye of Taric el Tuerto glowed
like a coal of fire at this message. Tell your
commander, replied he, that I have crossed
the strait to conquer Spain, nor will I return
until I have accomplished my purpose. Tell
him I have men skilled in war, and armed in
proof, with whose aid I trust soon to give a
good account of his rabble host.
A murmur of applause passed through the
8
assemblage of moslem captains. Theodomir
glanced on them a look of defiance, but his eye
rested on a renegado christian, one of his own
ancient comrades, and a relation of Count
Julian
.
As to you, Don Greybeard, said he,
you who turn apostate in your declining age,
I here pronounce you a traitor to your God,
your king, and country; and stand ready to
prove it this instant upon your body, if field be
granted me.
The traitor knight was stung with rage at
these words, for truth rendered them piercing
to the heart. He would have immediately
answered
to the challenge, but Taric forbade it,
and ordered that the christian envoy should be
conducted from the camp. 'Tis well,
replied
Theodomir, God will give me the field
which you deny. Let yon hoary apostate look
to himself tomorrow in the battle, for I pledge
myself to use my lance upon no other foe until
it has shed his blood upon the native soil he has
betrayed. So saying, he left the camp, nor
could the moslem chieftains help admiring the
honest indignation of this patriot knight, while
they secretly despised his renegado adversary.
The ancient moorish chroniclers relate many
awful portents, and strange and mysterious
visions
,
which appeared to the commanders of
either army during this anxious night.
Certainly
it was a night of fearful suspense, and
moslem
and christian looked forward with doubt to
the fortune of the coming day. The Spanish
sentinel walked his pensive round, listening
occasionally
to the vague sounds from the distant
rock of Calpe, and eyeing it as the mariner
eyes the thunder cloud, pregnant with terror
and destruction. The Arabs, too, from their
lofty cliffs beheld the numerous camp-fires of
the christians gradually lighted up, and saw that
they were a powerful host; at the same time
the night breeze brought to their ears the sullen
roar of the sea which separated them from
Africa. When they considered their perilous
situation, an army on one side, with a whole
nation aroused to reinforce it, and on the other
an impassable sea, the spirits of many of the
warriors were cast down, and they repented
the day when they had ventured into this
hostile
land.
Taric marked their despondency, but said
nothing. Scarce had the first streak of
morning
light trembled along the sea, however, when
he summoned his principal warriors to his tent.
Be of good cheer, said he, Allah is with us,
and has sent his prophet to give assurance of
his aid. Scarce had I retired to my tent last
night, when a man of a majestic and venerable
presence stood before me. He was taller by a
palm than the ordinary race of men, his flowing
beard was of a golden hue, and his eyes were
so bright that they seemed to send forth flashes
of fire. I have heard the Emir Bahamet, and
other ancient men, describe the prophet, whom
they had seen many times while on earth, and
such was his form and lineament. `Fear
nothing
,
O Taric, from the morrow,' said he, `I will
be with thee in the fight. Strike boldly, then,
and conquer. Those of thy followers who
survive
the battle will have this land for an
inheritance
;
for those who fall a mansion in paradise
is prepared, and immortal houries await their
coming.' He spake and vanished; I heard a
strain of celestial melody, and my tent was
filled with the odours of Arabia the happy.
Such, says the Spanish chroniclers, was
another of the arts by which this arch son of
Ishmael sought to animate the hearts of his
followers
;
and the pretended vision has been
recorded
by the Arabian writers as a veritable
occurrence. Marvellous, indeed, was the effect
produced by it upon the infidel soldiery, who
now cried out with eagerness to be led against
the foe.
CHAPTER XII.
Battle of CalpeFate of Ataulpho
.
The
gray summits of the rock of Calpe
brightened
with the first rays of morning, as the
christian
army issued forth from its encampment. The
Prince Ataulpho rode from squadron to squadron,
animating his soldiers for the battle. Never
should we sheath our swords, said he, while
these infidels have a footing in the land. They
are pent up within yon rocky mountain, we must
assail them in their rugged hold. We have a
long day before us; let not the setting sun shine
upon one of their host who is not a fugitive, a
captive, or a corpse.
The words of the prince were received with
shouts, and the army moved towards the
promontory
.
As they advanced, they heard the clash
of cymbals and the bray of trumpets, and the
rocky bosom of the mountain glittered with helms
and spears and scimitars; for the Arabs, inspired
with fresh confidence by the words of Taric,
were sallying forth, with flaunting banners, to
the combat.
8*
The gaunt Arab chieftain stood upon a rock as
his troops marched by; his buckler was at his
back, and he brandished in his hand a
double-pointed
spear. Calling upon the several
leaders
by their names, he exhorted them to direct
their attacks against the christian captains,
and especially against Ataulpho, for the chiefs
being slain, said he, their followers will vanish
from before us like the morning mist.
The Gothic nobles were easily to be
distinguished
by the splendour of their arms, but the
Prince Ataulpho was conspicuous above all the
rest for the youthful grace and majesty of his
appearance, and the bravery of his array. He
was mounted on a superb Andalusian charger,
richly caparisoned with crimson velvet,
embroidered
with gold. His surcoat was of like colour
and adornment, and the plumes that waved above
his burnished helmet, were of the purest white.
Ten mounted pages, magnificently attired,
followed
him to the field, but their duty was not so
much to fight as to attend upon their lord, and to
furnish him with steed or weapon.
The christian troops, though irregular and
undisciplined, were full of native courage; for the
old warrior spirit of their Gothic sires still
glowed
in their bosoms. There were two battalions
of infantry, but Ataulpho stationed them in the
rear, for God forbid, said he, that foot soldiers
should have the place of honour in the battle,
when I have so many valiant cavaliers. As the
armies drew nigh to each other, however, it was
discovered that the advance of the Arabs was
composed of infantry. Upon this the cavaliers
checked their steeds, and requested that the foot
soldiery might advance and disperse this losel
crew, holding it beneath their dignity to contend
with pedestrian foes. The prince, however,
commanded them to charge; upon which,
putting
spurs to their steeds, they rushed upon the
foe.
The Arabs stood the shock manfully, receiving
the horses upon the points of their lances; many
of the riders were shot down with bolts from
cross-bows, or stabbed with the poniards of the
moslems. The cavaliers succeeded, however, in
breaking into the midst of the battalion and
throwing it into confusion, cutting down some
with their swords, transpiercing others with their
spears, and trampling many under the hoofs of
their horses. At this moment, they were attacked
by a band of Spanish horsemen, the recreant
partisans
of Count Julian. Their assault bore hard
upon their countrymen, who were disordered by
the contest with the foot soldiers, and many a
loyal christian knight fell beneath the sword of
an unnatural foe.
The foremost among these recreant warriors
was the renegado cavalier whom Theodomir
had challenged in the tent of Taric. He dealt
his blows about him with a powerful arm and
with malignant fury, for nothing is more deadly
than the hatred of an apostate. In the midst of
his career he was espied by the hardy
Theodomir
,
who came spurring to the encounter:
Traitor, cried he, I have kept my vow. This
lance has been held sacred from all other foes
to make a passage for thy perjured soul. The
renegado had been renowned for prowess before
he became a traitor to his country, but guilt will
sap the courage of the stoutest heart. When he
beheld Theodomir rushing upon him, he would
have turned and fled; pride alone withheld him;
and, though an admirable master of defence, he
lost all skill to ward the attack of his adversary.
At the first assault the lance of Theodomir pierced
him through and through; he fell to the earth,
gnashed his teeth as he rolled in the dust, but
yielded his breath without uttering a word.
The battle now became general, and lasted
throughout the morning with varying success.
The stratagem of Taric, however, began to
produce
its effect. The christian leaders and most
conspicuous cavaliers were singled out and
severally
assailed by overpowering numbers. They
fought desperately, and performed miracles of
prowess, but fell, one by one, beneath a thousand
wounds. Still the battle lingered on throughout
a great part of the day, and as the declining sun
shone through the clouds of dust, it seemed as
if the conflicting hosts were wrapped in smoke
and fire.
The Prince Ataulpho saw that the fortune of
battle was against him. He rode about the field
calling out the names of the bravest of his knights,
but few answered to his call, the rest lay
mangled
on the field. With this handful of warriors
he endeavoured to retrieve the day, when he
was assailed by Tenderos, a partisan of Count
Julian, at the head of a body of recreant
christians
.
At sight of this new adversary, fire
flashed from the eyes of the prince, for
Tenderos
had been brought up in his father's palace.
Well dost thou, traitor! cried he, to attack
the son of thy lord, who gave thee bread; thou,
who hast betrayed thy country and thy God!
So saying, he seized a lance from one of his
pages, and charged furiously upon the apostate;
but Tenderos met him in mid career, and the
lance of the prince was shivered upon his shield.
Ataulpho then grasped his mace, which hung at
his saddle bow, and a doubtful fight ensued.
Tenderos
was powerful of frame and superior in the
use of his weapons, but the curse of treason
seemed to paralyse his arm. He wounded
Ataulpho slightly between the greaves of his
armour, but the prince dealt a blow with his
mace that crushed through helm and scull and
reached the brains; and Tenderos fell dead to
earth, his armour rattling as he fell.
At the same moment, a javelin hurled by an
Arab transpierced the horse of Ataulpho, which
sunk beneath him. The prince seized the reins
of the steed of Tenderos, but the faithful animal,
as though he knew him to be the foe of his late
lord, reared and plunged and refused to let him
mount. The prince, however, used him as a
shield to ward off the press of foes, while with
his sword he defended himself against those in
front of him. Taric ben Zeyad arrived at the
scene of conflict, and paused for a moment in
admiration of the surpassing prowess of the
prince; recollecting, however, that his fall would
be a death blow to his army, he spurred upon him,
and wounded him severely with his scimitar.
Before
he could repeat his blow, Theodomir led up a
body of christian cavaliers to the rescue, and Taric
was parted from his prey by the tumult of the fight.
The prince sank to the earth, covered with
wounds and exhausted by the loss of blood. A
faithful page drew him from under the hoofs of
the horses, and, aided by a veteran soldier, an
ancient vassal of Ataulpho, conveyed him to a
short distance from the scene of battle, by the
side of a small stream that gushed out from
among rocks. They stanched the blood that
flowed from his wounds, and washed the dust
from his face, and lay him beside the fountain.
The page sat at his head, and supported it on
his knees, and the veteran stood at his feet, with
his brow bent and his eyes full of sorrow. The
prince gradually revived, and opened his eyes.
How fares the battle? said he. The struggle
is hard, replied the soldier, but the day may
yet be ours.
The prince felt that the hour of his death was
at hand, and ordered that they should aid him to
rise upon his knees. They supported him
between
them, and he prayed fervently for a short
time, when, finding his strength declining, he
beckoned the veteran to sit down beside him on
the rock. Continuing to kneel, he confessed
himself to that ancient soldier, having no priest
or friar to perform that office in this hour of
extremity
.
When he had so done, he sunk again
upon the earth and pressed it with his lips, as if
he would take a fond farewell of his beloved
country. The page would then have raised his
head, but found that his lord had yielded up
the ghost.
A number of Arab warriors, who came to the
fountain to slake their thirst, cut off the head of
the prince and bore it in triumph to Taric,
crying
,
Behold the head of the christian leader.
Taric immediately ordered that the head should
be put upon the end of a lance, together with
the surcoat of the prince, and borne about the
field of battle, with the sound of trumpets, atabals,
and cymbals.
When the christians beheld the surcoat, and
knew the features of the prince, they were struck
with horror, and heart and hand failed them.
Theodomir endeavoured in vain to rally them,
they threw by their weapons and fled; and they
continued to fly, and the enemy to pursue and
slay them, until the darkness of the night. The
moslems then returned and plundered the
christian
camp, where they found abundant spoil.
CHAPTER XIII.
Terror of the country.Roderick rouses himself
to arms
.
The
scattered fugitives of the christian army
spread terror throughout the land. The
inhabitants
of the towns and villages gathered around
them as they applied at their gates for food, or
lay themselves down faint and wounded beside
the public fountains. When they related the
tale of their defeat, old men shook their heads
and groaned, and the women uttered cries and
lamentations. So strange and unlooked for a
calamity filled them with consternation and
despair
;
for it was long since the alarm of war had
sounded in their land, and this was a warfare
that carried chains and slavery, and all kinds of
horrors in its train.
Don Roderick was seated with his beauteous
queen, Exilona, in the royal palace which
crowned
the rocky summit of Toledo, when the bearer
of ill-tidings came galloping over the bridge of
the Tagus. What tidings from the army?
demanded the king, as the panting messenger
9
was brought into his presence. Tidings of
great woe, exclaimed the soldier. The prince
has fallen in battle. I saw his head and surcoat
upon a moorish lance, and the army was
overthrown
and fled.
At hearing these words, Roderick covered
his face with his hands, and for some time sat
in silence; and all his courtiers stood mute and
aghast, and no one dared to speak a word. In
that awful space of time passed before his
thoughts all his errors and his crimes, and all the
evils that had been predicted in the necromantic
tower. His mind was filled with horror and
confusion, for the hour of his destruction seemed
at hand; but he subdued his agitation by his
strong and haughty spirit; and when he
uncovered
his face no one could read on his brow the
trouble and agony of his heart. Still every hour
brought fresh tidings of disaster. Messenger
after messenger came spurring into the city,
distracting
it with new alarms. The infidels, they
said, were strengthening themselves in the land:
host after host were pouring in from Africa: the
sea board of Andalusia glittered with spears and
scimitars. Bands of turbaned horsemen had
overrun the plains of Sidonia, even to the banks
of the Guadiana. Fields were laid waste, towns
and cities plundered, the inhabitants carried into
captivity, and the whole country lay in smoking
desolation.
Roderick heard all these tidings with an
undaunted
aspect, nor did he ever again betray
sign of consternation; but the anxiety of his soul
was evident in his warlike preparations. He
issued orders that every noble and prelate of his
kingdom should put himself at the head of his
retainers and take the field, and that every man
capable of bearing arms should hasten to his
standard, bringing whatever horse and mule and
weapon he possessed; and he appointed the plain
of Cordova for the place where the army was to
assemble. Throwing by, then, all the trappings
of his late slothful and voluptuous life, and
arming
himself for warlike action, he departed from
Toledo at the head of his guard, composed of
the flower of the youthful nobility. His queen,
Exilona, accompanied him, for she craved
permission
to remain in one of the cities of
Andalusia
,
that she might be near her lord in this time
of peril.
Among the first who appeared to hail the
arrival
of the king at Cordova, was the Bishop Oppas,
the secret partisan of the traitor Julian. He
brought with him his two nephews, Evan and
Siseburto, the sons of the late king Witiza, and a
great host of vassals and retainers, all well armed
and appointed; for they had been furnished by
Count Julian with a part of the arms sent by the
king to Africa. The bishop was smooth of
tongue, and profound in his hypocrisy; his
pretended
zeal and devotion, and the horror with
which he spoke of the treachery of his kinsman,
imposed upon the credulous spirit of the king,
and he was readily admitted into his most secret
councils.
The alarm of the infidel invasion had spread
throughout the land, and roused the Gothic
valour
of the inhabitants. On receiving the orders
of Roderick, every town and hamlet, every
mountain
and valley, had sent forth its fighting men,
and the whole country was on the march towards
Andalusia. In a little while there were gathered
together, on the plain of Cordova, near fifty
thousand horsemen, and a countless host of
foot-soldiers
.
The Gothic nobles appeared in
burnished
armour, curiously inlaid and adorned,
with chains and jewels of gold, and ornaments of
precious stones, and silken scarfs, and surcoats of
brocade, or velvet richly embroidered;
betraying
the luxury and ostentation into which they
had declined from the iron hardihood of their
warlike sires. As to the common people, some
had lances and shields and swords and
cross-bows
,
but the greater part were unarmed, or
provided merely with slings, and clubs studded
with nails, and with the iron implements of
husbandry
;
and many had made shields for
themselves
from the doors and windows of their
habitations
.
They were a prodigious host, and
appeared
,
say the Arabian chroniclers, like an
agitated
sea, but, though brave in spirit, they
possessed
no knowledge of warlike art, and were
ineffectual through lack of arms and discipline.
Several of the most ancient and experienced
cavaliers, beholding the state of the army,
advised
Don Roderick to await the arrival of more
regular troops, which were stationed in Iberia,
Cantabria and Gallia Gothica; but this counsel
was strenuously opposed by the Bishop Oppas;
who urged the king to march immediately against
the infidels. As yet, said he, their number
is but limited, but every day new hosts arrive
like flocks of locusts, from Africa. They will
augment faster than we; they are living, too, at
our expense, and, while we pause, both armies
are consuming the substance of the land.
King Roderick listened to the crafty counsel
of the bishop, and determined to advance
without
delay. He mounted his war horse, Orelia,
and rode among his troops assembled on that
spacious plain, and wherever he appeared he was
received with acclamations; for nothing so
arouses the spirit of the soldier as to behold his
sovereign in arms. He addressed them in words
calculated to touch their hearts and animate their
9*
courage. The Saracens, said he, are
ravaging
our land, and their object is our conquest.
Should they prevail, your very existence as a
nation is at an end. They will overturn your
altars; trample on the cross; lay waste your
cities; carry off your wives and daughters, and
doom yourselves and sons to hard and cruel
slavery. No safety remains for you but in the
prowess of your arms. For my own part, as I
am your king, so will I be your leader, and will
be the foremost to encounter every toil and
danger
.
The soldiery answered their monarch with
loud acclamations, and solemnly pledged
themselves
to fight to the last gasp in defence of
their country and their faith. The king then
arranged the order of their march: all those who
were armed with cuirasses and coats of mail
were placed in the front and rear; the centre of
the army was composed of a promiscuous throng,
without body armour, and but scantily provided
with weapons.
When they were about to march, the king
called to him a noble cavalier named Ramiro, and
delivering him the royal standard, charged him
to guard it well for the honour of Spain;
scarcely
,
however, had the good knight received it in
his hand, when he fell dead from his horse, and
the staff of the standard was broken in twain.
Many ancient courtiers who were present, looked
upon this as an evil omen, and counselled the
king not to set forward on his march that day;
but, disregarding all auguries and portents, he
ordered the royal banner to be put upon a lance
and gave it in charge of another standard bearer:
then commanding the trumpets to be sounded,
he departed at the head of his host to seek the
enemy.
The field where this great army assembled
was called, from the solemn pledge given by the
nobles and the soldiery,
El campo de la verdad;
or, The field of Truth; a name, says the sage
chronicler Abul Cassim, which it bears even to
the present day.
[18]
[18]
La Perdida de Espaa, cap. 9. Bleda Lib. 2. c. 8.
CHAPTER XIV.
March of the Gothic armyEncampment on
the banks of the Guadalete.Mysterious
predictions
of a palmerConduct of Pelistes
thereupon
.
The
hopes of Andalusia revived as this mighty
host stretched in lengthening lines along its
fertile
plains; from morn until night it continued
to pour along, with sound of drum and trumpet;
it was led on by the proudest nobles and bravest
cavaliers of the land, and, had it possessed arms
and discipline, might have undertaken the
conquest
of the world.
After a few days march, Don Roderick arrived
in sight of the moslem army, encamped on the
banks of the Guadalete,
[19]
[19]
This name was given to it subsequently by the Arabs. It
signifies the River of Death. Vide Pedruza, Hist. Granad.
p. 3. c. 1.
where that beautiful
stream winds through the fertile land of Xeres.
The infidel host was far inferior in number to the
christians, but then it was composed of hardy
and dexterous troops, seasoned to war, and
admirably
armed. The camp shone gloriously in
the setting sun, and resounded with the clash of
cymbal, the note of the trumpet, and the neighing
of fiery Arabian steeds. There were swarthy
troops from every nation of the African coast,
together with legions from Syria and Egypt,
while the light Bedouins were careering about
the adjacent plain. What grieved and incensed
the spirits of the christian warriors, however, was
to behold, a little apart from the moslem host, an
encampment of Spanish cavaliers, with the
banner
of Count Julian waving above their tents.
They were ten thousand in number, valiant and
hardy men, the most experienced of Spanish
soldiery, most of them having served in the
African wars; they were well armed and
appointed
also, with the weapons of which the
count had beguiled his sovereign; and it was a
grievous sight to behold such good soldiers
arrayed
against their country and their faith.
The christians pitched their tents about the
hour of vespers, at a short league distant from
the enemy, and remained gazing with anxiety
and awe upon this barbaric host that had caused
such terror and desolation in the land: for the
first sight of a hostile encampment in a country
disused to war, is terrible to the newly enlisted
soldier. A marvellous occurrence is recorded
by the Arabian chroniclers as having taken place
in the christian camp, but discreet Spanish
writers relate it with much modification, and
consider
it a stratagem of the wily Bishop Oppas,
to sound the loyalty of the christian cavaliers.
As several leaders of the army were seated with
the bishop in his tent, conversing on the dubious
fortunes of the approaching contest, an ancient
pilgrim appeared at the entrance. He was bowed
down with years, his snowy beard descended to
his girdle, and he supported his tottering steps
with a palmer's staff. The cavaliers rose and
received him with great reverence as he
advanced
within the tent. Holding up his withered
hand, woe, woe to Spain! exclaimed he, for
the vial of the wrath of heaven is about to be
poured out. Listen warriors and take warning.
Four months since, having performed my
pilgrimage
to the sepulchre of our Lord in
Palestine
,
I was on my return towards my native land.
Wearied and way-worn, I lay down one night to
sleep beneath a palm tree, by the side of a
fountain
,
when I was awakened by a voice saying
unto me, in soft accents, `Son of sorrow, why
sleepest thou?' I opened my eyes and beheld one
of a fair and beauteous countenance, in shining
apparel and with glorious wings, standing by the
fountain; and I said `who art thou, who callest
upon me in this deep hour of the night?'
`Fear not,' replied the stranger, `I am an
angel from heaven, sent to reveal unto thee the
fate of thy country. Behold the sins of Roderick
have come up before God, and his anger is
kindled
against him, and he has given him up to be
invaded and destroyed. Hasten then to Spain,
and seek the camp of thy countrymen. Warn
them that such only shall be saved as shall
abandon
Roderick; but those who adhere to him shall
share his punishment, and shall fall under the
sword of the invader.'
The pilgrim ceased, and passed forth from the
tent; certain of the cavaliers followed him to
detain him, that they might converse further with
him about these matters, but he was no where to
be found. The sentinel before the tent said, I
saw no one come forth, but it was as if a blast
of wind passed by me, and there was a rustling
as of dry leaves.
The cavaliers remained looking upon each
other with astonishment. The Bishop Oppas sat
with his eyes fixed upon the ground, and
shadowed
by his overhanging brow. At length,
breaking silence, in a low and faltering voice,
Doubtless, said he, this message is from God;
and since he has taken compassion upon us, and
given us notice of his impending judgment, it
behoves us to hold grave council, and determine
how best we may accomplish his will and avert
his displeasure.
The chiefs still remained silent as men
confounded
.
Among them was a veteran noble
named Pelistes. He had distinguished himself
in the African wars, fighting side by side with
Count Julian, but the latter had never dared to
tamper with his faith, for he knew his stern
integrity
.
Pelistes had brought with him to the
camp his only son, who had never drawn a sword
except in tourney. When the young man saw
that the veterans held their peace, the blood
mantled in his cheek, and, overcoming his
modesty
,
he broke forth with a generous warmth:
I know not, cavaliers, said he, what is
passing
in your minds, but I believe this pilgrim to
be an envoy from the devil; for none else could
have given such dastard and perfidious counsel.
For my own part, I stand ready to defend my
king, my country and my faith; I know no
higher duty than this, and if God thinks fit to
strike me dead in the performance of it, his
sovereign
will be done!
When the young man had risen to speak, his
father had fixed his eyes upon him with a grave
and stern demeanour, leaning upon a two handed
sword. As soon as the youth had finished,
Pelistes
embraced him with a father's fondness.
Thou hast spoken well, my son, said he; If
I held my peace at the counsel of this losel
pilgrim
,
it was but to hear thy opinion, and to learn
whether thou wert worthy of thy lineage and of
the training I had given thee. Hadst thou
counselled
otherwise than thou hast done, hadst thou
shown thyself craven and disloyal; so help me
God, I would have struck off thy head with this
weapon which I hold in my hand. But thou hast
counselled like a loyal and a christian knight,
and I thank God for having given me a son
worthy
to perpetuate the honours of my line. As to
this pilgrim, be he saint or be he devil, I care not;
this much I promise, that if I am to die in defence
of my country and my king, my life shall be a
costly purchase to the foe. Let each man make
the same resolve, and I trust we shall yet prove
the pilgrim a lying prophet. The words of
Pelistes
roused the spirits of many of the cavaliers;
others, however, remained full of anxious
foreboding
,
and when this fearful prophecy was
rumoured
about the camp, as it presently was by
the emissaries of the bishop, it spread awe and
dismay among the soldiery.
10
CHAPTER XV.
Skirmishing of the armies.Pelistes and his
son.Pelistes and the Bishop
.
On
the following day the two armies
remained
regarding each other with wary but
menacing
aspect. About noontide King Roderick
sent forth a chosen force of five hundred horse
and two hundred foot, the best armed of his
host, to skirmish with the enemy, that, by
gaining
some partial advantage, they might raise the
spirits of the army. They were led on by
Theodomir, the same Gothic noble who had
signalized
himself by first opposing the invasion of
the moslems.
The christian squadrons paraded with flying
pennons in the valley which lay between the
armies. The Arabs were not slow in answering
their defiance. A large body of horsemen
sallied
forth to the encounter, together with three
hundred of the followers of Count Julian. There
was hot skirmishing about the field and on the
banks of the river; many gallant feats were
displayed
on either side, and many valiant warriors
were slain. As the night closed in, the trumpets
from either camp summoned the troops to retire
from the combat. In this day's action the
christians
suffered greatly in the loss of their
distinguished
cavaliers; for it is the noblest spirits
who venture most, and lay themselves open to
danger; and the moslem soldiers had
instructions
to single out the leaders of the adverse host.
All this is said to have been devised by the
perfidious
Bishop Oppas, who had secret
communications
with the enemy, while he influenced the
councils of the king; and who trusted that by this
skirmishing warfare the power of the christian
troops would be cut off, and the rest
disheartened
.
On the following morning a larger force was
ordered out to skirmish, and such of the soldiery
as were unarmed were commanded to stand
ready to seize the horses and strip off the armour
of the killed and wounded. Among the most
illustrious of the warriors who fought that day
was Pelistes, the Gothic noble who had so
sternly checked the tongue of the Bishop Oppas.
He led to the field a large body of his own
vassals
and retainers, and of cavaliers trained up in
his house, who had followed him to the wars in
Africa, and who looked up to him more as a
father than a chieftain. Beside him was his
only son, who now for the first time was fleshing
his sword in battle. The conflict that day was
more general and bloody than the day
preceding
;
the slaughter of the christian warriors was
immense, from their lack of defensive armour;
and as nothing could prevent the flower of the
Gothic chivalry from spurring to the combat,
the field was strewed with the bodies of the
youthful nobles. None suffered more,
however
,
than the warriors of Pelistes. Their
leader himself was bold and hardy, and prone
to expose himself to danger; but years and
experience had moderated his early fire; his
son, however, was eager to distinguish himself
in this, his first essay, and rushed with impetuous
ardour into the hottest of the battle. In vain his
father called to caution him; he was ever in the
advance, and seemed unconscious of the perils
that surrounded him. The cavaliers and
vassals
of his father followed him with devoted zeal,
and many of them paid for their loyalty with their
lives. When the trumpets sounded in the
evening
for retreat, the troops of Pelistes were the
last to reach the camp. They came slowly and
mournfully, and much decreased in number.
Their veteran commander was seated on his
war-horse, but the blood trickled from the greaves
of his armour. His valiant son was borne on
the shields of his vassals; when they laid him
on the earth near to where the king was
standing
,
they found that the heroic youth had expired
of his wounds. The cavaliers surrounded the
body and gave utterance to their grief, but the
father restrained his agony, and looked on with
the stern resignation of a soldier.
Don Roderick surveyed the field of battle with
a rueful eye, for it was covered with the
mangled
bodies of his most illustrious warriors; he
saw, too, with anxiety, that the common people,
unused to war and unsustained by discipline,
were harassed by incessant toils and dangers,
and were cooling in their zeal and courage.
The crafty Bishop Oppas marked the internal
trouble of the king, and thought a favourable
moment
had arrived to sway him to his purpose.
He called to his mind the various portents and
prophecies which had forerun their present
danger
.
Let not my lord the king, said he,
make light of these mysterious revelations,
which appear to be so disasterously fulfilling.
The hand of heaven appears to be against us.
Destruction is impending over our heads. Our
troops are rude and unskilful; but slightly armed,
and much cast down in spirit. Better is it that
we should make a treaty with the enemy, and,
by granting part of his demands, prevent the
utter ruin of our country. If such counsel be
10*
acceptable to my lord the king, I stand ready to
depart upon an embassy to the moslem camp.
Upon hearing these words, Pelistes, who had
stood in mournful silence, regarding the dead
body of his son, burst forth with honest
indignation
.
By this good sword, said he, the man
who yields such dastard counsel deserves death
from the hand of his countrymen rather than
from the foe; and, were it not for the presence
of the king, may I forfeit salvation if I would
not strike him dead upon the spot.
The bishop turned an eye of venom upon
Pelistes. My lord, said he, I, too, bear a
weapon
,
and know how to wield it. Were the
king not present you would not dare to menace,
nor should you advance one step without my
hastening to meet you.
The king interposed between the jarring nobles,
and rebuked the impetuosity of Pelistes, but at
the same time rejected the counsel of the bishop.
The event of this conflict, said he, is in the
hand of God; but never shall my sword return to
its scabbard while an infidel invader remains
within the land.
He then held a council with his captains, and it
was determined to offer the enemy general battle
on the following day. A herald was despatched
defying Taric ben Zeyad to the contest, and the
defiance was gladly accepted by the moslem
chieftain.
[20]
[20]
Bleda, Cronica.
Don Roderick then formed the plan
of action, and assigned to each commander his
several station, after which he dismissed his
officers
,
and each one sought his tent, to prepare by
diligence or repose for the next day's eventful
contest.
CHAPTER XVI.
Traitorous message of Count Julian
.
Taric
ben Zeyad had been surprised by the
valour of the christian cavaliers in the recent
battles
,
and at the number and apparent devotion of
the troops which accompanied the king to the
field. The confident defiance of Don Roderick,
increased his surprise. When the herald had
retired
,
he turned an eye of suspicion on Count
Julian. Thou hast represented thy
countrymen
,
said he, as sunk in effeminacy and lost to
all generous impulse; yet I find them fighting
with the courage and the strength of lions. Thou
hast represented thy king as detested by his
subjects
and surrounded by secret treason, but I
behold
his tents whitening the hills and dales, while
thousands are hourly flocking to his standard.
Woe unto thee if thou hast dealt deceitfully with
us, or betrayed us with guileful words.
Don Julian retired to his tent in great trouble
of mind, and fear came upon him that the Bishop
Oppas might play him false; for it is the lot of
traitors ever to distrust each other. He called
to him the same page who had brought him the
letter from Florinda, revealing the story of her
dishonour.
Thou knowest, my trusty page, said he,
that I have reared thee in my household, and
cherished thee above all thy companions. If
thou hast loyalty and affection for thy lord, now
is the time to serve him. Hie thee to the
christian
camp, and find thy way to the tent of the
Bishop Oppas. If any one ask thee who thou
art, tell them thou art of the household of the
bishop, and bearer of missives from Cordova.
When thou art admitted to the presence of the
bishop, show him this ring, and he will commune
with thee in secret. Then tell him Count Julian
greets him as a brother, and demands how the
wrongs of his daughter Florinda are to be
redressed
.
Mark well his reply, and bring it word for
word. Have thy lips closed, but thine eyes and
ears open; and observe every thing of note in
the camp of the king. So, speed thee on thy
errandaway, away!
The page hastened to saddle a Barbary steed,
fleet as the wind, and of a jet black colour, so as
not to be easily discernable in the night. He
girded on a sword and dagger, slung an Arab
bow with a quiver of arrows at his side, and a
buckler at his shoulder. Issuing out of the
camp, he sought the banks of the Guadalete, and
proceeded sliently along its stream, which
reflected
the distant fires of the christian camp.
As he passed by the place which had been the
scene of the recent conflict, he heard, from time
to time, the groan of some expiring warrior who
had crawled among the reeds on the margin of
the river; and sometimes his steed stepped
cautiously over the mangled bodies of the slain.
The young page was unused to the sights of war,
and his heart beat quick within him. He was
hailed by the sentinels as he approached the
christian camp, and, on giving the reply taught
him by Count Julian, was conducted to the tent
of the Bishop Oppas.
The bishop had not yet retired to his couch.
When he beheld the ring of Count Julian, and
heard the words of his message, he saw that the
page was one in whom he might confide.
Hasten
back to thy lord, said he, and tell him to
have faith in me and all shall go well. As yet
I have kept my troops out of the combat. They
are all fresh, well armed, and well appointed.
The king has confided to myself, aided by the
princes Evan and Siseburto, the command of
a wing of the army. Tomorrow, at the hour of
noon, when both armies are in the heat of action,
we will pass over with our forces to the
moslems
.
But I claim the compact made with
Taric ben Zeyad, that my nephews be placed in
dominion over Spain, and tributary only to the
Caliph of Damascus. With this traitorous
message
the page departed. He led his black steed
by the bridle to present less mark for
observation
,
as he went stumbling along near the
expiring
fires of the camp. On passing the last
outpost, when the guards were half slumbering
on their arms, he was overheard and summoned,
but leaped lightly into the saddle and put spurs
to his steed. An arrow whistled by his ear, and
two more stuck in the target which he had
thrown upon his back. The clatter of swift
hoofs echoed behind him, but he had learnt of
the Arabs to fight and fly. Plucking a shaft from
his quiver, and turning and rising in the stirrups
as his courser galloped at full speed, he drew
the arrow to the head and launched it at his
pursuer
.
The twang of the bow-string was
followed
by the crash of armour, and a deep groan, as
the horseman tumbled to the earth. The page
pursued his course without further molestation,
and arrived at the moslem camp before the
break of day.
CHAPTER XVII.
Last day of the Battle
.
A light
had burned throughout the night in
the tent of the king, and anxious thoughts and
dismal visions troubled his repose. If he fell into
a slumber, he beheld in his dreams the shadowy
phantoms of the necromantic tower, or the
injured
Florinda, pale and dishevelled, imprecating
the vengeance of heaven upon his head. In the
mid-watches of the night, when all was silent
except
the footstep of the sentinel, pacing before his
tent, the king rose from his couch, and walking
forth looked thoughtfully upon the martial scene
before him. The pale crescent of the moon hung
over the moorish camp, and dimly lighted up the
windings of the Guadalete. The heart of the
king was heavy and oppressed; but he felt only
for himself, says Antonio Agapida, he thought
nothing
of the perils impending over the thousands
of devoted subjects in the camp below him;
sleeping, as it were, on the margin of their
graves. The faint clatter of distant hoofs, as if
in rapid flight, reached the monarch's ear, but
the horsemen were not to be described. At that
very hour, and along the shadowy banks of that
river, here and there gleaming with the scanty
moonlight, passed the fugitive messenger of
Count Julian, with the plan of the next day's
treason.
The day had not yet dawned. when the
sleepless
and impatient monarch summoned his
attendants
and arrayed himself for the field. He then
sent for the venerable Bishop Urbino, who had
accompanied him to the camp, and, laying aside
his regal crown, he knelt with head uncovered,
and confessed his sins before the holy man. After
this a solemn mass was performed in the royal
tent, and the eucharist administered to the
monarch
.
When these ceremonies were concluded,
he besought the archbishop to depart forthwith
for Cordova, there to await the issue of the battle,
and to be ready to bring forward reinforcements
and supplies. The archbishop saddled his mule
and departed just as the faint blush of morning
began to kindle in the east. Already the camp
resounded with the thrilling call of the trumpet,
the clank of armour, and the tramp and neigh of
steeds. As the archbishop passed through the
camp, he looked with a compassionate heart on
this vast multitude, of whom so many were soon
to perish. The warriors pressed to kiss his
hand, and many a cavalier full of youth and fire
11
received his benediction, who was to lie stiff and
cold before the evening.
When the troops were marshalled for the
field, Don Roderick prepared to sally forth in
the state and pomp with which the Gothic kings
were wont to go to battle. He was arrayed in
robes of gold brocade; his sandals were
embroidered
with pearls and diamonds; he had a
sceptre
in his hand, and he wore a regal crown
resplendent
with inestimable jewels. Thus
gorgeously
apparelled, he ascended a lofty chariot
of ivory, the axle-trees of which were of silver,
and the wheels and pole covered with plates of
burnished gold. Above his head was a canopy
of cloth of gold embossed with armorial devices,
and studded with precious stones.
[21]
[21]
Entrand. Chron. an. Chris. 714.
This
sumptuous
chariot was drawn by milk-white horses,
with caparisons of crimson velvet, embroidered
with pearls. A thousand youthful cavaliers
surrounded
the car; all of the noblest blood and
bravest spirit; all knighted by the king's own
hand, and sworn to defend him to the last.
When Roderick issued forth in this
resplendent
state, says an Arabian writer, surrounded
by his guards in gilded armour and waving plumes
and scarfs and surcoats of a thousand dyes, it
was as if the sun were emerging in the dazzling
chariot of the day from amidst the glorious clouds
of morning.
As the royal car rolled along in front of the
squadrons, the soldiers shouted with admiration.
Don Roderick waved his sceptre and addressed
them from his lofty throne, reminding them of
the horror and desolation which had already been
spread through the land by the invaders. He
called upon them to summon up the ancient
valour
of their race and avenge the blood of their
brethren. One day of glorious fighting, said
he, and this infidel horde will be driven into the
sea or will perish beneath your swords.
Forward
bravely to the fight; your families are
behind
you praying for your success; the invaders
of your country are before you; God is above to
bless his holy cause, and your king leads you to
the field. The army shouted with one accord,
Forward to the foe, and death be his portion
who shuns the encounter!
The rising sun began to shine along the
glistening
waters of the Guadalete as the Moorish
army, squadron after squadron, came sweeping
down a gentle declivity to the sound of martial
music. Their turbans and robes, of various dyes
and fashions, gave a splendid appearance to their
host; as they marched, a cloud of dust arose and
partly hid them from the sight, but still there
would break forth flashes of steel and gleams of
burnished gold, like rays of vivid lightning;
while the sound of drum and trumpet, and the
lash of moorish cymbal, were as the warlike
thunder within that stormy cloud of battle.
As the armies drew near each other, the sun
disappeared among gathering clouds, and the
gloom of the day was increased by the columns
of dust which rose from either host. At length
the trumpets sounded for the encounter. The
battle commenced with showers of arrows, stones
and javelins. The christian foot soldiers fought
to disadvantage, the greater part being destitute
of helm or buckler. A battalion of light Arabian
horsemen, led by a Greek renegado named
Maguel
el Rumi, careered in front of the christian
line, launching their darts, and then wheeling off
beyond the reach of the missiles hurled after
them. Theodomir now brought up his seasoned
troops into the action, seconded by the veteran
Pelistes, and in a little while the battle became
furious and promiscuous. It was glorious to
behold
the old Gothic valour shining forth in this
hour of fearful trial. Wherever the moslems fell,
the christians rushed forward, seized upon their
horses, and stripped them of their armour and
their weapons. They fought desperately and
successfully, for they fought for their country and
their faith. The battle raged for several hours;
the field was strown with slain, and the Moors,
overcome by the multitude and fury of their foes
began to falter.
When Taric beheld his troops retreating
before
the enemy, he threw himself before them
and, rising in his stirrups, Oh moslems!
conquerors
of Africa! cried he, whither would
you fly? The sea is behind you, the enemy
before
;
you have no hope but in your valour and
the help of God. Do as I do and the day is
ours!
With these words he put spurs to his horse
and sprung among the enemy, striking to right
and left, cutting down and destroying, while his
steed, fierce as himself, trampled upon the foot
soldiers, and tore them with his teeth. At this
moment a mighty shout arose in various parts of
the field; the noontide hour had arrived. The
Bishop Oppas with the two princes, who had
hitherto kept their bands out of the fight, suddenly
went over to the enemy, and turned their
weapons
upon their astonished countrymen. From
that moment the fortune of the day was changed,
and the field of battle became a scene of wild
confusion and bloody massacre. The christians
knew not whom to contend with, or whom to
trust. It seemed as if madness had seized upon
their friends and kinsmen, and that their worst
enemies were among themselves.
The courage of Don Roderick rose with his
11*
danger. Throwing off the cumbrous robes of
royalty and descending from his car, he sprang
upon his steed Orelia, grasped his lance and
buckler, and endeavoured to rally his retreating
troops. He was surrounded and assailed by
a multitude of his own traitorous subjects, but
defended himself with wondrous prowess. The
enemy thickened around him; his loyal band of
cavaliers were slain, bravely fighting in his
defence
;
the last that was seen of the king was in
the midst of the enemy, dealing death at every
blow.
A complete panic fell upon the christians; they
threw away their arms and fled in all directions.
They were pursued with dreadful slaughter,
until
the darkness of the night rendered it
impossible
to distinguish friend from foe. Taric then
called off his troops from the pursuit, and took
possession of the royal camp; and the couch
which had been pressed so uneasily on the
preceding
night by Don Roderick, now yielded
sound repose to his conqueror.
[22]
[22]
This battle is called indiscriminately by historians the
battle of Guadalete, or of Xeres, from the neighbourhood of
that city.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The field of battle after the defeat.The fate of
Roderick
.
On
the morning after the battle, the Arab
leader, Taric ben Zeyad, rode over the bloody
field of the Guadalete, strewed with the ruins
of those splendid armies, which had so lately
passed like glorious pageants along the river
banks. There Moor and christian, horseman
and horse, lay gashed with hideous wounds;
and the river, still red with blood, was filled
with the bodies of the slain. The gaunt Arab
was as a wolf roaming through the fold he had
laid waste. On every side his eye revelled on
the ruin of the country, on the wrecks of
haughty
Spain. There lay the flower of her
youthful
chivalry, mangled and destroyed, and the
strength of her yeomanry prostrated in the
dust. The Gothic noble lay confounded with
his vassals; the peasant with the prince; all
ranks and dignities were mingled in one bloody
massacre.
When Taric had surveyed the field, he caused
the spoils of the dead and the plunder of the
camp to be brought before him. The booty
was immense. There were massy chains, and
rare jewels of gold; pearls and precious stones;
rich silks and brocades, and all other luxurious
decorations in which the Gothic nobles had
indulged
in the latter times of their degeneracy.
A vast amount of treasure was likewise found,
which had been brought by Roderick for the
expenses of the war.
Taric then ordered that the bodies of the
moslem warriors should be interred; as for
those of the christians, they were gathered in
heaps, and vast pyres of wood were formed on
which they were consumed. The flames of
these pyres rose high in the air, and were seen
afar off in the night; and when the christians
beheld them from the neighbouring hills they
beat their breasts and tore their hair, and
lamented
over them as over the funeral fires of
their country. The carnage of that battle
infected
the air for two whole months, and bones
were seen lying in heaps upon the field for
more than forty years; nay, when ages had
past and gone, the husbandman, turning up the
soil, would still find fragments of Gothic
cuirasses
and helms, and moorish scimitars, the
relics
of that dreadful fight.
For three days the Arabian horsemen
pursued
the flying christians; hunting them over
the face of the country; so that but a scanty
number of that mighty host escaped to tell the
tale of their disaster.
Taric ben Zeyad considered his victory
incomplete
so long as the Gothic monarch
survived
;
he proclaimed great rewards, therefore,
to whomsoever should bring Roderick to him,
dead or alive. A diligent search was
accordingly
made in every direction, but for a long
time in vain; at length a soldier brought to
Taric the head of a christian warrior, on which
was a cap decorated with feathers and precious
stones. The Arab leader received it as the
head of the unfortunate Roderick, and sent it,
as a trophy of his victory, to Muza ben Nosier,
who, in like manner, transmitted it to the caliph
at Damascus. The Spanish historians,
however
,
have always denied its identity.
A mystery has ever hung, and ever must
continue
to hang, over the fate of King Roderick,
in that dark and doleful day of Spain. Whether
he went down amidst the storm of battle, and
atoned for his sins and errors by a patriot grave,
or whether he survived to repent of them in
hermit exile, must remain matter of conjecture
and dispute. The learned Archbishop Rodrigo,
who has recorded the events of this disastrous
field, affirms that Roderick fell beneath the
vengeful blade of the traitor Julian, and thus
expiated with his blood his crime against the
hapless Florinda; but the archbishop stands
alone in his record of the fact. It seems
generally
admitted that Orelia, the favourite
war-horse
of Don Roderick, was found entangled in
a marsh on the borders of the Guadalete, with
the sandals and mantle and royal insignia of
the king lying close by him. The river at this
place ran broad and deep, and was encumbered
with the dead bodies of warriors and steeds; it
has been supposed, therefore, that he perished
in the stream; but his body was not found
within its waters.
When several years had passed away, and
men's minds, being restored to some degree of
tranquility, began to occupy themselves about
the events of this dismal day, a rumour arose
that Roderick had escaped from the carnage
on the banks of the Guadalete, and was still
alive. It was said, that having from a rising
ground caught a view of the whole field of
battle, and seen that the day was lost, and
his army flying in all directions, he likewise
sought his safety in flight. It is added, that
the Arab horsemen, while scouring the
mountains
in quest of fugitives, found a shepherd
arrayed in the royal robes, and brought him
before the conqueror, believing him to be the
king himself. Count Julian soon dispelled the
error. On being questioned the trembling rustic
declared, that while tending his sheep in the
folds of the mountains, there came a cavalier
on a horse wearied and spent and ready to sink
beneath the spur. That the cavalier with an
authoritative voice and menacing air
commanded
him to exchange garments with him, and
clad himself in his rude garb of sheep skin, and
took his crook and his scrip of provisions, and
continued up the rugged defiles of the
mountains
leading towards Castile, until he was lost
to view.
[23]
[23]
Bleda, Cron. L. 2. c. 9. Abulcasim Tarif Abentarique
L. 1. c. 10.
This tradition was fondly cherished by
many, who clung to the belief in the existence
of their monarch as their main hope for the
redemption of Spain. It was even affirmed
that he had taken refuge, with many of his host,
in an island of the Ocean sea, from whence
he might yet return once more to elevate his
standard, and battle for the recovery of his
throne.
Year after year, however, elapsed, and
nothing
was heard of Don Roderick; yet, like
Sebastian of Portugal, and Arthur of England,
his name continued to be a rallying point for
popular faith, and the mystery of his end to give
rise to romantic fables. At length, when
generation
after generation had sunk into the grave,
and near two centuries had passed and gone,
traces were said to be discovered that threw a
light on the final fortunes of the unfortunate
Roderick. At that time, Don Alphonso the
Great, King of Leon, had wrested the city of
Viseo in Lusitania from the hands of the
moslems
.
As his soldiers were ranging about the
city and its environs, one of them discovered
in a field, outside of the walls, a small chapel
or hermitage, with a sepulchre in front, on
which was inscribed this epitaph in Gothic
characters.
HIC REQUIESCIT RUDERICUS,
ULTIMUS REX GOTHORUM.
Here lies Roderick,
The last king of the Goths.
It has been believed by many that this was
the veritable tomb of the monarch, and that in
this hermitage he had finished his days in
solitary
penance. The warrior, as he contemplated
the supposed tomb of the once haughty
Roderick
,
forgot all his faults and errors, and shed a
soldier's tear over his memory; but when his
thoughts turned to Count Julian, his patriotic
indignation broke forth, and with his dagger he
inscribed a rude malediction on the stone.
Accursed, said he, be the impious and
headlong vengeance of the traitor Julian. He
was a murderer of his king; a destroyer of his
kindred; a betrayer of his country. May his
name be bitter in every mouth, and his
memory
infamous to all generations.
Here ends the legend of Don Roderick.
12
ILLUSTRATIONS
OF THE
FOREGOING LEGEND.
THE TOMB OF RODERICK.
The
venerable Sebastiano, Bishop of
Salamanca
,
declares that the inscription on the tomb
at Viseo in Portugal, existed in his time, and
that he had seen it. A particular account of
the exile and hermit life of Roderick is
furnished
by Berganza, on the authority of
Portuguese
chronicles.
Algunos historiadores Portugueses asseguran,
que el Rey Rodrigo, perdida la battalla, huyo a
tierra de Merida, y se recogio en el monasterio
de Cauliniano, en donde, arrepentido de sus
culpas
,
procuro confessarlas con muchas lagrimas.
Deseando mas retiro, y escogiendo por
companero
a un monge llamado Roman, y elevando la
Imagen de Nazareth, que Cyriaco monge de
nacion griego avra traido de Jerusalem al
monasterio
de Cauliniano, se subio  un monte muy
aspero, que estaba sobre el mar, junto al lugar
de Pederneyra. Vivio Rodrigo en compania de
el monge en el hueco de una gruta por espacio
de un ano; despues se passo  la ermita de san
Miguel, que estaba cerca de Viseo, en donde
murio y fue sepultado.
Puedese ver esta relacion en las notas de Don
Thomas Tamayo sobre Paulo deacano. El
chronicon de san Millan, que llega hasta el ano
883, deze que, hasta su tiempo, si ignora el fin
del Rey Rodrigo. Pocos anos despues el Rey
Don Alonzo el Magno, avindo ganado la
ciudad
de Viseo, encontro en una iglesia el
epitafio
que en romance dizeaqui yaze Rodrigo,
ultimo Rey de los Godos.Berganza, L. 1. c. 13.
THE CAVE OF HERCULES.
As
the story of the necromantic tower is one
of the most famous as well as least credible
points in the history of Don Roderick, it may be
well to fortify or buttress it by some account of
another marvel of the city of Toledo. This
ancient
city, which dates its existence almost from
the time of the flood, claiming as its founder Tubal,
the son of Japhet, and grandson of Noah,
[24]
[24]
Salazar, Hist. Gran. Cardinal. Prologo, vol. 1. plan 1.
has
been the warrior hold of many generations, and
a strange diversity of races. It bears traces of
the artifices and divices of its various occupants,
and is full of mysteries and subjects for
antiquarian
conjecture and perplexity. It is built upon
a high rocky promontory, with the Tagus
brawling
round its base, and is overlooked by cragged
and precipitous hills. These hills abound with
clefts and caverns; and the promontory itself,
on which the city is built, bears traces of vaults
and subterraneous habitations, which are
occasionally
discovered under the ruins of ancient
houses, or beneath the churches and convents.
These are supposed by some to have been the
habitations or retreats of the primitive
inhabitants
;
for it was the custom of the ancients,
according to Pliny, to make caves in high and
rocky places, and live in them through fear of
floods; and such a precaution, says the worthy
Don Pedro de Roxas, in his history of Toledo, was
natural enough among the first Toledans, seeing
that they founded their city shortly after the
deluge, while the memory of it was still fresh in
their minds.
Some have supposed these secret caves and
vaults to have been places of concealment of
the inhabitants and their treasure, during times
of war and violence; or rude temples for the
performance of religious ceremonies in times
of persecution. There are not wanting other,
and grave writers, who give them a still darker
purpose. In these caves, say they, were taught
the diabolical mysteries of magic; and here
were performed those infernal ceremonies and
incantations horrible in the eyes of God and
man. History, says the worthy Don Pedro
de Roxas, is full of accounts that the magi
taught and performed their magic and their
superstitious rites in profound caves and secret
places; because as this art of the devil was
prohibited
from the very origin of christianity, they
always sought for hidden places in which to
practise
it. In the time of the Moors this art, we are
told, was publicly taught at their universities, the
same as astronomy, philosophy, and
mathematics
,
and at no place was it cultivated with more
success than at Toledo. Hence this city has
ever been darkly renowned for mystic science;
insomuch that the magic art was called by the
French, and by other nations, the Arte
Toledana
.
Of all the marvels, however, of this ancient
picturesque, romantic, and necromantic city,
none in modern times surpass the cave of
Hercules
,
if we may take the account of Don Pedro
de Roxas for authentic. The entrance to this
cave is within the church of San Gines, situated
in nearly the highest part of the city. The
portal
12*
is secured by massy doors, opening within
the walls of the church, but which are kept
rigorously
closed. The cavern extends under the
city and beneath the bed of the Tagus to the
distance of three leagues beyond. It is, in some
places, of rare architecture, built of small stones
curiously wrought, and supported by columns
and arches.
In the year 1546 an account of this cavern was
given to the archbishop and cardinal Don Juan
Martinez Siliceo, who, desirous of examining it,
ordered the entrance to be cleaned. A number
of persons furnished with provisions, lanterns,
and cords, then went in, and having proceeded
about half a league, came to a place where
there was a kind of chapel or temple, having a
table or altar, with several statues of bronze in
niches or on pedestals.
While they were regarding this mysterious
scene of ancient worship or incantation, one of
the statues fell, with a noise that echoed through
the cavern, and smote the hearts of the
adventurers
with terror. Recovering from their alarm
they proceeded onward, but were soon again
dismayed
by a roaring and rushing sound that
increased
as they advanced. It was made by a
furious and turbulent stream, the dark waters of
which were too deep and broad and rapid to be
crossed. By this time their hearts were so chilled
with awe, and their thoughts so bewildered, that
they could not seek any other passage by which
they might advance; so they turned back and
hastened out of the cave. It was night-fall when
they sallied forth, and they were so much
affected
by the terror they had undergone, and by the
cold and damp air of the cavern, to which they
were the more sensible from its being in the
summer, that all of them fell sick and several
of them died. Whether the archbishop was
encouraged
to pursue his research and gratify his
curiosity, the history does not mention.
Alonzo Telles de Meneses, in his history of
the world, records, that not long before his
time a boy of Toledo, being threatened with
punishment by his master, fled and took refuge
in this cave. Fancying his pursuer at his heels,
he took no heed of the obscurity or coldness of
the cave, but kept groping and blundering
forward
,
until he came forth at three leagues
distance
from the city.
Another and very popular story of this cave,
current among the common people, was, that in
its remote recesses lay concealed a great
treasure
of gold, left there by the Romans.
Whoever
would reach this precious hoard must pass
through several caves or grottoes; each having
its particular terror, and all under the
guardianship
of a ferocious dog, who has the key of all
the gates, and watches day and night. At the
approach of any one, he shows his teeth, and
makes a hideous growling; but no adventurer
after wealth has had courage to brave a contest
with this terrific cerberus.
The most intrepid candidate on record was a
poor man who had lost his all, and had those
grand incentives to desperate enterprise, a wife
and a large family of children. Hearing the
story of this cave, he determined to venture
alone in search of the treasure. He
accordingly
entered, and wandered many hours,
bewildered
,
about the cave. Often would he have
returned, but the thoughts of his wife and
children
urged him on. At length he arrived near
to the place where he supposed the treasure lay
hidden; but here, to his dismay, he beheld the
floor of the cavern strown with human bones;
doubtless the remains of adventurers like
himself
,
who had been torn to pieces.
Losing all courage, he now turned and sought
his way out of the cave. Horrors thickened
upon him as he fled. He beheld direful
phantoms
glaring and gibbering around him, and
heard the sound of pursuit in the echoes of his
footsteps. He reached his home overcome
with affright; several hours elapsed before he
could recover speech to tell his story, and he
died on the following day.
The judicious Don Pedro de Roxas holds the
account of the buried treasure for fabulous, but
the adventure of this unlucky man for very
possible
;
being led on by avarice, or rather the
hope of retrieving a desperate fortune. He,
moreover, pronounces his dying shortly after
coming forth as very probable; because the
darkness of the cave; its coldness; the fright
at finding the bones; the dread of meeting the
imaginary dog, all joining to operate upon a
man who was past the prime of his days, and
enfeebled by poverty and scanty food, might
easily cause his death.
Many have considered this cave as intended
originally for a sally or retreat from the city in
case it should be taken; an opinion rendered
probable, it is thought, by its grandeur and
great extent.
The learned Salazar de Mendoza, however,
in his history of the grand cardinal of Spain,
affirms it as an established fact, that it was first
wrought out of the rock by Tubal, the son of
Japhet, and grandson of Noah, and afterwards
repaired and greatly augmented by Hercules
the Egyptian, who made it his habitation after
he had erected his pillars at the straits of
Gibraltar
.
Here, too, it is said, he read magic to
his followers, and taught them those supernatural
arts by which he accomplished his vast achieve
ments. Others think that it was a temple
dedicated
to Hercules; as was the case, according
to Pomponius Mela, with the great cave in the
rock of Gibraltar; certain it is, that it has
always
borne the name of The Cave of
Hercules
.
There are not wanting some who have
insinuated
that it was a work dating from the time
of the Romans, and intended as a cloaca or
sewer of the city; but such a grovelling
insinuation
will be treated with proper scorn by the
reader, after the nobler purposes to which he
has heard this marvellous cavern consecrated.
From all the circumstances here adduced from
learned and reverend authors, it will be
perceived
that Toledo is a city fruitful of marvels,
and that the necromantic tower of Hercules has
more solid foundation than most edifices of
similar import in ancient history.
The writer of these pages will venture to add
the result of his personal researches respecting
the far famed cavern in question. Rambling
about Toledo in the year 1826, in company with
a small knot of antiquity hunters, among whom
was an eminent British painter,
[25]
[25]
Mr. D. Wkie.
and an English
nobleman,
Lord Mahn.
who has since distinguished himself
in Spanish historical research, we directed our
steps to the church of San Gines, and inquired
for the portal of the secret cavern. The
sacristan
was a voluble and communicative man, and
one not likely to be niggard of his tongue about
any thing he knew, or slow to boast of any
marvel
pertaining to his church; but he professed
utter ignorance of the existence of any such
portal. He remembered to have heard,
however
,
that immediately under the entrance to the
church there was an arch of mason work,
apparently
the upper part of some subterranean
portal; but that all had been covered up and a
pavement laid down thereon; so that whether
it lead to the magic cave or the necromantic
tower remains a mystery, and so must remain
until some monarch or archbishop shall again
have courage and authority to break the spell.
LEGEND OF THE
SUBJUGATION OF SPAIN.
13
LEGEND
OF THE
SUBJUGATION OF SPAIN.
[26]
[26]
In this legend most of the facts respecting the Arab
inroads
into Spain are on the authority of Arabian writers; who
had the most accurate means of information. Those
relative
to the Spaniards are chiefly from old Spanish chronicles.
It is to be remarked that the Arab accounts have most the air
of verity, and the events as they relate them, are in the
ordinary
course of common life. The Spanish accounts, on the
contrary, are full of the marvellous; for there were no greater
romancers than the monkish chroniclers.
CHAPTER I.
Consternation of Spain.Conduct of the
Conquerors
.Missives
between Taric and Muza
.
The
overthrow of King Roderick and his
army on the banks of the Guadalete, threw open
all southern Spain to the inroads of the moslems.
The whole country fled before them; villages and
hamlets were hastily abandoned; the inhabitants
placed their aged and infirm, their wives and
children, and their most precious effects, on
mules and other beasts of burden, and, driving
before them their flocks and herds, made for
distant
parts of the land; for the fastnesses of the
mountains, and for such of the cities as yet
possessed
walls and bulwarks. Many gave out,
faint and weary, by the way, and fell into the
hands of the enemy; others, at the distant sight
of a turban or a moslem standard, or on hearing
the clangour of a trumpet, abandoned their flocks
and herds and hastened their flight with their
families
.
If their pursuers gained upon them, they
threw by their household goods and whatever
was of burthen, and thought themselves fortunate
to escape, naked and destitute, to a place of
refuge
.
Thus the roads were covered with
scattered
flocks and herds, and with spoil of all kind.
The Arabs, however, were not guilty of
wanton
cruelty or ravage; on the contrary, they
conducted
themselves with a moderation but seldom
witnessed in more civilized conquerors. Taric
el Tuerto, though a thorough man of the sword,
and one whose whole thoughts were warlike, yet
evinced wonderful judgment and discretion. He
checked the predatory habits of his troops with
a rigorous hand. They were forbidden, under
pain of severe punishment, to molest any
peaceable
and unfortified towns, or any unarmed and
unresisting people, who remained quiet in their
homes. No spoil was permitted to be made
excepting
in fields of battle, in camps of routed
foes, or in cities taken by the sword.
Taric had little need to exercise his severity;
his orders were obeyed through love, rather than
fear, for he was the idol of his soldiery. They
admired his restless and daring spirit, which
nothing
could dismay. His gaunt and sinewy form,
his fiery eye, his visage seamed with scars,
were suited to the hardihood of his deeds; and
when mounted on his foaming steed, careering
the field of battle with quivering lance or flashing
scimitar, his Arabs would greet him with shouts
of enthusiasm. But what endeared him to them
more than all was his soldier-like contempt of
gain. Conquest was his only passion; glory the
only reward he coveted. As to the spoil of the
conquered, he shared it freely among his
followers
,
and squandered his own portion with
open-handed
generosity.
While Taric was pushing his triumphant course
through Andalusia, tidings of his stupendous
victory
on the banks of the Guadalete were carried
to Muza ben Nozier. Messengers after
messengers
arrived, vieing who should most extol the
achievements of the conqueror and the grandeur
of the conquest. Taric, said they, has
over-thrown
the whole force of the unbelievers in one
mighty battle. Their king is slain; thousands
and tens of thousands of their warriors are
destroyed
;
the whole land lies at our mercy; and
city after city is surrendering to the victorious
arms of Taric.
The heart of Muza ben Nozier sickened at
these tidings, and, instead of rejoicing at the
success
of the cause of Islam, he trembled with
jealous
fear lest the triumphs of Taric in Spain
should eclipse his own victories in Africa. He
despatched missives to the Caliph Waled
Almanzor
,
informing him of these new conquests, but
taking the whole glory to himself, and making no
mention of the services of Taric; or at least, only
mentioning him incidentally as a subordinate
commander. The battles, said he, have
been terrible as the day of judgment; but by the
aid of Allah we have gained the victory.
He then prepared in all haste to cross over
into Spain and assume the command of the
conquering
army; and he wrote a letter in advance
to interrupt Taric in the midst of his carrer.
Wherever this letter may find thee, said he,
I charge thee halt with thy army and await my
coming. Thy force is inadequate to the
subjugation
of the land, and by rashly venturing, thou
mayst lose every thing. I will be with thee
speedily, with a reinforcement of troops
competent
to so great an enterprise.
The letter overtook the veteran Taric while
in the full glow of triumphant success; having
13
overrun some of the richest part of Andalusia,
and just received the surrender of the city of
Ecija. As he read the letter the blood mantled
in his sunburnt cheek and fire kindled in his eye,
for he penetrated the motives of Muza. He
suppressed
his wrath, however, and turning with a
bitter expression of forced composure to his
captains
,
Unsaddle your steeds, said he, and
plant your lances in the earth; set up your tents
and take your repose: for we must await the
coming of the Wali with a mighty force to assist
us in our conquest.
The Arab warriors broke forth with loud
murmurs
at these words: What need have we of
aid, cried they, when the whole country is
flying before us; and what better commander
can we have than Taric to lead us on to
victory
?
Count Julian, also, who was present, now
hastened
to give his traitorous counsel.
Why pause, cried he, at this precious
moment
?
The great army of the Goths is
vanquished
,
and their nobles are slaughtered or
dispersed
.
Follow up your blow before the land
can recover from its panic. Overrun the
provinces
,
seize upon the cities, make yourself
master
of the capital, and your conquest is
complete
.
[27]
[27]
Conde, p. 1. c. 10.
The advice of Julian was applauded by all
the Arab chieftains, who were impatient of any
interruption in their career of conquest. Taric
was easily persuaded to what was the wish of
his heart. Disregarding the letter of Muza,
therefore
,
he prepared to pursue his victories. For
this purpose he ordered a review of his troops
on the plain of Ecija. Some were mounted on
steeds which they had brought from Africa; the
rest he supplied with horses taken from the
christians. He repeated his general orders, that
they should inflict no wanton injury, nor plunder
any place that offered no resistance. They were
forbidden, also, to encumber themselves with
booty, or even with provisions; but were to scour
the country with all speed, and seize upon all its
fortresses and strong holds.
He then divided his host into three several
armies. One he placed under the command of
the Greek renegado, Magued el Rumi, a man of
desperate courage; and sent it against the ancient
city of Cordova. Another was sent against the
city of Malaga, and was led by Zayd ben Kesadi,
aided by the Bishop Oppas. The third was led
by Taric himself, and with this he determined to
make a wide sweep through the kingdom.
[28]
[28]
Cronica de Espaa, de Alonzo el Sabio, P. 3. c. 1.
CHAPTER II.
Capture of Granada.Subjugation of the
Alpuxarra
Mountains
.
The
terror of the arms of Taric ben Zeyad
went before him; and, at the same time, the
report
of his lenity to those who submitted without
resistance. Wherever he appeared the towns,
for the most part, sent forth some of their
principal
inhabitants to proffer a surrender; for they
were destitute of fortifications, and their fighting
men had perished in battle. They were all
received
into allegiance to the caliph, and were
protected from pillage or molestation.
After marching some distance through the
country, he entered one day a vast and beautiful
plain, interspersed with villages, adorned with
groves and gardens, watered by winding rivers,
and surrounded by lofty mountains. It was the
famous vega, or plain of Granada, destined to
be for ages the favourite abode of the moslems.
When the Arab conquerors beheld this delicious
vega, they were lost in admiration; for it
seemed
as if the prophet had given them a paradise
on earth, as a reward for their services in his
cause.
Taric approached the city of Granada, which
had a formidable aspect, seated on lofty hills and
fortified with Gothic walls and towers, and with
the red castle or citadel, built in times of old by
the Phnicians or the Romans. As the Arab
chieftain eyed the place, he was pleased with its
stern warrior look, contrasting with the smiling
beauty of its vega, and the freshness and
voluptuous
abundance of its hills and valleys. He
pitched his tents before its walls, and made
preparations
to attack it with all his force.
The city, however, bore but the semblance of
power. The flower of its youth had perished in
the battle of the Guadalete; many of the
principal
inhabitants had fled to the mountains, and few
remained in the city excepting old men, women
and children, and a number of Jews, which last
were well disposed to take part with the
conquerors
.
The city, therefore, readily capitulated,
and was received into vassalage on favourable
terms. The inhabitants were to retain their
property, their laws and their religion; their
churches and priests were to be respected; and
no other tribute was required of them than such
as they had been accustomed to pay to their
Gothic
kings.
On taking possession of Granada, Taric garri
soned the towers and castles, and left as alcayde
or governour a chosen warrior named Betiz
Aben Habuz, a native of Arabia Felix, who had
distinguished himself by his valour and abilities.
This alcayde subsequently made himself king of
Granada, and built a palace on one of its hills;
the remains of which may be seen at the present
day.
[29]
[29]
The house shown as the ancient residence of Aben
Habuz is called
la Casa del Gallo
, or the house of the
weathercock
;
so named, says Pedraza, in his history of Granada,
from a bronze figure of an Arab horseman, armed with lance
and buckler, which once surmounted it, and which varied
with every wind. On this warlike weathercock was inscribed,
in Arabic characters,
Even the delights of Granada had no power to
detain the active and ardent Taric. To the east
of the city he beheld a lofty chain of mountains,
towering to the sky, and crowned with shining
snow. These were the Mountains of the Sun
and Air; and the perpetual snows on their
summits
gave birth to streams that fertilized the
plains. In their bosoms, shut up among cliffs
and precipices, were many small valleys of great
beauty and abundance. The inhabitants were a
bold and hardy race, who looked upon their
mountains as everlasting fortresses that could
never be taken. The inhabitants of the
surrounding
country had fled to these natural
fastnesses
for refuge, and driven thither their flocks
and herds.
Taric felt that the dominion he had acquired
of the plains would be insecure until he had
penetrated and subdued these haughty
mountains
.
Leaving Aben Habuz, therefore, in
command
of Granada, he marched with his army
across the vega, and entered the folds of the
Sierra, which stretch towards the south. The
inhabitants fled with affright on hearing the
moorish trumpets, or beholding the approach
of the turbaned horsemen, and plunged deeper
into the recesses of their mountains. As the
army advanced, the roads became more and
more rugged and difficult; sometimes climbing
great rocky heights, and at other times
descending
abruptly into deep ravines, the beds of
winter
torrents. The mountains were strangely wild
and sterile; broken into cliffs and precipices of
variegated marble. At their feet were little
valleys enamelled with groves and gardens,
interlaced
with silver streams, and studded with
villages and hamlets; but all deserted by their
inhabitants. No one appeared to dispute the
inroad of the moslems, who continued their
march with increasing confidence, their pennons
fluttering from rock and cliff, and the valleys
echoing to the din of trumpet, drum, and
cymbal
.
At length they came to a defile where the
mountains seemed to have been rent asunder to
make way for a foaming torrent. The narrow
and broken road wound along the dizzy edge of
precipices, until it came to where a bridge was
thrown across the chasm. It was a fearful and
gloomy pass; great beetling cliffs overhung the
road, and the torrent roared below. This awful
defile has ever been famous in the warlike
history
of those mountains, by the name, in former
times, of the Barranco de Tocos, and at present
of the bridge of Tablete. The Saracen army
entered fearlessly into the pass; a part had
already
crossed the bridge, and was slowly toiling
up the rugged road on the opposite side, when
great shouts arose, and every cliff appeared
suddenly
peopled with furious foes. In an instant
a deluge of missiles of every sort was rained
upon the astonished moslems. Darts, arrows,
javelins, and stones, came whistling down,
singling
out the most conspicuous cavaliers; and at
times great masses of rock, bounding and
thundering
along the mountain side, crushed whole
ranks at once, or hurled horses and riders over
the edge of the precipices.
It was in vain to attempt to brave this
mountain
warfare. The enemy were beyond the
reach of missiles, and safe from pursuit; and the
horses of the Arabs were here an incumbrance
rather than an aid. The trumpets sounded a
retreat, and the army retired in tumult and
confusion
,
harassed by the enemy until extricated
from the defile. Taric, who had beheld cities
and castles surrendering without a blow, was
enraged at being braved by a mere horde of
mountain boors, and made another attempt to
penetrate the mountains, but was again waylaid
and opposed with horrible slaughter.
The fiery son of Ishmael foamed with rage at
being thus checked in his career and foiled in
his revenge. He was on the point of
abandoning
the attempt, and returning to the vega, when
a christian boor sought his camp, and was
admitted
to his presence. The miserable wretch
possessed a cabin and a little patch of ground
among the mountains, and offered, if these should
be protected from ravage, to inform the Arab
commander of a way by which troops of horse
might be safely introduced into the bosom of the
Sierra, and the whole subdued. The name of
14
this caitiff was Fandino, and it deserves to be
perpetually recorded with ignominy. His case
is an instance how much it is in the power, at
times, of the most insignificant being to do
mischief
,
and how all the valour of the
magnanimous
and the brave, may be defeated by the
treason of the selfish and the despicable.
Instructed by this traitor, the Arab
commander
caused ten thousand foot soldiers and four
thousand horsemen, commanded by a valiant
captain, named Ibrahim Albuxarra, to be
conveyed
by sea to the little port of Adra, at the
Mediteranean foot of the mountains. Here they
landed, and, guided by the traitor, penetrated to
the heart of the Sierra, laying every thing waste.
The brave mountaineers, thus hemmed in
between
two armies, destitute of fortresses and
without hope of succour, were obliged to
capitulate
but their valour was not without avail, for
never, even in Spain, did vanquished people
surrender
on prouder or more honourable terms.
We have named the wretch who betrayed his
native mountains; let us, equally, record the
name of him whose pious patriotism saved them
from desolation. It was the reverend Bishop
Centerio. While the warriors rested on their
arms in grim and menacing tranquility among
the cliffs, this venerable prelate descended to the
Arab tents in the valley, to conduct the capitu
lation. In stipulating for the safety of his
people
,
he did not forget that they were brave men,
and that they still had weapons in their hands.
He obtained conditions accordingly. It was
agreed that they should be permitted to retain
their houses, lands, and personal effects; that
they should be unmolested in their religion, and
their temples and priests respected; and that
they should pay no other tribute than such as
they had been accustomed to render to their
kings. Should they prefer to leave the country
and remove to any part of christendom, they
were to be allowed to sell their possessions; and
to take with them the money, and all their other
effects.
[30]
[30]
Pedraza, Hist. Granad. p. 3. c. 2. Bleda cronica, L. 2. c. 10.
Ibrahim Albuxarra remained in command of
the territory, and the whole sierra, or chain of
mountains, took his name, which has since been
slightly corrupted into that of the Alpuxarras.
The subjugation of this rugged region, however,
was for a long time incomplete; many of the
christians maintained a wild and hostile
independence
,
living in green glens and scanty
valleys
among the heights; and the sierra of the
Alpuxarras, has, in all ages, been one of the
most difficult parts of Andalusia to be subdued.
Dice el sabio Aben Habuz
Que asi se defiende el Andaluz.
(In this way, says Aben Habuz the wise,
The Andalusian his foe defies.
The Casa del Gallo, even until within twenty years,
possessed
two great halls beautifully decorated with morisco
reliefs. It then caught fire and was so damaged as to require
to be nearly rebuilt. It is now a manufactory of coarse
canvas, and has nothing of the moorish character remaining.
It commands a beautiful view of the city and the vega.
CHAPTER III.
Expedition of Magued against Cordova.
Defence
of the patriot Pelistes
.
While
the veteran Taric was making this
wide circuit through the land, the expedition
under Magued the renegado proceeded against
the city of Cordova. The inhabitants of that
ancient place had beheld the great army of
Don Roderick spreading like an inundation
over the plain of the Guadalquivir, and had
felt confident that it must sweep the infidel
invaders from the land. What then was
their dismay, when scattered fugitives, wild
with horror and affright, brought them tidings
of the entire overthrow of that mighty host,
and the disappearance of the king! In the
midst of their consternation, the Gothic noble,
Pelistes, arrived at their gates, haggard with
fatigue
of body, and anguish of mind, and
leading
a remnant of his devoted cavaliers, who
had survived the dreadful battle of the
Guadalete
.
The people of Cordova knew the valiant
and steadfast spirit of Pelistes, and rallied round
him as a last hope. Roderick is fallen, cried
they, and we have neither king nor captain;
be unto us as a sovereign; take command of
our city, and protect us in this hour of peril!
The heart of Pelistes was free from ambition,
and was too much broken by grief to be
flattered
by the offer of command; but he felt
above every thing for the woes of his country,
and was ready to assume any desperate service
in her cause. Your city said he, is
surrounded
by walls and towers, and may yet check
the progress of the foe. Promise to stand by
me to the last, and I will undertake your
defence
.
The inhabitants all promised implicit
obedience and devoted zeal; for what will not
the inhabitants of a wealthy city promise and
profess in a moment of alarm. The instant,
however, that they heard of the approach of
the moslem troops, the wealthier citizens packed
up their effects and fled to the mountains, or to
the distant city of Toledo. Even the monks
collected the riches of their convents and
churches, and fled. Pelistes, though he saw
himself thus deserted by those who had the
greatest interest in the safety of the city, yet
determined not to abandon its defence. He
had still his faithful though scanty band of
cavaliers, and a number of fugitives of the
army; in all amounting to about four hundred
men. He stationed guards, therefore, at the
gates and in the towers, and made every
preparation
for a desperate resistance.
In the meantime, the army of moslems and
apostate christians advanced, under the
command
of the Greek renegado, Magued, and
guided by the traitor Julian. While they were
yet at some distance from the city, their scouts
brought to them a shepherd, whom they had
surprised on the banks of the Guadalquivir.
The trembling hind was an inhabitant of
Cordova
,
and revealed to them the state of the
place, and the weakness of its garrison.
And the walls and gates, said Magued,
are they strong and well guarded?
The walls are high, and of wondrous
strength, replied the shepherd, and soldiers
hold watch at the gates by day and night. But
there is one place where the city may be
secretly
entered. In a part of the wall, not far
from the bridge, the battlements are broken,
and there is a breach at some height from the
ground. Hard by stands a fig tree, by the aid
of which the wall may easily be scaled.
Having received this information, Magued
halted with his army, and sent forward several
renegado christians, partisans of Count Julian,
who entered Cordova as if flying before the
enemy. On a dark and tempestuous night, the
moslems approached to the end of the bridge
which crosses the Guadalquivir, and remained
in ambush. Magued took a small party of
chosen men, and, guided by the shepherd,
forded
the stream and groped silently along the
wall to the place where stood the fig tree. The
traitors, who had fraudulently entered the city,
were ready on the wall to render assistance.
Magued ordered his followers to make use of
the long folds of their turbans instead of cords,
and succeeded without difficulty in clambering
into the breach.
Drawing their scimitars, they now hastened
to the gate which opened towards the bridge;
the guards, suspecting no assault from within,
were taken by surprise, and easily
overpowered
;
the gate was thrown open, and the army
that had remained in ambush, rushed over the
bridge, and entered without opposition.
The alarm had by this time spread
throughout
the city; but already a torrent of armed
men was pouring through the streets. Pelistes
sallied forth with his cavaliers and such of the
soldiery as he could collect, and endeavoured
to repel the foe; but every effort was in vain.
The christians were slowly driven from street to
street, and square to square, disputing every inch
of ground; until, finding another body of the
enemy
approaching to attack them in rear, they took
refuge in a convent, and succeeded in throwing
to and barring the ponderous doors. The
Moors attempted to force the gates, but were
assailed with such showers of missiles from the
windows and battlements that they were obliged
to retire. Pelistes examined the convent, and
found it admirably calculated for defence. It
was of great extent, with spacious courts and
cloisters. The gates were massive, and secured
with bolts and bars; the walls were of great
thickness; the windows high and grated; there
was a great tank or cistern of water, and the
friars, who had fled from the city, had left
behind
a good supply of provisions. Here, then,
Pelistes proposed to make a stand, and to
endeavour
to hold out until succour should arrive
from some other city. His proposition was
received with shouts by his loyal cavaliers; not
one of whom but was ready to lay down his
life in the service of his commander.
CHAPTER IV.
Defence of the Convent of St. George by Pelistes
.
For
three long and anxious months did the
good knight Pelistes and his cavaliers defend
their sacred asylum against the repeated assaults
of the infidels. The standard of the true faith
was constantly displayed from the loftiest tower,
and a fire blazed there throughout the night, as
signals of distress to the surrounding country.
The watchman from his turret kept a wary look
out over the land, hoping in every cloud of dust
to descry the glittering helms of christian
warriors
.
The country, however, was forlorn and
abandoned, or if perchance a human being was
perceived, it was some Arab horseman,
careering
the plain of the Guadalquivir as fearlessly as
if it were his native desert.
By degrees the provisions of the convent were
consumed, and the cavaliers had to slay their
horses, one by one, for food. They suffered the
wasting miseries of famine without a murmur,
and always met their commander with a smile.
Pelistes, however, read their sufferings in their
wan and emaciated countenances, and felt more
for them than for himself. He was grieved at
heart that such loyalty and valour should only
lead to slavery or death, and resolved to make
one desperate attempt for their deliverance.
Assembling them one day in the court of the
convent
,
he disclosed to them his purpose.
Comrades and brothers in arms, said he,
it is needless to conceal danger from brave
men. Our case is desperate; our countrymen
either know not or heed not our situation, or
have not the means to help us. There is but one
chance of escape; it is full of peril, and, as your
leader, I claim the right to brave it. Tomorrow
at break of day I will sally forth and make for
the city gates at the moment of their being
opened
;
no one will suspect a solitary horseman; I
shall be taken for one of those recreant
christians
who have basely mingled with the enemy.
If I succeed in getting out of the city I will hasten
to Toledo for assistance. In all events I shall
be back in less than twenty days. Keep a
vigilant
look out toward the nearest mountain. If
you behold five lights blazing upon its summit,
be assured I am at hand with succour, and
prepare
yourselves to sally forth upon the city as I
attack the gates. Should I fail in obtaining aid
I will return to die with you.
When he had finished, his warriors would fain
have severally undertaken the enterprise, and
they remonstrated against his exposing himself
to such peril; but he was not to be shaken from
his purpose. On the following morning, ere the
break of day, his horse was led forth,
caparisoned
,
into the court of the convent, and Pelistes
appeared in complete armour. Assembling his
cavaliers in the chapel, he prayed with them for
some time before the altar of the holy Virgin.
Then rising and standing in the midst of them,
God knows, my companions, said he,
whether
we have any longer a country; if not, better
were we in our graves. Loyal and true have
ye been to me, and loyal have ye been to my
son, even to the hour of his death; and grieved
am I that I have no other means of proving my
love for you, than by adventuring my worthless
life for your deliverance. All I ask of you
before
I go, is a solemn promise to defend
yourselves
to the last like brave men and christian
cavaliers, and never to renounce your faith, or
throw yourselves on the mercy of the renegado
Magued, or the traitor Julian. They all pledged
their words, and took a solemn oath to the same
effect before the altar.
Pelistes then embraced them one by one, and
gave them his benediction, and as he did so his
heart yearned over them, for he felt towards
them, not merely as a companion in arms and as
a commander, but as a father; and he took leave
of them as if he had been going to his death.
The warriors, on their part, crowded round him
in silence, kissing his hands and the hem of his
surcoat, and many of the sternest shed tears.
The gray of the dawning had just streaked
the east, when Pelistes took lance in hand, hung
his shield about his neck, and mounting his steed,
issued quietly forth from a postern of the
convent
.
He paced slowly through the vacant
streets, and the tramp of his steed echoed afar in
that silent hour; but no one suspected a warrior,
moving thus singly and tranquilly in an armed
city, to be an enemy. He arrived at the gate
just at the hour of opening; a foraging party was
entering with cattle and with beasts of burden,
and he passed unheeded through the throng.
As soon as he was out of sight of the soldiers
who guarded the gate, he quickened his pace,
and at length, galloping at full speed, succeeded
in gaining the mountains. Here he paused, and
alighted at a solitary farm house to breathe his
panting steed; but had scarce put foot to ground
when he heard the distant sound of pursuit, and
beheld a horseman spurring up the mountain.
Throwing himself again upon his steed, he
abandoned the road and galloped across the
rugged heights. The deep dry channel of a
torrent
checked his career, and his horse stumbling
upon the margin, rolled with his rider to the
bottom. Pelistes was sorely bruised by the fall,
and his whole visage was bathed in blood. His
horse, too, was maimed and unable to stand, so
that there was no hope of escape. The enemy
drew near, and proved to be no other than
Magued
the renegado general, who had perceived
him as he issued forth from the city and had
followed
singly in pursuit. Well met, seor
alcayde! exclaimed he, and overtaken in
good time. Surrender yourself my prisoner.
Pelistes made no other reply than by
drawing
his sword, bracing his shield, and
preparing
for defence. Magued, though an apostate,
and a fierce warrior, possessed some sparks of
knightly magnanimity. Seeing his adversary
dismounted, he disdained to take him at a
disadvantage
,
but, alighting, tied his horse to a
tree.
The conflict that ensued was desperate and
doubtful, for seldom had two warriors met so well
matched or of equal prowess. Their shields were
hacked to pieces, the ground was strewed with
fragments of their armour, and stained with their
blood. They paused repeatedly to take breath;
regarding each other with wonder and
admiration
.
Pelistes, however, had been previously
injured by his fall, and fought to great
disadvantage
.
The renegado perceived it, and sought
not to slay him, but to take him alive. Shifting
15
his ground continually, he wearied his antagonist,
who was growing weaker and weaker from the
loss of blood. At length Pelistes seemed to
summon up all his remaining strength to make a
signal blow; it was skilfully parried, and he fell
prostrate upon the ground. The renegado ran
up, and putting his foot upon his sword, and the
point of his scimitar to his throat, called upon
him to ask his life; but Pelistes lay without
sense, and as one dead. Magued then unlaced
the helmet of his vanquished enemy, and seated
himself on a rock beside him, to recover breath.
In this situation the warriors were found by
certain moorish cavaliers, who marvelled much
at the traces of that stern and bloody combat.
Finding there was yet life in the christian
knight, they laid him upon one of their horses,
and aiding Magued to remount his steed,
proceeded
slowly to the city. As the convoy
passed by the convent, the cavaliers looked
forth and beheld their commander borne along
bleeding and a captive. Furious at the sight,
they sallied forth to the rescue, but were
repulsed
by a superior force and driven back to
the great portal of the church. The enemy
entered
pell mell with them, fighting from aisle to
aisle, from altar to altar, and in the courts and
cloisters of the convent. The greater part of
the cavaliers died bravely, sword in hand; the
rest were disabled with wounds and made
prisoners
.
The convent, which was lately their
castle, was now made their prison, and in
aftertimes
,
in commemoration of this event, was
consecrated
by the name of St. George of the
Captives
.
CHAPTER V.
Meeting between the patriot Pelistes and the
traitor Julian
.
The
loyalty and prowess of the good knight
Pelistes had gained him the reverence even of
his enemies. He was for a long time disabled
by his wounds, during which he was kindly
treated
by the Arab chieftains, who strove by every
courteous means, to cheer his sadness and make
him forget that he was a captive. When he was
recovered from his wounds they gave him a
magnificent banquet, to testify their admiration
of his virtues.
Pelistes appeared at the banquet clad in
sable
armour, and with a countenance pale and
dejected, for the ills of his country evermore
preyed upon his heart. Among the assembled
guests was Count Julian, who held a high
command
in the moslem army, and was arrayed in
garments of mingled christian and morisco
fashion. Pelistes had been a close and bosom
friend of Julian in former times, and had served
with him in the wars in Africa, but when the
Count advanced to accost him with his wonted
amity, he turned away in silence and deigned
not to notice him; neither, during the whole of
the repast, did he address to him ever a word,
but treated him as one unknown.
When the banquet was nearly at a close, the
discourse turned upon the events of the war, and
the moslem chieftains, in great courtesy, dwelt
upon the merits of many of the christian
cavaliers
who had fallen in battle, and all extolled
the valour of those who had recently perished in
the defence of the convent. Pelistes remained
silent for a time, and checked the grief which
swelled within his bosom as he thought of his
devoted cavaliers. At length, lifting up his voice,
Happy are the dead, said he, for they rest
in peace, and are gone to receive the reward of
their piety and valour! I could mourn over
the loss of my companions in arms, but they have
fallen with honour, and are spared the
wretchedness
I feel in witnessing the thraldom of my
country. I have seen my only son, the pride
and hope of my age, cut down at my side; I
have beheld kindred friends and followers falling
one by one around me, and have become so
seasoned
to those losses that I have ceased to weep.
Yet there is one man over whose loss I will never
cease to grieve. He was the loved companion
of my youth, and the steadfast associate of my
15*
graver years. He was one of the most loyal of
christian knights. As a friend he was loving
and sincere; as a warrior his achievements were
above all praise. What has become of him, alas,
I know not! If fallen in battle, and I knew
where his bones were laid, whether bleaching on
the plains of Xeres, or buried in the waters of the
Guadalete, I would seek them out and enshrine
them as the relics of a sainted patriot. Or if,
like many of his companions in arms, he should
be driven to wander in foreign lands, I would
join him in his hapless exile, and we would mourn
together over the desolation of our country!
Even the hearts of the Arab warriors were
touched by the lament of the good Pelistes, and
they saidWho was this peerless friend in
whose praise thou art so fervent?
His name, replied Pelistes, was Count
Julian.
The moslem warriors stared with surprise.
Noble cavalier, exclaimed they, has grief
disordered thy senses? Behold thy friend living
and standing before thee, and yet thou dost not
know him! This, this is Count Julian!
Upon this, Pelistes turned his eyes upon the
count, and regarded him for a time with a lofty
and stern demeanour; and the countenance of
Julian darkened, and was troubled, and his eye
sank beneath the regard of that loyal and
honourable
cavalier. And Pelistes said, In the name
of God, I charge thee, man unknown! to answer.
Dost thou presume to call thyself Count Julian?
The count reddened with anger at these
words. Pelistes, said he, what means this
mockery, thou knowest me well; thou knowest
me for Count Julian.
I know thee for a base impostor! cried
Pelistes. Count Julian was a noble gothic
knight; but thou appearest in mongrel
moorish
garb. Count Julian was a christian, faithful
and devout; but I behold in thee a renegado
and an infidel. Count Julian was ever loyal to
his king, and foremost in his country's cause;
were he living he would be the first to put shield
on neck and lance in rest, to clear the land of
her invaders; but thou art a hoary traitor! thy
hands are stained with the royal blood of the
Goths, and thou has betrayed thy country and
thy God. Therefore, I again repeat, man
unknown
!
if thou sayest thou art Count Julian, thou
liest! My friend, alas, is dead; and thou art
some fiend from hell, which hast taken possession
of his body to dishonour his memory and render
him an abhorrence among men! So saying,
Pelistes turned his back upon the traitor, and
went forth from the banquet; leaving Count
Julian overwhelmed with confusion, and an
object
of scorn to all the moslem cavaliers.
CHAPTER VI.
How Taric el Tuerto captured the city of Toledo
through the aid of the Jews, and how he found
the famous talismanic table of Solomon
.
While
these events were passing in Cordova,
the one-eyed Arab general, Taric el Tuerto,
having subdued the city and vega of Granada,
and the Mountains of the Sun and Air, directed
his march into the interior of the kingdom to
attack
the ancient city of Toledo, the capital of the
gothic kings. So great was the terror caused
by the rapid conquests of the invaders, that at
the very rumour of their approach, many of the
inhabitants, though thus in the very citadel of the
kingdom, abandoned it and fled to the
mountains
with their families. Enough remained,
however, to have made a formidable defence;
and, as the city was seated on a lofty rock,
surrounded
by massive walls and towers, and almost
girdled by the Tagus, it threatened a long
resistance
.
The Arab warriors pitched their tents in
the vega, on the borders of the river, and
prepared
for a tedious siege.
One evening, as Taric was seated in his tent
meditating on the mode in which he should
assail
this rock-built city, certain of the patroles of
the camp brought a stranger before him. As
we were going our rounds, said they, we
beheld
this man lowered down with cords from a
tower, and he delivered himself into our hands,
praying to be conducted to thy presence, that
he might reveal to thee certain things important
for thee to know.
Taric fixed his eyes upon the stranger: he
was a Jewish rabbi, with a long beard which
spread upon his gabardine, and descended even
to his girdle. What hast thou to reveal? said
he to the Israelite. What I have to reveal,
replied the other, is for thee alone to hear;
command
then, I intreat thee, that these men
withdraw
.
When they were alone he addressed
Taric in Arabic: Know, O leader of the host
of Islam, said he, that I am sent to thee on
the part of the children of Israel, resident in
Toledo. We have been oppressed and insulted
by the christians in the time of their prosperity,
and now that they are threatened with siege,
they have taken from us all our provisions and
our money; they have compelled us to work
like slaves, repairing their walls; and they oblige
us to bear arms and guard a part of the towers.
We abhor their yoke, and are ready, if thou wilt
receive us as subjects, and permit us the free
enjoyment of our religion and our property, to
deliver the towers we guard into thy hands, and
to give thee safe entrance into the city.
The Arab chief was overjoyed at this
proposition
,
and he rendered much honour to the rabbi,
and gave orders to clothe him in a costly robe,
and to perfume his beard with essences of a
pleasant odour, so that he was the most sweet
smelling of his tribe; and he said, Make thy
words good, and put me in possession of the city,
and I will do all and more than thou hast
required
,
and will bestow countless wealth upon
thee and they brethren.
Then a plan was devised between them by
which the city was to be betrayed and given up.
But how shall I be secured, said he, that all
thy tribe will fulfil what thou hast engaged, and
that this is not a stratagem to get me and my
people into your power?
This shall be thy assurance, replied the
rabbi: Ten of the principal Israelites will
come to this tent and remain as hostages.
It is enough, said Taric; and he made oath
to accomplish all that he had promised; and the
Jewish hostages came and delivered themselves
into his hands.
On a dark night, a chosen band of moslem
warriors approached the part of the walls
guarded by the Jews, and were secretly
admitted
into a postern gate and concealed within
a tower. Three thousand Arabs were at the
same time placed in ambush among rocks
and thickets, in a place on the opposite side of
the river, commanding a view of the city. On
the following morning Taric ravaged the
gardens
of the valley, and set fire to the farm
houses, and then breaking up his camp marched
off as if abandoning the siege.
The people of Toledo gazed with
astonishment
from their walls at the retiring squadrons
of the enemy, and scarcely could credit their
unexpected deliverance; before night there was
not a turban nor a hostile lance to be seen in the
vega. They attributed it all to the special
intervention
of their patron saint, Leocadia; and the
following day being palm Sunday, they sallied
forth in procession, man, woman, and child, to
the church of that blessed saint, which is situated
without the walls, that they might return thanks
for her marvellous protection.
When all Toledo had thus poured itself forth,
and was marching with cross and relic and
solemn chaunt towards the chapel, the Arabs,
who had been concealed in the tower, rushed
forth and barred the gates of the city. While
some guarded the gates, others dispersed
themselves
about the streets, slaying all who made
resistance; and others kindled a fire and made
a column of smoke on the top of the citadel. At
sight of this signal, the Arabs, in ambush, beyond
the river, rose with a great shout, and attacked
the multitude who were thronging to the church
of St. Leocadia. There was a great massacre,
although the people were without arms, and
made no resistance; and it is said, in ancient
chronicles, that it was the apostate Bishop
Oppas
who guided the moslems to their prey, and
incited them to this slaughter. The pious
reader
,
says Fray Antonio Agapida, will be slow to
believe such turpitude; but there is nothing more
venomous than the rancour of an apostate priest;
for the best things in this world, when
corrupted
,
become the worst and most baneful.
Many of the christians had taken refuge within
the church, and had barred the doors, but Oppas
commanded that fire should be set to the portals,
threatening to put every one within to the sword.
Happily the veteran Taric arrived just in time
to stay the fury of this reverend renegado. He
ordered the trumpets to call off the troops from
the carnage, and extended grace to all the
surviving
inhabitants. They were permitted to
remain in quiet possession of their homes and
effects, paying only a moderate tribute; and
they were allowed to exercise the rites of their
religion in the existing churches, to the number
of seven, but were prohibited from erecting any
others. Those who preferred to leave the city
were suffered to depart in safety, but not to take
with them any of their wealth.
Immense spoil was found by Taric in the
alcazar, or royal castle, situated on a rocky
eminence
,
in the highest part of the city. Among
the regalia treasured up in a secret chamber,
were twenty-five regal crowns of fine gold,
garnished
with jacynths, amethysts, diamonds, and
other precious stones. These were the crowns
of the different gothic kings who had reigned in
Spain; it having been the usage, on the death of
each king, to deposit his crown in this treasury,
inscribing on it his name and age.
[31]
[31]
Conde, Hist, de las Arabes en Espaa, c. 12.
When Taric was thus in possession of the city,
the Jews came to him in procession, with songs
and dances and the sound of timbrel and psaltry,
hailing him as their lord, and reminding him of
his promises.
The son of Ishmael kept his word with the
children of Israel; they were protected in the
possession of all their wealth and the exercise of
their religion, and were, moreover, rewarded
with jewels of gold and jewels of silver, and
much monies.
The stratagem of the Jews of Toledo is recorded briefly
by Bishop Lucas de Tuy, in his chronicle, but is related at
large in the chronicle of the Moor Rasis.
16
A subsequent expedition was led by Taric
against Guadalaxara, which surrendered without
resistance; he moreover captured the city of
Medina Celi, where he found an inestimable table
which had formed a part of the spoil taken at
Rome by Alaric, at the time that the sacred city
was conquered by the Goths. It was composed
of one single and entire emerald, and possessed
talismanic powers; for traditions affirm that it
was the work of genii, and had been wrought by
them for King Solomon the wise, the son of
David. This marvellous relic was carefully
preserved by Taric, as the most precious of all
his spoils, being intended by him as a present to
the caliph; and in commemoration of it the city
was called by the Arabs, Medina Almeyda; that
is to say, The City of the Table.
[32]
[32]
According to Arabian legends, this table was a mirror
revealing all great events; insomuch that by looking on it
the possessor might behold battles and sieges and feats of
chivalry, and all actions worthy of renown; and might
thus ascertain the truth of all historic transactions. It was
a mirror of history therefore; and had very probably aided
King Solomon in acquiring that prodigious knowledge and
wisdom for which he was renowned.
Having made these and other conquests of
less importance, and having collected great
quantities of gold and silver, and rich stuffs and
precious stones, Taric returned with his booty
to the royal city of Toledo.
CHAPTER VII.
Muza ben Nozier; his entrance into Spain, and
capture of Carmona
.
Let
us leave for a season the bold Taric in
his triumphant progress from city to city, while
we turn our eyes to Muza ben Nozier, the
renowned
emir of Almagreb, and the commander
in chief of the moslem forces of the west.
When that jealous chieftain had despatched his
letter commanding Taric to pause and await
his coming, he immediately made every
preparation
to enter Spain with a powerful
reinforcement
,
and to take command of the conquering
army. He left his eldest son, Abdalasis, in
Caervan, with authority over Almagreb, or
Western Africa. This Abdalasis was in the
flower of his youth, and beloved by the soldiery
for the magnanimity and the engaging affability
which graced his courage.
Muza ben Nozier crossed the strait of
Hercules
with a chosen force of ten thousand horse
and eight thousand foot; Arabs and Africans.
He was accompanied by his two sons,
Meruan
and Abdelola, and by numerous illustrious
Arabian cavaliers of the tribe of the Koreish.
He landed his shining legions on the coast of
Andalusia, and pitched his tents near to the
Guadiana. There first he received intelligence
of the disobedience of Taric to his orders, and
that, without waiting his arrival, the impetuous
chieftain had continued his career, and with his
light Arab squadrons had overrun and subdued
the noblest provinces and cities of the kingdom.
The jealous spirit of Muza was still more
exasperated by these tidings; he looked upon
Taric no longer as a friend and coadjutor, but
as an invidious rival, the decided enemy of his
glory; and he determined on his ruin. His
first consideration, however, was to secure to
himself a share in the actual conquest of the
land before it should be entirely subjugated.
Taking guides, therefore, from among his
christian captives, he set out to subdue such
parts of the country as had not been visited by
Taric. The first place which he assailed was
the ancient city of Carmona; it was not of
great magnitude, but was fortified with high
walls and massive towers, and many of the
fugitives
of the late army had thrown themselves
into it.
The Goths had by this time recovered from
their first panic; they had become accustomed
16*
to the sight of moslem troops, and their native
courage had been roused by danger. Shortly
after the Arabs had encamped before their
walls, a band of cavaliers made a sudden sally
one morning before the break of day, fell upon
the enemy by surprise, killed above three
hundred
of them in their tents, and effected their
retreat into the city; leaving twenty of their
number dead, covered with honourable wounds,
and in the very centre of the camp.
On the following day they made another
sally, and fell on a different quarter of the
encampment
;
but the Arabs were on their guard,
and met them with superior numbers. After
fighting fiercely for a time, they were routed,
and fled full speed for the city, with the Arabs
hard upon their traces. The guards within
feared to open the gate, lest with their friends
they should admit a torrent of enemies.
Seeing
themselves thus shut out, the fugitives
determined
to die like brave soldiers rather than
surrender. Wheeling suddenly round, they
opened a path through the host of their
pursuers
,
fought their way back to the camp, and
raged about it with desperate fury until they
were all slain, after having killed above eight
hundred of the enemy.
[33]
[33]
Abulcasim. Perdida de Espaa, L. 1. c. 13.
Muza now ordered that the place should be
taken by storm. The moslems assailed it on
all sides, but were vigorously resisted; many
were slain by showers of stones, arrows, and
boiling pitch, and many who had mounted with
scaling ladders were thrown headlong from the
battlements. The alcayde, Galo, aided solely
by two men, defended a tower and a portion of
the wall; killing and wounding with a
cross-bow
more than eighty of the enemy. The
attack
lasted above half a day, when the
moslems
were repulsed with the loss of fifteen
hundred
men.
Muza was astonished and exasperated at
meeting with such formidable resistance from
so small a city; for it was one of the few places,
during that memorable conquest, where the
gothic
valour shone forth with its proper lustre.
While the moslem army lay encamped before
the place, it was joined by Magued the
renegado
,
and Count Julian the traitor, with one
thousand horsemen; most of them recreant
christians, base betrayers of their country, and
more savage in their warfare than the Arabs of
the desert. To find favour in the eyes of
Muza
,
and to evince his devotion to the cause, the
count undertook, by wiley stratagem, to put this
gallant city in his power.
One evening, just at twilight, a number of
christians, habited as travelling merchants,
arrived
at one of the gates, conducting a train of
mules laden with arms and warlike munitions.
Open the gate quickly, cried they, we bring
supplies for the garrison, but the Arabs have
discovered, and are in pursuit of us. The gate
was thrown open, the merchants entered with
their beasts of burden, and were joyfully
received
.
Meat and drink were placed before
them, and after they had refreshed themselves
they retired to the quarters allotted to them.
These pretenced merchants were Count
Julian
and a number of his partisans. At the
hour of midnight they stole forth silently, and
assembling together, proceeded to what was
called the Gate of Cordova. Here setting
suddenly
upon the unsuspecting guards, they put
them to the edge of the sword, and throwing
open the gates admitted a great body of the
Arabs. The inhabitants were roused from their
sleep by sound of drum and trumpet, and the
clattering of horses. The Arabs scoured the
streets; a horrible massacre was commenced,
in which none were spared but such of the
females
as were young and beautiful, and fitted
to grace the harems of the conquerors. The
arrival of Muza put an end to the pillage and
the slaughter, and he granted favourable terms
to the survivors. Thus the valiant little city of
Carmona, after nobly resisting the open assaults
of the infidels, fell a victim to the treachery of
apostate christians.
[34]
[34]
Cron. gen. de Espaa, por Alonzo el Sabio. P.3 c. 1.
CHAPTER VIII.
Muza marches against the city of Seville
.
After
the capture of Carmona, Muza
descended
into a noble plain, covered with fields
of grain, with orchards and gardens, through
which glided the soft flowing Guadalquivir. On
the borders of the river stood the ancient city of
Seville, surrounded by Roman walls, and
defended
by its golden tower. Understanding from
his spies that the city had lost the flower of its
youth in the battle of the Guadalete, Muza
anticipated
but a faint resistance. A considerable
force, however, still remained within the place,
and what they wanted in numbers they made up
in resolution. For some days they withstood the
assaults of the enemy, and defended their walls
with great courage. Their want of warlike
munitions, however, and the superior force and
skill of the besieging army, left them no hope of
being able to hold out long. There were two
youthful cavaliers of uncommon valour in the
city. They assembled the warriors and
addressed
them. We cannot save the city, said they,
but at least we may save ourselves, and
preserve
so many strong arms for the service of our
country. Let us cut our way through the infidel
force, and gain some secure fortress, from whence
we may return with augmented numbers for the
rescue of the city.
The advice of the young cavaliers was
adopted
.
In the dead of the night the garrison
assembled
to the number of about three thousand;
the most part mounted on horseback. Suddenly
sallying from one of the gates, they rushed in a
compact body upon the camp of the Saracens,
which was negligently guarded, for the moslems
expected no such act of desperation. The camp
was a scene of great carnage and confusion;
many were slain on both sides; the two valiant
leaders of the christians fell covered with wounds,
but the main body succeeded in forcing their
way through the centre of the army, and in
making their retreat to Beja in Lusitania.
Muza was at a loss to know the meaning of
this desperate sally. In the morning he
perceived
the gates of the city wide open. A
number
of ancient and venerable men presented
themselves at his tent, offering submission and
imploring mercy, for none were left in the place
but the old, the infirm, and the miserable. Muza
listened to them with compassion, and granted
their prayer, and the only tribute he exacted was
three measures of wheat and three of barley
from each house or family. He placed a
garrison
of Arabs in the city, and left there a number
of Jews to form a body of population. Having
thus secured two important places in Andalusia,
he passed the boundaries of the province, and
advanced with great martial pomp into
Lusitania
.
CHAPTER IX.
Muza beseiges the city of Merida
.
The
army of Muza was now augmented to
about eighteen thousand horsemen, but he took
with him but few foot soldiers, leaving them to
garrison the conquered towns. He met with no
resistance on his entrance into Lusitania. City
after city laid its keys at his feet, and implored
to be received in peaceful vassalage. One city
alone prepared for vigorous defence, the ancient
Merida, a place of great extent, uncounted riches,
and prodigious strength. A noble Goth named
Sacarus was the governor; a man of
consummate
wisdom, patriotism and valour. Hearing
of the approach of the invaders, he gathered
within the walls all the people of the
surrounding
country, with their horses and mules, their
flocks and herds and most precious effects. To
insure for a long time a supply of bread, he filled
the magazines with grain, and erected windmills
on the churches. This done, he laid waste the
surrounding country to a great extent, so that a
besieging army would have to encamp in a
desert
.
17
When Muza came in sight of this magnificent
city, he was struck with admiration. He
remained
for some time gazing in silence upon its
mighty walls and lordly towers, its vast extent,
and the stately palaces and temples with which
it was adorned. Surely, cried he, at length,
all the people of the earth have combined their
power and skill to embellish and aggrandize this
city. Allah Achbar! Happy will he be who
shall have the glory of making such a conquest!
Seeing that a place so populous and so
strongly
fortified would be likely to maintain a long
and formidable resistance, he sent messengers to
Africa to his son Abdalasis, to collect all the
forces that could be spared from the garrisons of
Mauritania, and to hasten and reinforce him.
While Muza was forming his encampment,
deserters from the city brought him word that a
chosen band intended to sally forth at midnight
and surprise his camp. The Arab commander
immediately took measures to receive them with
a counter surprise. Having formed his plan, and
communicated it to his principal officers, he
ordered that, throughout the day, there should
be kept up an appearance of negligent confusion
in his encampment. The outposts were feebly
guarded; fires were lighted in various places, as
if preparing for feasting; bursts of music and
shouts of revelry resounded from different
quarters
,
and the whole camp seemed to be rioting in
careless security on the plunder of the land. As
the night advanced, the fires were gradually
extinguished
,
and silence ensued, as if the soldiery
had sunk into deep sleep after the carousal.
In the mean time, bodies of troops had been
secretly and silently marched to reinforce the
outposts; and the renegado Magued, with a
numerous
force, had formed an ambuscade in a
deep stone quarry by which the christians would
have to pass. These preparations being made,
they awaited the approach of the enemy in
breathless silence.
About midnight, the chosen force intended for
the sally assembled, and the command was
confided
to Count Tendero, a gothic cavalier of
tried prowess. After having heard a solemn
mass and received the benediction of the priest,
they marched out of the gate with all possible
silence. They were suffered to pass the
ambuscade
in the quarry without molestation: as they
approached the moslem camp every thing
appeared
quiet, for the foot soldiers were concealed
in slopes and hollows, and every Arab horseman
lay in his armour beside his steed. The sentinels
on the outposts waited until the christians were
close at hand, and then fled in apparent
consternation
.
Count Tendero gave the signal for assault, and
the christians rushed confidently forward. In an
instant an uproar of drums trumpets and shrill
war cries burst forth from every side. An army
seemed to spring up from the earth; squadrons
of horse came thundering on them in front,
while the quarry poured forth legions of armed
warriors in their rear.
The noise of the terrific conflict that took
place was heard on the city walls, and answered
by shouts of exultation, for the christians thought
it rose from the terror and confusion of the Arab
camp. In a little while, however, they were
undeceived
by fugitives from the fight, aghast with
terror, and covered with wounds. Hell itself,
cried they, is on the side of these infidels; the
earth casts forth warriors and steeds to aid them.
We have fought, not with men, but devils!
The greater part of the chosen troops who had
sallied, were cut to pieces in that scene of
massacre
,
for they had been confounded by the
tempest
of battle which suddenly broke forth around
them. Count Tendero fought with desperate
valour and fell covered with wounds. His body
was found the next morning, lying among the
slain, and transpierced with half a score of
lances. The renegado Magued cut off his head
and tied it to the tail of his horse, and repaired
with this savage trophy to the tent of Muza; but
the hostility of the Arab general was of a less
malignant kind. He ordered that the head and
body should be placed together upon a bier and
treated with becoming reverence.
In the course of the day a train of priests and
friars came forth from the city to request
permission
to seek for the body of the count. Muza
delivered it to them, with many soldier like
encomiums
on the valour of that good cavalier. The
priests covered it with a pall of cloth of gold,
and bore it back in melancholy procession to the
city, where it was received with loud
lamentations
.
The seige was now pressed with great vigour,
and repeated assaults were made, but in vain.
Muza saw at length, that the walls were too high
to be scaled, and the gates too strong to be burst
open without the aid of engines, and he desisted
from the attack until machines for the purpose
could be constructed. The governor suspected
from this cessation of active warfare, that the
enemy flattered themselves to reduce the place
by famine; he caused, therefore, large baskets
of bread to be thrown from the wall, and sent a
messenger to Muza to inform him that if his army
should be in want of bread, he would supply it,
having sufficient corn in his granaries for a ten
year's seige.
[35]
[35]
Bleda cronica. L. 2. c. 11.
The citizens, however, did not possess the
undaunted
17*
spirit of their governor. When they
found that the moslems were constructing
tremendous
engines for the destruction of their walls,
they lost all courage, and, surrounding the
governor
in a clamorous multitude, compelled him
to send forth persons to capitulate.
The ambassadors came into the presence of
Muza with awe, for they expected to find a
fierce and formidable warrior in one who had
filled the land with terror; but to their
astonishment
,
they beheld an ancient and venerable man,
with white hair, a snowy beard, and a pale
emaciated
countenance. He had passed the previous
night without sleep, and had been all day in the
field; he was exhausted, therefore, by
watchfulness
and fatigue, and his garments were covered
with dust.
What a devil of a man is this, murmured
the ambassadors, one to another, to undertake
such a seige when on the verge of the grave.
Let us defend our city the best way we can,
surely we can hold out longer than the life of
this grey-beard.
They returned to the city, therefore, scoffing at
an invader who seemed fitter to lean on a crutch
than wield a lance; and the terms offered by
Muza, which would otherwise have been thought
favourable, were scornfully rejected by the
inhabitants
.
A few days put an end to this
mistaken
confidence. Abdalasis, the son of Muza,
arrived from Africa at the head of his
reinforcement
;
he brought seven thousand horsemen and
a host of Barbary archers, and made a glorious
display as he marched into the camp. The
arrival
of this youthful warrior was hailed with
great acclamations, so much had he won the
hearts of the soldiery by the frankness, the
suavity, and generosity of his conduct.
Immediately
after his arrival a grand assault was
made upon the city, and several of the huge
battering
engines being finished, they were wheeled
up and began to thunder against the walls.
The unsteady populace were again seized
with terror, and, surrounding their governor with
fresh clamours, obliged him to send forth
ambassadors
a second time to treat of a surrender.
When admitted to the presence of Muza, the
ambassadors
could scarcely believe their eyes, or
that this was the same withered, white headed old
man of whom they had lately spoken with
scoffing
.
His hair and beard were tinged of a
ruddy
brown; his countenance was refreshed by
repose and flushed with indignation, and he
appeared
a man in the matured vigour of his days.
The ambassadors were struck with awe:
surely
,
whispered they, one to the other, this must
be either a devil or a magician, who can thus
make himself old and young at pleasure!
Muza received them haughtily. Hence,
said he, and tell your people I grant them the
same terms I have already proffered, provided
the city be instantly surrendered; but, by the
head of Mahomet, if there be any further delay,
not one mother's son of ye shall receive mercy
at my hands!
The deputies returned into the city pale and
dismayed. Go forth! go forth! cried they,
and accept whatever terms are offered; of
what avail is it to fight against men who can
renew
their youth at pleasure. Behold, we left
the leader of the infidels an old and feeble man,
and to day we find him youthful and vigorous.
[36]
[36]
Conde, p. 1. c. 13. Ambrosio de Morales. N. B.In
the chronicle of Spain, composed by order of Alonzo the
Wise, this anecdote is given as having happened at the siege
of Seville.
The place was, therefore, surrendered
forthwith
,
and Muza entered it in triumph. His
terms were merciful. Those who chose to
remain
were protected in persons, possessions, and
religion; he took the property of those only
who abandoned the city or had fallen in
battle; together with all arms and horses, and
the treasures and ornaments of the churches.
Among these sacred spoils was found a cup
made of a single pearl, which a king of Spain,
in ancient times, had brought from the temple
of Jerusalem when it was destroyed by Nebu
cadonozer. This precious relic was sent by
Muza to the caliph, and was placed in the
principle
mosque of the city of Damascus.
[37]
[37]
Marmol. descrip. de Africa, T. 1. L. 2.
Muza knew how to esteem merit even in an
enemy. When Sacarus, the governor of Merida,
appeared before him, he lauded him greatly for
the skill and courage he had displayed in the
defence of his city; and, taking off his own
scimitar, which was of great value, girded it
upon
him with his own hands. Wear this, said
he, as a poor memorial of my admiration; a
soldier of such virtue and valour is worthy of
far higher honours.
He would have engaged the governor in his
service, or have persuaded him to remain in the
city, as an illustrious vassal of the caliph, but the
noble minded Sacarus refused to bend to the
yoke of the conquerors; nor could he bring
himself to reside contentedly in his country,
when subjected to the domination of the infidels.
Gathering together all those who chose to
accompany
him into exile, he embarked to seek
some country where he might live in peace and
in the free exercise of his religion. What shore
these ocean pilgrims landed upon has never
been revealed; but tradition vaguely gives us to
believe that it was some unknown island far in
the bosom of the Atlantic.
Abulcasim, Perdida de Espaa, L. 1.
c. 13
CHAPTER X.
Expedition of Abdalasis against Seville and the
Land of Tadmir.
After
the capture of Merida, Muza gave a
grand banquet to his captains and distinguished
warriors, in that magnificent city. At this
martial
feast were many Arab cavaliers who had
been present in various battles, and they vied
with each other in recounting the daring
enterprises
in which they had been engaged, and the
splendid triumphs they had witnessed. While
they talked with ardour and exultation,
Abdalasis
,
the son of Muza, alone kept silence, and sat
with a dejected countenance. At length, when
there was a pause, he turned to his father and
addressed him with modest earnestness. My
lord and father, said he, I blush to hear your
warriors recount the toils and dangers they have
passed, while I have done nothing to entitle me
to their companionship. When I return to Egypt
and present myself before the caliph, he will ask
me of my services in Spain; what battle I have
gained; what town or castle I have taken. How
shall I answer him? If you love me, then, as your
son, give me a command, intrust to me an
enterprise
,
and let me acquire a name worthy to be
mentioned among men.
The eyes of Muza kindled with joy at finding
Abdalasis thus ambitious of renown in arms.
Allah be praised! exclaimed he, the heart of
my son is in the right place. It is becoming in
youth to look upward and be aspiring. Thy
desire, Abdalasis, shall be gratified.
An opportunity at that very time presented
itself to prove the prowess and discretion of the
youth. During the seige of Merida, the christian
troops which had taken refuge at Beja had
reinforced
themselves from Peaflor, and suddenly
returning, had presented themselves before the
gates of the city of Seville.
[38]
[38]
Espinosa. Antq. y Grand. de Seville. L. 2. c. 3.
Certain of the
christian inhabitants threw open the gates and
admitted them. The troops rushed to the
alcazar
,
took it by surprise, and put many of the
moslem garrison to the sword; the residue made
their escape, and fled to the Arab camp before
Merida, leaving Seville in the hands of the
christians.
The veteran Muza, now that the seige of
Merida
was at an end, was meditating the
recapture
and punishment of Seville at the very time
when Abdalasis addressed him. Behold, my
son, exclaimed he, an enterprise worthy of
thy ambition. Take with thee all the troops thou
hast brought from Africa; reduce the city of
Seville
again to subjection, and plant thy standard
upon its alcazar. But stop not there: carry thy
conquering sword into the southern parts of
Spain; thou wilt find there a harvest of glory yet
to be reaped.
Abdalasis lost no time in departing upon this
enterprise. He took with him Count Julian,
Magued el Rumi, and the Bishop Oppas, that he
might benefit by their knowledge of the country.
When he came in sight of the fair city of Seville,
seated like a queen in the midst of its golden
plain, with the Guadalquivir flowing beneath its
walls, he gazed upon it with the admiration of a
lover, and lamented in his soul that he had to
visit it as an avenger. His troops, however,
regarded
it with wrathful eyes, thinking only of its
rebellion and of the massacre of their
countrymen
in the alcazar.
The principal people of the city had taken no
part in this gallant but fruitless insurrection; and
now, when they beheld the army of Abdalasis
encamped upon the banks of the Guadalquivir,
would fain have gone forth to make explanations,
and intercede for mercy. The populace, how
ever, forbade any one to leave the city, and,
barring
the gates, prepared to defend themselves to
the last.
The place was attacked with resistless fury.
The gates were soon burst open; the moslems
rushed in, panting for revenge. They confined
not their slaughter to the soldiery in the alcazar,
but roamed through every street, confounding
the innocent with the guilty in one bloody
massacre
,
and it was with the utmost difficulty that
Abdalasis could at length succeed in staying their
sanguinary career.
[39]
[39]
Conde, P. 1. c. 14.
The son of Muza proved himself as mild in
conquest as he had been intrepid in assault. The
moderation and benignity of his conduct soothed
the terrors of the vanquished, and his wise
precautions
restored tranquility. Having made
proper regulations for the protection of the
inhabitants
,
he left a strong garrison in the place to
prevent any future insurrection, and then
departed
on the further prosecution of his enterprise.
Wherever he went his arms were victorious;
and his victories were always characterised by
the same magnanimity. At length he arrived
on the confines of that beautiful region
comprising
lofty and precipitous mountains and rich and
delicious plains, afterwards known by the name
of the kingdom of Murcia. All this part of the
18
country was defended by the veteran
Theodomir
,
who, by skilful management, had saved a
remnant of his forces after the defeat on the
banks of the Guadalete.
Theodomir was a stanch warrior, but a wary
and prudent man. He had experienced the
folly of opposing the Arabs in open field, where
their cavalry and armour gave them such
superiority
;
on their approach, therefore, he
assembled
all his people capable of bearing arms,
and took possession of the cliffs and mountain
passes. Here, said he, a simple goatherd,
who can hurl down rocks and stones, is as good
as a warrior, armed in proof. In this way he
checked and harassed the moslem army in all
its movements; showering down missiles
upon
it from overhanging precipices, and
waylaying
it in narrow and rugged defiles, where a few
raw troops could make stand against a host.
Theodomir was in a fair way to baffle his foes
and oblige them to withdraw from his territories;
unfortunately, however, the wary veteran had
two sons with him, young men of hot and heady
valour, who considered all this prudence of their
father as savouring of cowardice, and who were
anxious to try their prowess in the open field.
What glory, said they, is to be gained by
destroying an enemy in this way, from the
covert
of rocks and thickets?
You talk like young men, replied the
veteran
.
Glory is a prize one may fight for abroad,
but safety is the object when the enemy is at the
door.
One day, however, the young men succeeded
in drawing down their father into the plain.
Abdalasis immediately seized on the
opportunity
and threw himself between the Goths and
their mountain fastnesses. Theodomir saw too
late the danger into which he was betrayed.
What can our raw troops do, said he, against
those squadrons of horse that move like castles?
Let us make a rapid retreat to Orihuela and
defend ourselves from behind its walls.
Father, said the eldest son, it is too late to
retreat, remain here with the reserve while my
brother and I advance. Fear nothing; am not
I your son, and would I not die to defend you?
In truth, replied the veteran, I have my
doubts whether you are my son. But if I
remain
here, and you should all be killed, where
then would be my protection? Come, added
he, turning to the second son, I trust that thou
art virtually my son, let us hasten to retreat
before
it is too late.
Father, replied the youngest, I have not a
doubt that I am honestly and thoroughly your
son, and as such I honour you; but I owe duty
likewise to my mother, and when I sallied to the
war she gave me her blessing as long as I should
act with valour, but her curse should I prove
craven and fly the field. Fear nothing, father;
I will defend you while living, and even after
you are dead. You shall never fail of an
honourable
sepulture among your kindred.
A pestilence on ye both, cried Theodomir,
for a brace of misbegotten madmen! what
care I, think ye, where ye lay my body when I
am dead. One day's existence in a hovel is
worth an age of interment in a marble
sepulchre
.
Come, my friends, said he, turning to his
principal cavaliers, let us leave these
hot-headed
striplings and make our retreat; if we tarry
any longer the enemy will be upon us.
Upon this the cavaliers and proud hidalgoes
drew up scornfully and tossed their heads:
What do you see in us, said they, that you
think we will show our backs to the enemy?
Forward! was ever the good old gothic watch
word, and with that will we live and die!
While time was lost in these disputes, the
moslem army kept advancing, until retreat was
no longer practicable. The battle was
tumultuous
and bloody. Theodomir fought like a lion,
but it was all in vain: he saw his two sons cut
down and the greater part of their rash
companions
,
while his raw mountain troops fled in
all directions.
Seeing there was no longer any hope, he
seized the bridle of a favourite page who was
near him, and who was about spurring for the
mountains. Part not from me, said he, but
do thou at least attend to my counsel, my son;
and, of a truth, I believe thou art my son; for
thou art the offspring of one of my handmaids
who was kind unto me. And indeed the youth
marvellously resembled him. Turning then the
reins of his own steed, and giving him the spur,
he fled amain from the field, followed by the
page; nor did he stop until he arrived within the
walls of Orihuela.
Ordering the gates to be barred and bolted,
he prepared to receive the enemy. There were
but few men in the city capable of bearing arms,
most of the youth having fallen in the field. He
caused the women, therefore, to clothe
themselves
in male attire, to put on hats and helmets,
to take long reeds in their hands instead of
lances
,
and to cross their hair upon their chins in
semblance of beards. With these troops he
lined the walls and towers.
It was about the hour of twilight that
Abdalasis
approached with his army, but he paused
when he saw the walls so numerously garrisoned.
Then Theodomir took a flag of truce in his hand,
and put a herald's tabard on the page, and they
18*
two sallied forth to capitulate, and were
graciously
received by Abdalasis.
I come, said Theodomir, on the behalf of
the commander of this city to treat for terms
worthy of your magnanimity and of his dignity.
You perceive that the city is capable of
withstanding
a long siege, but he is desirous of
sparing the lives of his soldiers. Promise that
the inhabitants shall be at liberty to depart
unmolested
with their property, and the city will be
delivered up to you tomorrow morning without
a blow; otherwise we are prepared to fight
until
not a man be left.
Abdalsis was well pleased to get so powerful
a place upon such easy terms, but stipulated
that the garrison should lay down their arms.
To this Theodomir readily assented, with the
exception, however, of the governor and his
retinue
,
which was granted out of consideration
for his dignity. The articles of capitulation
were then drawn out, and, when Abdalasis had
affixed his name and seal, Theodomir took the
pen and wrote his signature. Behold in me,
said he, the governor of the city!
Abdalasis was pleased with the hardihood of
the commander of the place in thus venturing
personally into his power, and entertained the
veteran with still greater honour. When
Theodomir
returned to the city, he made known the
capituation, and charged the inhabitants to pack
up their effects during the night and be ready to
sally forth in the morning.
At the dawn of day the gates were thrown
open, and Abdalasis looked to see a great force
issuing forth, but, to his surprise, beheld merely
Theodomir and his page in battered armour,
followed
by a multitude of old men, women and
children.
Abdalasis waited until the whole had come
forth, then turning to Theodomir, Where, cried
he, are the soldiers whom I saw last evening,
lining the walls and towers?
Soldiers have I none, replied the veteran.
As to my garrison, behold it before you. With
these women did I man my walls, and this, my
page, is my herald, guard and retinue.
Upon this the Bishop Oppas and Count Julian
exclaimed that the capitulation was a base fraud
and ought not to be complied with; but
Abdalasis
relished the stratagem of the old soldier,
and ordered that the stipulations of the treaty
should be faithfully performed. Nay, so high an
opinion did he conceive of the subtle wisdom of
this commander, that he permitted him to remain
in authority over the surrounding country on his
acknowledging allegiance and engaging to pay
tribute to the caliph; and all that part of Spain,
comprising the beautiful provinces of Murcia
and Valencia, was long after known by the
Arabic name of its defender, and is still
recorded
in Arabian chronicles as The land of
Tadmir
.
Having succeeded in subduing this rich and
fruitful region, and having gained great renown
for his generosity as well as valour, Abdalasis
returned with the chief part of his army to the
city of Seville.
[40]
[40]
Conde. P.1. Cronica del moro Rasis. Cron. gen.
Espa
a
por Alonzo el Sabio. P.3. c. 1.
CHAPTER XI.
Muza arrives at ToledoInterview between him
and Taric
.
When
Muza ben Nozier had sent his son
Abdalasis
to subdue Seville, he departed for Toledo
to call Taric to account for his disobedience to
his orders; for, amidst all his own successes,
the prosperous career of that commander preyed
upon his mind. What can content the jealous
and ambitious heart? As Muza passed through
the land, towns and cities submitted to him
without
resistance; he was lost in wonder at the
riches of the country and the noble monuments
of art with which it was adorned; when he
beheld
the bridges, constructed in ancient times by
the Romans, they seemed to him the work, not
of men, but of genii. Yet all these admirable
objects only made him repine the more that he
had not had the exclusive glory of invading and
subduing the land; and exasperated him the
more against Taric, for having apparently
endeavoured
to monopolize the conquest.
Taric
heard of his approach, and came forth
to meet him at Talavera, accompanied, by many
of the most distinguished companions of his
victories, and with a train of horses and mules
laden with spoils, with which he trusted to
propitiate
the favour of his commander. Their
meeting took place on the banks of the rapid
river Tietar, which rises in the mountains of
Placencia
and throws itself into the Tagus. Muza,
in former days, while Taric had acted as his
subordinate
and indefatigable officer, had cherished
and considered him as a second self, but now
that he had started up to be a rival, he could not
conceal his jealousy. When the veteran came
into his presence, he regarded him for a moment
with a stern and indiguant aspect. Why hast
thou disobeyed my orders? said he, I
commanded
thee to await my arrival with
reinforcements
,
but thou hast rashly overrun the country,
endangering the loss of our armies and the ruin
of our cause.
I have acted, replied Taric, in such
manner
as I thought would best serve the cause of
Islam, and in so doing I thought to fulfil the
wishes of Muza. Whatever I have done has
been as your servant; behold your share, as
commander-in-chief, of the spoils which I have
collected. So saying, he produced an immense
treasure in silver and gold and costly stuffs, and
precious stones, and spread it before Muza.
The anger of the Arab commander was still
more kindled at the sight of this booty, for it
proved how splendid had been the victories of
Taric; but he restrained his wrath for the
present
,
and they proceeded together in moody
silence to Toledo. When he entered this royal
city, however, and ascended to the ancient
palace of the gothic kings, and reflected that all
this had been a scene of triumph to his rival, he
could no longer repress his indignation. He
demanded
of Taric a strict account of all the riches
he had gathered in Spain, even of the presents
he had reserved for the caliph, and, above all, he
made him yield up his favourite trophy, the
talismanic
table of Solomon. When all this was
done, he again upbraided him bitterly with his
disobedience of orders, and with the rashness of
his conduct. What blind confidence in fortune
hast thou shown, said he, in overrunning such
a country and assailing such powerful cities
with thy scanty force! What madness, to
venture
every thing upon a desperate chance, when
thou knewest I was coming with a force to make
the victory secure. All thy success has been
owing to mere luck, not to judgment nor
generalship
.
He then bestowed high praises upon the other
chieftains for their services in the cause of Islam,
but they answered not a word, and their
countenances
were gloomy and discontented; for they
felt the injustice done to their favourite leader.
As to Taric, though his eye burned like fire, he
kept his passion within bounds. I have done
the best I could to serve God and the caliph,
said he, emphatically; my conscience acquits
me, and I trust my sovereign will do the same.
Perhaps he may, replied Muza bitterly,
but, in the mean time, I cannot confide his
interests
to a desperado who is heedless of orders
and throws every thing at hazard. Such a
general
is unworthy to be intrusted with the fate
of armies.
So saying, he divested Taric of his command,
and gave it to Magued the renegado. The gaunt
Taric still maintained an air of stern composure.
His only words were The caliph will do me
justice! Muza was so transported with passion
at this laconic defiance that he ordered him to
be thrown into prison, and even threatened his
life.
Upon this, Magued el Rumi, though he had
risen by the disgrace of Taric, had the
generosity
to speak out warmly in his favour.
Consider
,
said he, to Muza, what may be the
consequences
of this severity. Taric has many
friends in the army; his actions, too, have been
signal and illustrious, and entitle him to the
highest
honours and rewards, instead of disgrace and
imprisonment.
The anger of Muza, however, was not to be
appeased; and he trusted to justify his measures
by despatching missives to the caliph,
complaining
of the insubordination of Taric, and his rash
and headlong conduct. The result proved the
wisdom of the caution given by Magued. In
the course of a little while Muza received a
humiliating
letter from the caliph, ordering him to
restore Taric to the command of the soldiers
whom he had so gloriously conducted; and
not to render useless one of the best swords
in Islam!
[41]
[41]
Conde, Part 1. c. 15.
It is thus the envious man brings humiliation
and reproach upon himself, in endeavouring to
degrade a meritorious rival. When the tidings
came of the justice rendered by the caliph to
the merits of the veteran, there was general joy
throughout the army, and Muza read in the
smiling countenances of every one around him
a severe censure upon his conduct. He
concealed
,
however, his deep humiliation, and
affected
to obey the orders of his sovereign with
great alacrity; he released Taric from prison,
19
feasted him at his own table, and then publicly
replaced him at the head of his troops. The
army received its favourite veteran with shouts
of joy, and celebrated with rejoicings the
reconciliation
of the commanders; but the shouts
of the soldiery were abhorrent to the ears of
Muza.
CHAPTER XII.
Muza prosecutes the scheme of conquest.Siege
of Saragossa.Complete subjugation of
Spain
.
The
dissensions, which for a time had
distracted
the conquering army, being appeased,
and the Arabian generals being apparently
once more reconciled, Muza, as
commander-in-chief
,
proceeded to complete the enterprise by
subjugating the northern parts of Spain. The
same expeditious mode of conquest that had
been sagaciously adopted by Taric, was still
pursued. The troops were lightly armed, and
freed from every superfluous incumbrance.
Each horseman, beside his arms, carried a
small sack of provisions; a copper vessel in
which to cook them, and a skin which served
him for surcoat and for bed. The infantry
carried nothing but their arms. To each
regiment
or squadron was allowed a limited
number
of sumpter mules and attendants; barely
enough to carry their necessary baggage and
supplies; nothing was permitted that could
needlessly diminish the number of fighting men
delay their rapid movements, or consume their
provisions. Strict orders were again issued,
prohibiting, on pain of death, all plunder
excepting
the camp of an enemy, or cities given
up to pillage.
[42]
[42]
Conde, P. 1. c. 15
The armies now took their several lines of
march. That under Taric departed towards
the northeast; beating up the country towards
the source of the Tagus; traversing the chain of
Iberian or Arragonian mountains, and pouring
down into the plains and valleys watered by
the Ebro. It was wonderful to see, in so brief
a space of time, such a vast and difficult
country
penetrated and subdued; and the invading
army, like an inundating flood, pouring its
streams into the most remote recesses.
While Taric was thus sweeping the
country
to the northeast, Muza departed in an
opposite
direction; yet purposing to meet him,
and to join their forces in the north.
Bending
his course westwardly, he made a circuit
behind the mountains, and then, advancing into
the open country, displayed his banners before
Salamanca, which surrendered without
resistance
.
From hence he continued on towards
Astorga
,
receiving the terrified submission of the
land; then turning up the valley of the Douro,
he ascended the course of that famous river
towards
the east; crossed the Sierra de Moncayo,
and, arrriving on the banks of the Ebro,
marched
down along its stream, until he approached
the strong city of Saragossa, the citadel of all
that part of Spain. In this place had taken
refuge many of the most valiant of the gothic
warriors; the remnants of armies, and fugitives
from conquered cities. It was one of the last
rallying points of the land. When Muza
arrived
,
Taric had already been for some time
before the place, laying close siege; the
inhabitants
were pressed by famine, and had suffered
great losses in repeated combats; but there was
a spirit and obstinacy in their resistance
surpassing
any thing that had yet been witnessed
by the invaders.
Muza now took command of the siege, and
ordered a general assault upon the walls. The
moslems planted their scaling ladders, and
mounted with their accustomed intrepidity, but
were vigorously resisted; nor could all their
efforts obtain them a footing upon the
battlements
.
While they were thus assailing the
walls, Count Julian ordered a heap of
combustibles
to be placed against one of the gates, and
set on fire. The inhabitants attempted in vain
from the barbican to extinguish the flames.
19*
They burnt so fiercely, that in a little while the
gate fell from the hinges. Count Julian
galloped
into the city mounted upon a powerful
charger, himself and his steed all covered with
mail. He was followed by three hundred of
his partisans, and supported by Magued, the
renegado, with a troop of horse.
The inhabitants disputed every street and
public square; they made barriers of dead
bodies
,
fighting behind these ramparts of their
slaughtered countrymen. Every window and
roof was filled with combatants; the very
women
and children joined in the desperate fight,
throwing down stones and missiles of all kinds,
and scalding water upon the enemy.
The battle raged until the hour of vespers,
when the principal inhabitants held a parley,
and capitulated for a surrender. Muza had
been incensed at their obstinate resistance,
which had cost the lives of so many of his
soldiers; he knew, also, that in the city were
collected the riches of many of the towns of
eastern Spain. He demanded, therefore,
beside
the usual terms, a heavy sum to be paid
down by the citizens, called the contribution of
blood; as by this they redeemed themselves
from the edge of the sword. The people were
obliged to comply. They collected all the
jewels
of their richest families, and all the orna
ments of their temples, and laid them at the
feet of Muza; and placed in his power many
of their noblest youths as hostages. A strong
garrison was then appointed, and thus the fierce
city of Saragossa was subdued to the yoke of
the conqueror.
The Arab generals pursued their conquests
even to the foot of the Pyrenees; Taric then
descended along the course of the Ebro, and
continued along the Mediterranean coast;
subduing
the famous city of Valencia, with its rich
and beautiful domains, and carrying the success
of his arms even to Denia.
Muza undertook with his host a wider range
of conquest. He overcame the cities of
Barcelona
,
Gerona, and others that lay on the skirts
of the eastern mountains; then crossing into
the land of the Franks, he captured the city of
Narbonne; in a temple of which he found seven
equestrian images of silver, which he brought
off as trophies of his victory.
[43]
[43]
Conde. P. 1. c. 16.
Returning into
Spain, he scoured its northern regions along
Gallicia and the Asturias; passed triumphantly
through Lusitania, and arrived once more in
Andalusia, covered with laurels and enriched
with immense spoils.
Thus was completed the subjugation of
unhappy
Spain. All its cities and fortresses, and
strong holds, were in the hands of the
Saracens
,
excepting some of the wild mountain
tracts that bordered the Atlantic, and
extended
towards the north. Here, then, the story
of the conquest might conclude, but that the
indefatigable chronicler, Fray Antonio Agapida,
goes on to record the fate of those persons
who were most renowned in the enterprise.
We shall follow his steps, and avail ourselves
of his information, laboriously collected from
various sources; and, truly, the story of each
of the actors in this great historical drama,
bears with it its striking moral, and is full of
admonition and instruction.
CHAPTER XIII.
Feud between the Arab generalsThey are
summoned
to appear before the caliph at
Damascus
Reception
of Taric
.
The
heart of Muza ben Nozier was now lifted
up, for he considered his glory complete. He
held a sway that might have gratified the
ambition
of the proudest sovereign, for all western
Africa and the newly acquired peninsula of
Spain were obedient to his rule; and he was
renowned throughout all the lands of Islam as
the great conqueror of the west. But sudden
humiliation awaited him in the very moment of
his highest triumph.
Notwithstanding the outward reconciliation
of Muza and Taric, a deep and implacable
hostility
continued to exist between them; and
each had busy partisans who distracted the
armies by their feuds. Letters were
incessantly
despatched to Damascus by either party,
exalting the merits of their own leader and
decrying
his rival. Taric was represented as rash,
arbitrary, and prodigal, and as injuring the
discipline
of the army, by sometimes treating it
with extreme rigor, and at other times giving
way to licentiousness and profusion. Muza was
lauded as prudent, sagacious, dignified and
systematic
in his dealings. The friends of Taric, on
the other hand, represented him as brave,
generous
,
and high minded; scrupulous in reserving
to his sovereign his rightful share of the spoils,
but distributing the rest bounteously among his
soldiers, and thus increasing their alacrity in the
service. Muza, on the contrary, said they,
is grasping and insatiable; he levies intolerable
contributions and collects immense treasure, but
sweeps it all into his own coffers.
The caliph was at length wearied out by these
complaints, and feared that the safety of the
cause might be endangered by the dissensions of
the rival generals. He sent letters, therefore,
ordering them to leave suitable persons in
charge of their several commands, and appear,
forthwith, before him at Damascus.
Such was the greeting from his sovereign that
awaited Muza on his return from the conquest of
northern Spain. It was a grievous blow to a man
of his pride and ambition; but he prepared
instantly
to obey. He returned to Cordova,
collecting
by the way all the treasures he had deposited
in various places. At that city he called a meeting
of his principal officers, and of the leaders of the
faction of apostate christians, and made them all
do homage to his son Abdalasis, as emir or
governor
of Spain. He gave this favourite son
much sage advice for the regulation of his
conduct
,
and left with him his nephew, Ayub, a
man greatly honoured by the moslems for his
wisdom and discretion; exhorting Abdalasis to
consult him on all occasions and consider him as
his bosom counsellor. He made a parting
address
to his adherents, full of cheerful
confidence
;
assuring them that he would soon return,
loaded with new favours and honours by his
sovereign, and enabled to reward them all for
their faithful services.
When Muza sallied forth from Cordova, to
repair to Damascus, his cavalgada appeared
like the sumptuous pageant of some oriental
potentate; for he had numerous guards and
attendants
splendidly armed and arrayed,
together
with four hundred hostages, who were
youthful cavaliers of the noblest families of the
Goths, and a great number of captives of both
sexes, chosen for their beauty, and intended as
presents for the caliph. Then there was a vast
train of beasts of burden, laden with the plunder
of Spain; for he took with him all the wealth he
had collected in his conquests; and all the share
that had been set apart for his sovereign. With
this display of trophies and spoils, showing the
magnificence of the land he had conquered, he
looked forward with confidence to silence the
calumnies of his foes.
As he traversed the valley of the
Guadalquivir
he often turned and looked back wistfully
upon Cordova; and, at the distance of a league,
when about to lose sight of it, he checked his
steed upon the summit of a hill, and gazed for a
long time upon its palaces and towers. O
Cordova! exclaimed he, great and glorious art
thou among cities, and abundant in all delights.
With grief and sorrow do I part from thee, for
sure I am it would give me length of days to abide
within thy pleasant walls! When he had
uttered
these words, say the Arabian chronicles,
he resumed his wayfaring; but his eyes were
bent upon the ground, and frequent sighs
bespoke
the heaviness of his heart.
Embarking at Cadiz he passed over to Africa
with all his people and effects, to regulate his
government in that country. He divided the
command between his sons, Abdelola and
Meruan
,
leaving the former in Tangier, and the
latter in Cairvan. Thus having secured, as he
thought, the power and prosperity of his family,
by placing all his sons as his lieutenants in the
country he had conquered, he departed for
Syria, bearing with him the sumptuous spoils of
the west.
While Muza was thus disposing of his
commands
,
and moving cumbrously under the
weight of wealth, the veteran Taric was more
speedy and alert in obeying the summons of the
caliph. He knew the importance, where
complaints
were to be heard, of being first in
presence
of the judge; beside, he was ever ready
to march at a moments warning, and had
nothing
to impede him in his movements. The spoils
he had made in his conquests had either been
shared among his soldiers, or yielded up to
Muza, or squandered away with open handed
profusion. He appeared in Syria with a small
train of war-worn followers, and had no other
trophies to show than his battered armour, and
a body seamed with scars. He was received,
however, with rapture by the multitude, who
crowded to behold one of those conquerors of
the west, whose wonderful achievements were
the theme of every tongue. They were
charmed
with his gaunt and martial air, his hard
sun-burnt
features, and his scathed eye. All hail,
cried they, to the sword of Islam, the terror of
the unbelievers! Behold the true model of a
warrior, who despises gain and seeks for nought
but glory!
Taric was graciously received by the caliph,
who asked tidings of his victories. He gave a
soldier-like account of his actions, frank and
20
full, without any feigned modesty, yet without
vain-glory. Commander of the faithful, said
he, I bring thee no silver, nor gold, nor precious
stones, nor captives, for what spoils I did not
share with my soldiers I gave up to Muza as my
commander. How I have conducted myself the
honourable warriors of thy host will tell thee;
nay, let our enemies, the christians, be asked if I
have ever shown myself cowardly or cruel or
rapacious.
What kind of people are these christians?
demanded the caliph.
The Spaniards, replied Taric, are lions
in their castles, eagles in their saddles, but mere
women when on foot. When vanquished they
escape like goats to the mountains, for they need
not see the ground they tread on.
And tell me of the Moors of Barbary.
They are like Arabs in the fierceness and
dexterity of their attacks, and in their knowledge
of the stratagems of war; they resemble them,
too, in feature, in fortitude and hospitality; but
they are the most perfidious people upon earth,
and never regard promise or plighted faith.
And the people of Afranc; what sayest thou
of them?
They are infinite in number, rapid in the
onset
,
fierce in battle, but confused and headlong
in flight.
And how fared it with thee among these
people? Did they sometimes vanquish thee?
Never, by Allah! cried Taric with honest
warmth, never did a banner of mine fly the
field. Though the enemy were two to one, my
moslems never shunned the combat!
The caliph was well pleased with the martial
bluntness of the veteran, and showed him great
honour; and wherever Taric appeared he was
the idol of the populace.
CHAPTER XIV.
Muza arrives at Damascus.His interview
with the caliph.The table of Solomon.A
rigorous sentence
.
Shortly
after the arrival of Taric el Tuerto
at Damascus, the caliph fell dangerously ill,
insomuch
that his life was despaired of. During
his illness, tidings were brought that Muza ben
Nozier had entered Syria with a vast cavalcade,
bearing all the riches and trophies gained in the
western conquests. Now Suleiman ben
Abdelmelec
,
brother to the caliph, was successor to
the throne, and he saw that his brother had not
long to live, and wished to grace the
commencement
of his reign by this triumphant
display
of the spoils of christendom; he sent
messengers, therefore, to Muza, saying, The
caliph is ill and cannot receive thee at present;
I pray thee tarry on the road until his
recovery
.
Muza, however, paid no attention to
the messages of Suleiman, but rather hastened
his march to arrive before the death of the
caliph. And Suleiman treasured up his
conduct
in his heart.
Muza entered the city in a kind of triumph,
with a long train of horses and mules and
camels
laden with treasure, and with the four
hundred
sons of gothic nobles as hostages, each
decorated with a diadem and a girdle of gold;
and with one hundred christian damsels, whose
beauty dazzled all beholders. As he passed
through the streets he ordered purses of gold
to be thrown among the populace, who rent the
air with acclamations. Behold, cried they,
the veritable conqueror of the unbelievers!
Behold the true model of a conqueror, who
brings home wealth to his country! And they
heaped benedictions on the head of Muza.
The caliph Waled Almanzor rose from his
couch of illness to receive the emir; who, when
he repaired to the palace, filled one of its great
courts with treasures of all kinds; the halls, too,
were thronged with the youthful hostages,
magnificently
attired, and with christian damsels,
lovely as the houries of paradise. When the
caliph demanded an account of the conquest of
Spain, he gave it with great eloquence; but, in
describing the various victories, he made no
mention of the name of Taric, but spoke as if
every thing had been effected by himself. He
then presented the spoils of the christians as if
20*
they had been all taken by his own hands; and
when he delivered to the caliph the miraculous
table of Solomon, he dwelt with animation on
the virtues of that inestimable talisman.
Upon this, Taric, who was present, could no
longer hold his peace. Commander of the
faithful, said he, examine this precious table,
if any part be wanting. The caliph examined
the table, which was composed of a single
emerald
,
and he found that one foot was supplied
by a foot of gold. The caliph turned to Muza
and said, Where is the other foot of the
table
?
Muza answered, I know not; one foot
was wanting when it came into my hands.
Upon this, Taric drew from beneath his robe a
foot of emerald of like workmanship to the
others, and fitting exactly to the table.
Behold
,
O commander of the faithful! cried he,
a proof of the real finder of the table; and
so is it with the greater part of the spoils
exhibited
by Muza as trophies of his achievements.
It was I who gained them, and who captured
the cities in which they were found. If you
want proof, demand of these christian cavaliers
here present, most of whom I captured;
demand
of those moslem warriors who aided me
in my battles.
Muza was confounded for a moment, but
attempted to vindicate himself. I spake, said
he, as the chief of your armies, under whose
orders and banners this conquest was achieved.
The actions of the soldier are the actions of the
commander. In a great victory it is not
supposed
that the chief of the army takes all the
captives, or kills all the slain, or gathers all the
booty, though all are enumerated in the records
of his triumph. The caliph, however, was
wroth, and heeded not his words. You have
vaunted your own deserts, said he, and have
forgotten the deserts of others; nay, you have
sought to debase another who has loyally served
his sovereign; the reward of your envy and
covetousness be upon your head! So saying,
he bestowed a great part of the spoils upon
Taric and the other chiefs, but gave nothing
to Muza; and the veteran retired amidst the
sneers and murmurs of those present.
In a few days the Caliph Waled died, and
was succeeded by his brother Suleiman. The
new sovereign cherished deep resentment
against Muza for having presented himself
at court contrary to his command, and he
listened
readily to the calumnies of his enemies;
for Muza had been too illustrious in his deeds
not to have many enemies. All now took
courage
when they found he was out of favour, and
they heaped slanders on his head; charging
him with embezzling much of the share of the
booty belonging to the sovereign. The new
caliph lent a willing ear to the accusation, and
commanded him to render up all that he had
pillaged from Spain. The loss of his riches
might have been borne with fortitude by Muza,
but the stigma upon his fame filled his heart
with bitterness. I have been a faithful
servant
to the throne from my youth upwards,
said he, and now am I degraded in my old
age. I care not for wealth, I care not for life,
but let me not be deprived of that honour which
God has bestowed upon me!
The caliph was still more exasperated at his
repining, and stripped him of his commands;
confiscated his effects; fined him two hundred
thousand pesants of gold, and ordered that he
should be scourged and exposed to the noontide
sun, and afterwards thrown into prison.
[44]
[44]
Conde, P. 1. c. 17.
The
populace, also, reviled and scoffed at him in his
misery, and as they beheld him led forth to the
public gaze, and fainting in the sun, they pointed
at him with derision and exclaimedBehold
the envious man and the impostor; this is he
who pretended to have conquered the land of
the unbelievers!
CHAPTER XV.
Conduct of Abdalasis as Emir of Spain
.
While
these events were happening in
Syria
,
the youthful Abdalasis, the son of Muza,
remained as emir or governor of Spain. He
was of a generous and benignant disposition,
but he was open and confiding, and easily led
away by the opinions of those he loved.
Fortunately
his father had left with him, as a bosom
counsellor, the discreet Ayub, the nephew of
Muza; aided by his advice, he for some time
administered the public affairs prudently and
prosperously.
Not long after the departure of his father, he
received a letter from him, written while on his
journey to Syria; it was to the following
purport
:
Beloved son; honour of thy lineage;
Allah
guard thee from all harm and peril! Listen
to the words of thy father. Avoid all treachery
though it should promise great advantage, and
trust not in him who counsels it, even though
he should be a brother. The company of
traitors
put far from thee; for how canst thou be
certain that he who has proved false to others
will prove true to thee? Beware, O my son, of
the seductions of love. It is an idle passion
which enfeebles the heart and blinds the
judgment
;
it renders the mighty weak, and makes
slaves of princes. If thou shouldst discover
any foible of a vicious kind springing up in thy
nature, pluck it forth, whatever pang it cost
thee. Every error, while new, may easily be
weeded out, but if suffered to take root it
flourishes
and bears seed, and produces fruit an
hundred
fold. Follow these counsels, O son of my
affections, and thou shalt live secure.
Abdalasis meditated upon this letter, for some
part of it seemed to contain a mystery which
he could not comprehend. He called to him his
cousin and counsellor, the discreet Ayub. What
means my father, said he, in cautioning me
against treachery and treason? Does he think
my nature so base that it could descend to
such means?
Ayub read the letter attentively. Thy
father
,
said he, would put thee on thy guard
against the traitors Julian and Oppas, and
those of their party who surround thee. What
love canst thou expect from men who have
been unnatural to their kindred, and what
loyalty from wretches who have betrayed
their country?
Abdalasis was satisfied with the
interpretation
,
and he acted accordingly. He had long
loathed all communion with these men, for
there is nothing which the open ingenuous
nature so much abhors as duplicity and
treason
.
Policy, too, no longer required their
agency; they had rendered their infamous
service, and had no longer a country to
betray
;
but they might turn and betray their
employers. Abdalasis, therefore, removed them
to a distance from his court, and placed them
in situations where they could do no harm, and
he warned his commanders from being in any
wise influenced by their counsels, or aided by
their arms.
He now confided entirely in his Arabian
troops, and in the moorish squadrons from
Africa
,
and with their aid he completed the
conquest
of Lusitania to the ultimate parts of the
Algarbe, or west, even to the shores of the
great Ocean sea.
[45]
[45]
Algarbe, or Algarbia, in Arabic signifies the west, as
Axarkia is the east, Algufia the north, and Aquibla the
south. This will serve to explain some of the geographical
names on the peninsula, which are of Arabian origin.
From hence he sent his
generals to overrun all those vast and rugged
sierras, which rise like ramparts along the ocean
borders of the peninsula; and they carried the
standard of Islam in triumph even to the
mountains
of Biscay, collecting all manner of
precious
spoil.
It is not enough, O Abdalasis, said Ayub,
that we conquer and rule this country with
the sword; if we wish our dominion to be
secure
,
we must cultivate the arts of peace, and
study to secure the confidence and promote the
welfare of the people we have conquered.
Abdalasis
relished counsel which accorded so well
with his own beneficent nature. He
endeavoured
,
therefore, to allay the ferment and confusion
of the conquest; forbade, under rigorous
punishment
,
all wanton spoil or oppression, and
protected the native inhabitants in the
enjoyment
and cultivation of their lands, and the
pursuit of all useful occupations. By the advice
of Ayub, also, he encouraged great numbers of
industrious Moors and Arabs to emigrate from
Africa, and gave them houses and lands; thus
introducing a peaceful mahometan population
into the conquered provinces.
The good effect of the counsels of Ayub
were soon apparent. Instead of a sudden but
transient influx of wealth, made by the ruin of
the land, which left the country desolate, a
regular
and permanent revenue sprang up,
produced
by reviving prosperity, and gathered
without violence. Abdalasis ordered it to be
faithfully collected, and deposited in coffers by
public officers appointed in each province for
the purpose; and the whole was sent by ten
deputies to Damascus to be laid at the feet of
the caliph; not as the spoils of a vanquished
country, but as the peaceful trophies of a wisely
administered government.
The common herd of warlike adventurers,
the mere men of the sword, who had thronged
to Spain for the purpose of ravage and rapine,
were disappointed at being thus checked in
their career, and at seeing the reign of terror
and violence drawing to a close. What
manner
of leader is this, said they, who forbids us
to make spoil of the enemies of Islam, and to
enjoy the land we have wrested from the
unbelievers
?
The partisans of Julian, also,
whispered
their calumnies. Behold, said they, with
what kindness he treats the enemies of your
faith; all the christians who have borne arms
against you, and withstood your entrance into
the land, are favoured and protected; but it is
enough for a christian to have befriended the
cause of the moslems to be singled out by
Abdalasis
for persecution, and to be driven with
scorn from his presence.
These insinuations fermented the discontent
21
of the turbulent and rapacious among the
moslems
,
but all the friends of peace and order and
good government applauded the moderation of
the youthful emir.
CHAPTER XVI.
Loves of Abdalasis and Exilona
.
Abdalasis
had fixed his seat of government
at Seville, as permitting easy and frequent
communications with the coast of Africa. His
palace was of noble architecture, with delightful
gardens extending to the banks of the
Guadalquivir
.
In a part of this palace resided many
of the most beautiful christian females, who
were detained as captives, or rather hostages, to
insure the tranquillity of the country. Those
who were of noble rank were entertained in
luxury and magnificence; slaves were
appointed
to attend upon them, and they were arrayed
in the richest apparel and decorated with the
most precious jewels. Those of tender age
were taught all graceful accomplishments; and
even where tasks were imposed, they were of
the most elegant and agreeable kind. They
embroidered, they sang, they danced, and
passed
their times in pleasing revelry. Many were
lulled by this easy and voluptuous existence:
the scenes of horror through which they had
passed were gradually effaced from their minds,
and a desire was often awakened of rendering
themselves pleasing in the eyes of their
conquerors
.
After his return from his campaign in
Lusitania
,
and during the intervals of public duty,
Abdalasis solaced himself in the repose of this
palace, and in the society of these christian
captives
.
He remarked one among them who ever
sat apart; and neither joined in the labours nor
sports of her companions. She was lofty in her
demeanour, and the others always paid her
reverence
;
yet sorrow had given a softness to
her charms, and rendered her beauty touching
to the heart. Abdalasis found her one day in
the garden with her companions; they had
adorned their heads with flowers, and were
singing the songs of their country, but she sat by
herself and wept. The youthful emir was
moved by her tears, and accosted her in gentle
accents. O fairest of women! said he,
why dost thou weep, and why is thy heart
troubled? Alas! replied she, have I not
cause to weep, seeing how sad is my condition,
and how great the height from which I have
fallen? In me you behold the wretched
Exilona
,
but lately the wife of Roderick, and the
queen of Spain, now a captive and a slave!
and, having said these words, she cast her eyes
upon the earth, and her tears began to flow
afresh.
The generous feelings of Abdalasis were
aroused at the sight of beauty and royalty in
tears. He gave orders that Exilona should be
entertained in a style befitting her former rank;
he appointed a train of female attendants to
wait upon her, and a guard of honour to protect
her from all intrusion. All the time that he
could spare from public concerns was passed in
her society; and he even neglected his divan,
and suffered his counsellors to attend in vain,
while he lingered in the apartments and gardens
of the palace, listening to the voice of Exilona.
The discreet Ayub saw the danger into which
he was falling. Oh Abdalasis, said he,
remember
the words of thy father. `Beware, my
son,' said he, `of the seductions of love. It
renders
the mighty weak, and makes slaves of
princes
!'
A blush kindled on the cheek of Abdalasis,
and he was silent for a moment. Why, said
he, at length, do you seek to charge me with
such weakness. It is one thing to be infatuated
by the charms of a woman, and another to be
touched by her misfortunes. It is the duty of
my station to console a princess who has been
reduced to the lowest humiliation by the tri
21*
umphs of our arms. In doing so I do but listen
to the dictates of true magnanimity.
Ayub was silent, but his brow was clouded,
and for once Abdalasis parted in discontent
from his counsellor. In proportion as he was
dissatisfied with others or with himself, he sought
the society of Exilona, for there was a charm in
her conversation that banished every care. He
daily became more and more enamoured, and
Exilona gradually ceased to weep, and began to
listen with secret pleasure to the words of her
Arab lover. When, however, he sought to urge
his passion, she recollected the light estimation
in which her sex was held by the followers of
Mahomet, and assumed a countenance grave
and severe.
Fortune, said she, has cast me at thy feet,
behold I am thy captive and thy spoil. But though
my person is in thy power, my soul is unsubdued.
and know that, should I lack force to defend my
honour, I have resolution to wash out all stain
upon it with my blood. I trust, however, in thy
courtesy as a cavalier to respect me in my
reverses
,
remembering what I have been, and that
though the crown has been wrested from my
brow, the royal blood still warms within my
veins.
[46]
[46]
Faxardo. corona, Gothica. T. 1. P. 492. Joan. Mar. de
reb. Hisp. L. 6. c. 27.
The lofty spirit of Exilona, and her proud
repulse, served but to increase the passion of
Abdalasis. He besought her to unite her
destiny
with his, and share his state and power,
promising that she should have no rival nor
co-partner
in his heart. Whatever scruples the
captive queen might originally have felt to a
union with one of the conquerors of her lord,
and an enemy of her adopted faith, they were
easily vanquished, and she became the bride of
Abadalasis. He would fain have persuaded her
to return to the faith of her fathers; but though
of moorish origin, and brought up in the
doctrines
of Islam, she was too thorough a convert
to christianity to consent, and looked back with
disgust upon a religion that admitted a plurality
of wives.
When the sage Ayub heard of the resolution
of Abadalasis to espouse Exilona he was in
despair
.
Alas, my cousin! said he, what
infatuation
possesses thee? Hast thou then
entirely
forgotten the letter of thy father. `
Beware
my son,' said he, `of love, it is an idle
passion
,
which enfeebles the heart and blinds the
judgment.' But Abdalasis interrupted him
with impatience. My father, said he, spake
but of the blandishments of wanton love, against
these I am secured by my virtuous passion for
Exilona.
Ayub would fain have impressed upon him
the dangers he ran of awakening suspicion in
the caliph, and discontent among the moslems,
by wedding the queen of the conquered
Roderick
,
and one who was an enemy to the religion
of Mahomet; but the youthful lover only
listened
to his passion. Their nuptials were
celebrated
at Seville with great pomp and
rejoicings
,
and he gave his bride the name of
Omalisam; that is to say, she of the precious
jewels;
[47]
[47]
Conde, p. 1. c. 17.
but she continued to be known among
the christians by the name of Exilona.
CHAPTER XVII.
Fate of Abdalasis and Exilona.Death of
Muza
.
Possession
instead of cooling the passion of
Abdalasis, only added to its force; he became
blindly enamoured of his beautiful bride, and
consulted her will in all things; nay, having lost
all relish for the advice of the discreet Ayub,
he was even guided by the counsels of his wife
in the affairs of government. Exilona,
unfortunately
,
had once been a queen, and she could
not remember her regal glories without regret.
She saw that Abdalasis had great power in the
land; greater even than had been possessed by
the gothic kings; but she considered it as
wanting in true splendour until his brows should
be encircled with the outward badge of
royalty
.
One day, when they were alone in the
palace of Seville, and the heart of Abdalasis
was given up to tenderness, she addressed him
in fond yet timid accents. Will not my lord
be offended, said she, if I make an unwel
come request? Abdalasis regarded her with
a smile. What canst thou ask of me,
Exilona
,
said he, that it would not be a happiness
for me to grant? Then Exilona produced a
crown of gold, sparkling with jewels, which
had belonged to the king, Don Roderick, and
said, Behold, thou art king in authority, be so
in thy outward state. There is majesty and
glory in a crown; it gives a sanctity to power.
Then putting the crown upon his head, she held
a mirror before him that he might behold the
majesty of his appearance. Abdalasis chid her
fondly, and put the crown away from him, but
Exilona persisted in her prayer. Never, said
she, has there been a king in Spain that did
not wear a crown. So Abdalasis suffered
himself to be beguiled by the blandishments of
his wife, and to be invested with the crown and
sceptre and other signs of royalty.
[48]
[48]
Cron. gen. de Alonzo el Sabio, p. 3. Joan. mar. de reb
Hisp. lib. 6. c. 27. Conde, p. 1. c. 19.
It is affirmed by ancient and discreet
chroniclers
,
that Abdalasis only assumed this royal
state in the privacy of his palace, and to gratify
the eye of his youthful bride; but where was a
secret ever confined within the walls of a
palace
?
The assumption of the insignia of the
ancient gothic kings was soon rumoured about,
and caused the most violent suspicions. The
moslems had already felt jealous of the
ascendancy
of this beautiful woman, and it was now
confidently asserted that Abdalasis, won by her
persuasions, had secretly turned christian.
The enemies of Abdalasis, those whose
rapacious
spirits had been kept in check by the
beneficence
of his rule, seized upon this occasion
to ruin him. They sent letters to Damascus
accusing him of apostacy, and of an intention
to seize upon the throne in right of his wife,
Exilona, as widow of the late King Roderick.
It was added, that the christians were prepared
to flock to his standard as the only means of
regaining ascendancy in their country.
These accusations arrived at Damascus just
after the accession of the sanguinary Suleiman
to the throne, and in the height of his
persecution
of the unfortunate Muza. The caliph
waited for no proofs in confirmation; he
immediately
sent private orders that Abdalasis should
be put to death, and that the same fate should
be dealt to his two brothers who governed in
Africa, as a sure means of crushing the
conspiracy
of this ambitious family.
The mandate for the death of Abdalasis was
sent to Abhilbar ben Obeidah and Zeyd ben
Nabegat, both of whom had been cherished
friends of Muza, and had lived in intimate
favour and companionship with his son. When
they read the fatal parchment, the scroll fell
from their trembling hands. Can such
hostility
exist against the family of Muza?
exclaimed
they. Is this the reward for such
great and glorious services? The cavaliers
remained for some time plunged in horror and
consternation. The order, however, was
absolute
,
and left them no discretion. Allah is
great, said they, and commands us to obey
our sovereign. So they prepared to execute
the bloody mandate with the blind fidelity of
moslems.
It was necessary to proceed with caution.
The open and magnanimous character of
Abdalasis
had won the hearts of a great part of
the soldiery, and his magnificence pleased the
cavaliers who formed his guard; it was feared,
therefore, that a sanguinary opposition would
be made to any attempt upon his person. The
rabble, however, had been imbittered against
him from his having restrained their
depredations
,
and because they thought him an apostate
in his heart, secretly bent upon betraying them
to the christians. While, therefore, the two
officers made vigilant dispositions to check any
movement on the part of the soldiery, they let
loose the blind fury of the populace by
publishing
the fatal mandate. In a moment the city
was in a ferment, and there was a ferocious
emulation who should be first to execute the
orders of the caliph.
Abdalasis was at this time at a palace in the
country not far from Seville, commanding a
delightful view of the fertile plain of the
Guadalquivir
.
Hither he was accustomed to retire
from the tumult of the court, and to pass his
time among groves and fountains and the sweet
repose of gardens, in the society of Exilona. It
was the dawn of day, the hour of early prayer,
when the furious populace arrived at this
retreat
.
Abdalasis was offering up his orisons in
a small mosque which he had erected for the
use of the neighbouring peasantry. Exilona
was in a chapel in the interior of the palace,
where her confessor, a holy friar, was
performing
mass. They were both surprised at their
devotions, and dragged forth by the hands of
the rabble. A few guards, who attended at the
palace, would have made defence, but they
were overawed by the sight of the written
mandate
of the caliph.
The captives were borne in triumph to
Seville
.
All the beneficent virtues of Abdalasis
were forgotten; nor had the charms of Exilona
any effect in softening the hearts of the
populace
.
The brutal eagerness to shed blood, which
seems inherent in human nature, was
awakened
,
22
and woe to the victims when that eagerness
is quickened by religious hate. The illustrious
couple adorned with all the graces of youth
and beauty, were hurried to a scaffold in the
great square of Seville, and there beheaded
amidst the shouts and execrations of an
infatuated
multitude. Their bodies were left exposed
upon the ground, and would have been
devoured
by dogs, had they not been gathered at
night by some friendly hand, and poorly
interred
in one of the courts of their late
dwelling
.
Thus terminated the loves and lives of
Abdalasis
and Exilona, in the year of the incarnation
seven hundred and fourteen. Their names
were held sacred as martyrs to the christian
faith; but many read in their untimely fate a
lesson against ambition and vain-glory; having
sacrificed real power and substantial rule to the
glittering bawble of a crown.
The head of Abdalasis was embalmed and
enclosed in a casket, and sent to Syria to the
cruel Suleiman. The messenger who bore it
overtook the caliph as he was performing a
pilgrimage to Mecca. Muza was among the
courtiers in his train, having been released from
prison. On opening the casket and regarding
its contents, the eyes of the tyrant sparkled
with malignant satisfaction. Calling the
unhappy
father to his side: Muza, said he, dost
thou know this head? The veteran
recognized
the features of his beloved son, and
turned his face away with anguish. Yes!
well do I know it, replied he; and may the
curse of God light upon him who has destroyed
a better man than himself.
Without adding another word, he retired to
Mount Deran, a prey to devouring melancholy.
He shortly after received tidings of the death of
his two sons whom he had left in the
government
of western Africa, and who had fallen
victims to the jealous suspicions of the caliph.
His advanced age was not proof against these
repeated blows, and this utter ruin of his late
prosperous family, and he sank into his grave
sorrowing and broken hearted.
Such was the lamentable end of the
conqueror
of Spain; whose great achievements
were not sufficient to atone, in the eye of his
sovereign, for a weakness to which all men
ambitious
of renown are subject; and whose
triumphs
eventually brought persecution upon
himself, and untimely death upon his children.
Here ends the legend of the Subjugation of
Spain.
LEGEND OF
COUNT JULIAN AND HIS FAMILY.
22*
In
the preceding legends is darkly shadowed
out a true story of the woes of Spain. It is a
story full of wholesome admonition, rebuking the
insolence of human pride and the vanity of
human
ambition, and showing the futility of all
greatness that is not strongly based on virtue.
We have seen, in brief space of time, most of
the actors in this historic drama disappearing,
one by one, from the scene, and going down,
conqueror and conquered, to gloomy and
unhonoured
graves. It remains to close this
eventful
history by holding up, as a signal warning,
the fate of the traitor, whose perfidious scheme
of vengeance brought ruin on his native land.
Many and various are the accounts given in
ancient chronicles of the fortunes of Count
Julian
and his family, and many are the traditions
on the subject still extant among the populace
of Spain, and perpetuated in those countless
ballads sung by peasants and muleteers, which
spread a singular charm over the whole of this
romantic land.
He who has travelled in Spain in the true
way in which the country ought to be
travelled
;
sojourning in its remote provinces;
rambling
among the rugged defiles and secluded
valleys of its mountains; and making himself
familiar with the people in their out-of-the-way
hamlets, and rarely visited neighbourhoods, will
remember many a group of travellers and
muleteers
,
gathered of an evening around the door
or the spacious hearth of a mountain venta,
wrapped in their brown cloaks, and listening
with grave and profound attention to the long
historic ballad of some rustic troubadour,
either recited with the true
ore rotundo
and
modulated cadences of Spanish elocution, or
chaunted to the tinkling of a guitar. In this
way he may have heard the doleful end of
Count Julian and his family recounted in
traditionary
rhymes, that have been handed down
from generation to generation. The
particulars
,
however, of the following wild legend are
chiefly gathered from the writings of the
pseudo
Moor, Rasis; how far they may be safely
taken as historic facts it is impossible now to
ascertain; we must content ourselves, therefore,
with their answering to the exactions of poetic
justice.
As yet every thing had prospered with Count
Julian. He had gratified his vengeance; he had
been successful in his treason, and had acquired
countless riches from the ruin of his country.
But it is not outward success that constitutes
prosperity. The tree flourishes with fruit and
foliage while blasted and withering at the heart.
Wherever he went, Count Julian read hatred in
every eye. The christians cursed him as the
cause of all their woe; the moslems despised
and distrusted him as a traitor. Men
whispered
together as he approached, and then turned
away in scorn; and mothers snatched away
their children with horror if he offered to caress
them. He withered under the execration of
his fellow men, and, last, and worst of all, he
began to loathe himself. He tried in vain to
persuade himself that he had but taken a
justifiable
vengeance; he felt that no personal wrong
can justify the crime of treason to one's country.
For a time, he sought in luxurious indulgence
to soothe or forget the miseries of the mind.
He assembled round him every pleasure and
gratification that boundless wealth could
purchase
,
but all in vain. He had no relish for the
dainties of his board; music had no charm
wherewith to lull his soul, and remorse drove
slumber from his pillow. He sent to Ceuta for
his wife Frandina, his daughter Florinda, and his
youthful son Alarbot; hoping in the bosom of
his family to find that sympathy and kindness
which he could no longer meet with in the
world. Their presence, however, brought him
no alleviation. Florinda, the daughter of his
heart, for whose sake he had undertaken this
signal vengeance, was sinking a victim to its
effects. Wherever she went, she found herself
a bye-word of shame and reproach. The
outrage
she had suffered was imputed to her as
wantonness, and her calamity was magnified
into
a crime. The christians never mentioned her
name without a curse, and the moslems, the
gainers by her misfortune, spake of her only
by the appellation of Cava, the vilest epithet
they could apply to woman.
But the opprobrium of the world was nothing
to the upbraiding of her own heart. She
charged herself with all the miseries of these
disastrous wars; the deaths of so many gallant
cavaliers; the conquest and perdition of her
country. The anguish of her mind preyed
upon the beauty of her person. Her eye, once
soft and tender in its expression, became wild
and haggard; her cheek lost its bloom, and
became
hollow and pallid, and at times there was
desperation in her words. When her father
sought to embrace her she withdrew with
shuddering
from his arms, for she thought of his
treason and the ruin it had brought upon Spain.
Her wretchedness increased after her return to
her native country, until it rose to a degree of
frenzy. One day when she was walking with
her parents in the garden of their palace, she
entered a tower and, having barred the door,
ascended to the battlements. From thence she
called to them in piercing accents, expressive of
her insupportable anguish and desperate
determination
.
Let this city, said she, be
henceforth
called Malacca, in memorial of the most
wretched of women, who therein put an end to
her days. So saying, she threw herself
headlong
from the tower and was dashed to pieces.
The city, adds the ancient chronicler, received
the name thus given it, though afterwards
softened
to Malaga, which it still retains in memory
of the tragical end of Florinda.
The Countess Frandina abandoned this scene
of woe, and returned to Ceuta, accompanied
by her infant son. She took with her the
remains
of her unfortunate daughter, and gave
them honourable sepulture in a mausoleum of
the chapel belonging to the citadel. Count
Julian
departed for Carthagena, where he
remained
plunged in horror at this doleful event.
About this time, the cruel Suleiman, having
destroyed the family of Muza, had sent an Arab
general, named Alahor, to succeed Abdalasis as
emir or governor of Spain. The new emir
was of a cruel and suspicious nature, and
commenced
his sway with a stern severity that
soon made those under his command look back
with regret to the easy rule of Abdalasis. He
regarded with an eye of distrust the renegado
christians who had aided in the conquest, and
who bore arms in the service of the moslems;
but his deepest suspicions fell upon Count
Julian
.
He has been a traitor to his own
countrymen
,
said he, how can we be sure that he
will not prove traitor to us?
A sudden insurrection of the christians who
had taken refuge in the Asturian mountains,
quickened his suspicions, and inspired him with
fears of some dangerous conspiracy against his
power. In the height of his anxiety, he
bethought
him of an Arabian sage named Yuza,
who had accompanied him from Africa. This
son of science was withered in form, and looked
as if he had outlived the usual term of mortal
life. In the course of his studies and travels in
the east, he had collected the knowledge and
experience of ages; being skilled in astrology,
and, it is said, in necromancy, and possessing
the marvellous gift of prophecy or divination.
To this expounder of mysteries Alahor applied to
learn whether any secret treason menaced his
safety.
The astrologer listened with deep attention,
and overwhelming brow, to all the surmises and
suspicions of the emir, then shut himself up to
consult his books and commune with those
supernatural
intelligences subservient to his
wisdom
.
At an appointed hour the emir sought him
in his cell. It was filled with the smoke of
perfumes
;
squares and circles and various diagrams
were described upon the floor, and the
astrologer
was poring over a scroll of parchment,
covered
with cabalistic characters. He received
Alahor with a gloomy and sinister aspect;
pretending
to have discovered fearful portents in the
heavens, and to have had strange dreams and
mystic visions.
O emir, said he, be on your guard!
treason
is around you and in your path; your life is
in peril. Beware of Count Julian and his family.
Enough, said the emir. They shall all die!
Parents and childrenall shall die!
He forthwith sent a summons to Count Julian
to attend him in Cordova. The messenger found
him plunged in affliction for the recent death of
his daughter. The count excused himself, on
account of this misfortune, from obeying the
commands of the emir in person, but sent
several
of his adherents. His hesitation, and the
circumstance of his having sent his family across
the straits to Africa, were construed by the
jealous
mind of the emir into proofs of guilt. He
no longer doubted his being concerned in the
recent insurrections, and that he had sent his
family
away, preparatory to an attempt, by force of
arms, to subvert the moslem domination. In his
fury he put to death Siseburto and Evan, the
nephews of Bishop Oppas, and sons of the
former
king, Witiza, suspecting them of taking part
in the treason. Thus did they expiate their
treachery to their country in the fatal battle of
the Guadalete.
Alahor next hastened to Carthagena to seize
upon Count Julian. So rapid were his movements
that the count had barely time to escape with
fifteen cavaliers, with whom he took refuge in
the strong castle of Marcuello, among the
mountains
of Arragon. The emir, enraged to be
disappointed
of his prey, embarked at Carthagena
and crossed the straits to Ceuta, to make
captives
of the Countess Frandina and her son.
The old chronicle from which we take this
part of our legend, presents a gloomy picture of
the countess in the stern fortress to which she
had fled for refuge; a picture heightened by
supernatural
horrors. These latter, the sagacious
reader will admit or reject according to the
23
measure of his faith and judgment; always
remembering
that in dark and eventful times, like
those in question, involving the destinies of
nations
,
the downfall of kingdoms, and the crimes
of rulers and mighty men, the hand of fate is
sometimes strangely visible, and confounds the
wisdom of the worldly wise, by intimations and
portents above the ordinary course of things.
With this proviso, we make no scruple to follow
the venerable chronicler in his narration.
Now so it happened, that the countess
Frandina
was seated late at night in her chamber in
the citadel of Ceuta, which stands on a lofty
rock, overlooking the sea. She was revolving
in gloomy thought the late disasters of her
family
,
when she heard a mournful noise like that
of the sea breeze moaning about the castle walls.
Raising her eyes, she beheld her brother, the
Bishop Oppas, at the entrance of the chamber.
She advanced to embrace him, but he forbade
her with a motion of his hand, and she observed
that he was ghastly pale, and that his eyes glared
as with lambent flames.
Touch me not, sister, said he, with a
mournful
voice, lest thou be consumed by the fire
which rages within me. Guard well thy son,
for blood hounds are upon his track. His
innocence
might have secured him the protection of
heaven, but our crimes have involved him in our
common ruin. He ceased to speak and was no
longer to be seen. His coming and going were
alike without noise, and the door of the chamber
remained fast bolted.
On the following morning a messenger arrived
with tidings that the Bishop Oppas had been
made prisoner in battle by the insurgent
christians
of the Asturias, and had died in fetters in
a tower of the mountains. The same
messenger
brought word that the Emir Alahor had put
to death several of the friends of Count Julian;
had obliged him to fly for his life to a castle in
Arragon, and was embarking with a formidable
force for Ceuta.
The Countess Frandina, as has already been
shown, was of courageous heart, and danger
made her desperate. There were fifty moorish
soldiers in the garrison; she feared that they
would prove treacherous, and take part with
their countrymen. Summoning her officers,
therefore, she informed them of their danger,
and, commanded them to put those Moors to
death. The guards sallied forth to obey her
orders. Thirty-five of the Moors were in the
great square, unsuspicious of any danger, when
they were severally singled out by their
executioners
,
and at a concerted signal, killed on the
spot. The remaining fifteen took refuge in a
tower. They saw the armada of the emir at a
distance, and hoped to be able to hold out until
its arrival. The soldiers of the countess saw it also,
and made extraordinary efforts to destroy these
internal enemies before they should be attacked
from without. They made repeated attempts to
storm the tower, but were as often repulsed with
severe loss. They then undermined it, supporting
its foundations by stanchions of wood. To
these they set fire and withdrew to a distance,
keeping up a constant shower of missiles to
prevent
the Moors from sallying forth to extinguish
the flames. The stanchions were rapidly
consumed
,
and when they gave way the tower fell to
the ground. Some of the Moors were crushed
among the ruins; others were flung to a distance
and dashed among the rocks; those who survived
were instantly put to the sword.
The fleet of the emir arrived at Ceuta about
the hour of vespers. He landed, but found the
gates closed against him. The countess herself
spoke to him from a tower, and set him at
defiance
.
The emir immediately laid siege to the
city. He consulted the astrologer Yuza, who told
him that, for seven days his star would have the
ascendant over that of the youth Alarbot, but
after
that time the youth would be safe from his
power, and would effect his ruin.
Alahor immediately ordered the city to be
assailed
on every side, and at length carried it by
storm. The countess took refuge with her forces
in the citadel and made desperate defence, but
the walls were sapped and mined, and she saw
that all resistance would soon be unavailing. Her
only thoughts now were to conceal her child.
Surely, said she, they will not think of seeking
him among the dead. She led him therefore into
the dark and dismal chapel. Thou art not afraid
to be alone in this darkness, my child, said she.
No, mother, replied the boy, darkness gives
silence and sleep. She conducted him to the
tomb of Florinda. Fearest thou the dead, my
child? No mother, the dead can do no harm,
and what should I fear from my sister?
The countess opened the sepulchre. Listen,
my son, said she. There are fierce and cruel
people who have come hither to murder thee.
Stay here in company with thy sister, and be quiet
as thou dost value thy life! The boy, who was
of a courageous nature, did as he was bidden, and
remained there all that day, and all the night, and
the next day until the third hour.
In the mean time the walls of the citadel were
sapped, the troops of the emir poured in at the
breach, and a great part of the garrison was put
to the sword. The countess was taken prisoner
and brought before the emir. She appeared in
his presence with a haughty demeanour, as if she
had been a queen receiving homage; but when
23*
he demanded her son, she faltered, and turned
pale, and replied, My son is with the dead.
Countess, said the emir, I am not to be
deceived
;
tell me where you have concealed the
boy, or tortures shall wring from you the secret.
Emir, replied the countess, may the
greatest
torments be my portion, both here and
hereafter
,
if what I speak be not the truth. My
darling
child lies buried with the dead.
The emir was confounded by the solemnity of
her words; but the withered astrologer Yuza,
who stood by his side regarding the countess
from beneath his bushed eyebrows, perceived
trouble in her countenance and equivocation in
her words. Leave this matter to me,
whispered
he to Alahor, I will produce the child.
He ordered strict search to be made by the
soldiery, and he obliged the countess to be
always
present. When they came to the chapel,
her cheek turned pale and her lip quivered.
This, said the subtile astrologer, is the place
of concealment!
The search throughout the chapel, however,
was equally vain, and the soldiers were about to
depart, when Yuza remarked a slight gleam of
joy in the eye of the countess. We are leaving
our prey behind, thought he, the countess is
exulting.
He now called to mind the words of her
asseveration
,
that her child was with the dead.
Turning suddenly to the soldiers he ordered them
to search the sepulchres. If you find him not,
said he drag forth the bones of that wanton
Cava, that they may be burnt, and the ashes
scattered
to the winds.
The soldiers searched among the tombs and
found that of Florinda partly open. Within lay
the boy in the sound sleep of childhood, and one
of the soldiers took him gently in his arms to bear
him to the emir.
When the countess beheld that her child was
discovered, she rushed into the presence of
Alahor
,
and, forgetting all her pride, threw herself
upon her knees before him.
Mercy! mercy! cried she in piercing accents,
mercy on my sonmy only child! O emir!
listen to a mother's prayer, and my lips shall kiss
thy feet. As thou art merciful to him so may the
most high God have mercy upon thee, and heap
blessings on thy head.
Bear that frantic woman hence, said the
emir, but guard her well.
The countess was dragged away by the
soldiery
without regard to her struggles and her
cries, and confined in a dungeon of the citadel.
The child was now brought to the emir. He
had been awakened by the tumult, but gazed
fearlessly on the stern countenances of the
soldiers
.
Had the heart of the emir been capable
of pity, it would have been touched by the
tender
youth and innocent beauty of the child; but
his heart was as the nether millstone, and he was
bent upon the destruction of the whole family of
Julian. Calling to him the astrologer, he gave
the child into his charge with a secret command.
The withered son of the desert took the boy by
the hand, and led him up the winding stair-case
of a tower. When they reached the summit
Yuza placed him on the battlements.
Cling not to me, my child, said he, there
is no danger. Father, I fear not, said the
undaunted boy, yet it is a wondrous height!
The child looked around with delighted eyes.
The breeze blew his curling locks from about
his face, and his cheek glowed at the
boundless
prospect; for the tower was reared
upon
that lofty promontory on which Hercules
founded one of his pillars. The surges of the
sea were heard far below, beating upon the
rocks, the sea gull screamed and wheeled
about the foundations of the tower, and the
sails of lofty caraccas were as mere specks on
the bosom of the deep.
Dost thou know yonder land beyond the
blue water? said Yuza.
It is Spain, replied the boy, it is the land
of my father and my mother.
Then stretch forth thy hands and bless it,
my child, said the astrologer.
The boy let go his hold of the wall, and, as
he stretched forth his hands, the aged son of
Ishmael, exerting all the strength of his
withered
limbs, suddenly pushed him over the
battlements
.
He fell headlong from the top of that
tall tower, and not a bone in his tender frame
but was crushed upon the rocks beneath.
Alahor came to the foot of the winding
stairs.
Is the boy safe? cried he.
He is safe, replied Yuza; come and
behold
the truth with thine own eyes.
The emir ascended the tower and looked
over the battlements, and beheld the body of
the child, a shapeless mass, on the rocks far
below, and the sea gulls hovering about it; and
he gave orders that it should be thrown into the
sea, which was done.
On the following morning, the countess was
led forth from her dungeon into the public
square. She knew of the death of her child,
and that her own death was at hand, but she
neither wept nor supplicated. Her hair was
dishevelled, her eyes were haggard with
watching
,
and her cheek was as the monumental
stone, but there were the remains of
commanding
beauty in her countenance, and the majesty
of her presence awed even the rabble into
respect.
A multitude of christian prisoners were then
brought forth; and Alahor cried outBehold
the wife of Count Julian; behold one of that
traitorous family which has brought ruin upon
yourselves and upon your country. And he
ordered that they should stone her to death.
But the christians drew back with horror from
the deed, and saidIn the hand of God is
vengeance, let not her blood be upon our
heads. Upon this the emir swore with horrid
imprecations that whoever of the captives
refused
should himself be stoned to death. So
the cruel order was executed, and the Countess
Frandina perished by the hands of her
countrymen
.
Having thus accomplished his barbarous
errand, the emir embarked for Spain, and
ordered
the citadel of Ceuta to be set on fire,
and crossed the straights at night by the light
of its towering flames.
The death of Count Julian, which took place
not long after, closed the tragic story of his
family
.
How he died remains involved in doubt.
Some assert that the cruel Alahor pursued him
to his retreat among the mountains, and,
having
taken him prisoner, beheaded him; others
that the Moors confined him in a dungeon,
and put an end to his life with lingering
torments
;
while others affirm that the tower of
the castle of Marcuello, near Huesca, in
Arragon
,
in which he took refuge, fell on him
and crushed him to pieces. All agree that his
latter end was miserable in the extreme, and
his death violent. The curse of heaven, which
had thus pursued him to the grave, was
extended
to the very place which had given him
shelter
;
for we are told that the castle is no longer
inhabited on account of the strange and
horrible
noises that are heard in it; and that
visions
of armed men are seen above it in the
air; which are supposed to be the troubled
spirits of the apostate christians who favoured
the cause of the traitor.
In after times a stone sepulchre was shown,
outside of the chapel of the castle, as the tomb
of Count Julian; but the traveller and the
pilgrim
avoided it, or bestowed upon it a
malediction
;
and the name of Julian has remained
a bye-word and a scorn in the land for the
warning of all generations. Such ever be the
lot of him who betrays his country.
Here end the legends of the conquest of
Spain.
Written in the Alhambra, June
10, 1829.